VOL. I. 1
INTRODUCTORY EPISTLE.
TO ZACHARY HUDDLESTONE, ESQ.
PRESTON RIDGE, NEW YORK.
DEAR ZACK,
I can
imagine your surprise upon the receipt
of this, when you first discover that I have really
reached the Old Dominion. To requite you for my
stealing off so quietly, I hold myself bound to an
explanation
,
and, in revenge for your past friendship,
to inflict upon you a full, true, and particular account
of all my doings, or rather my seeings and thinkings,
up to this present writing. You know my cousin
Ned Hazard has been often urging it upon me,so
often that he began to grow sick of it,as a sort of
family duty, to come and spend some little fragment
of my life amongst my Virginia relations, and I have
broken so many promises on that score, that, in truth,
I began to grow ashamed of myself.
Upon the first of this month a letter from Ned
reached me at Longsides, on the North River, where
I then was with my mother and sisters. Ned's
usual tone of correspondence is that of easy,
confiding
intimacy, mixed up, now and then, with a
slashing raillery against some imputed foibles, upon
which, as they were altogether imaginary, I could
afford to take his sarcasm in good part. But in this
epistle he assumed a new ground, giving me some
home thrusts, chiding me roundly for certain waxing
bachelorisms
, as he called them, and intimating that
a crust was evidently hardening upon me. A plague
upon the fellow! You know, Zachary, that neither of
us is so many years ahead of him.My reckoning
takes in but five years, eleven months and fifteen
daysand certainly, not so much by my looks.He
insinuated that I had arrived at that inveteracy of
opinion for which travel was the only cure; and that,
in especial, I had fallen into some unseemly
prejudices
against the Old Dominion which were
unbecoming
the character of a philosopher, to which, he
affirmed, I had set up pretensions; and then came a
a most hyperbolical inuendo,that he had good
reason
to know that I was revolving the revival of a stale
adventure in the war of Cupid, in which I had been
aforetime egregiously baffled, at Rhodes, at Cyprus,
and on other grounds. Any reasonable man would
say, that was absurd on his own showing. The
letter
grew more provokingit flouted my opinions,
laughed at my particularity, caricatured and derided
my figure for its leanness, set at nought my
complexion
,
satirized my temper, and gave me over
corporeally
and spiritually to the great bear-herd, as one
predestined to all kinds of ill luck with the women,
and to be led for ever as an ape. His epistle,
however
,
wound up like a sermon, in a perfect concord
of sweet sounds, beseeching me to forego my idle
purpose; (Cupid, forsooth!) to weed out all my
prejudicate
affections, as well touching the Old
Dominion
as the other conceits of my vain philosophy, and
to hie me, with such speed as my convenience might
serve withal, to Swallow Barn, where he made bold
to pledge me an entertainment worthy of my labour.
It was a brave offer, and discreetly to be
perpended
.
I balanced the matter, in my usual see-saw
fashion, for several days. It does mostly fall out, my
dear Zack (to speak philosophically), that this machine
of man is pulled in such contrary ways, by
inclinations
and appetites setting diversely, that it shall go
well with him if he be not altogether balanced into
a pernicious equilibrium of absolute rest. I had a
great account to run up against my resolution.
Longsides has so many conveniences; and the
servants
have fallen so well into my habitudes; and my
arm-chair had such an essential adaptation to my
felicity; and even my razors were on such a
stationary
foundationone for every day of the weekas
to render it impossible to embark them on a journey;
and my laundress had just begun to comprehend,
after a severe indoctrination, the precise quantum of
starch, and the proper breadth of fold, for my cravat;
to say nothing of the letters to write, and the books
to read, and all the other little cares that make up
the sum of immobility in a man who does not care
much about seeing the world; so that, in faith,
Zachary, I had a serious matter of it. And then,
after all, I was, in fact, plighted to my sister Louisa
to go with her up the river, you know where. This,
between you and me, was the very thing that brought
down the beam. That futile, nonsensical flirtation!
But for this fantastic conceit crossing my mind with
the bitterness of its folly, I should indubitably have
staid at home.
There are some junctures in love and war both,
where your lying is your only game; for as to
equivocating
,
or putting the question upon an
if
or a
but
,
it is a downright confession. If I had refused Ned's
summons, not a whole legion of devils could have
driven it out of his riveted belief, that I had been
kept at home by that maggot of the brain which he
called a love affair. And then I should never have
heard the end of it!
I'll set that matter right at least, quoth I, as I
folded up his letter. Ned has reason too, said I,
suddenly struck with the novelty of the proposed
journey, which began to show in a pleasant light
upon my imagination, as things are apt to do, when
a man has once relieved his mind from a state of
doubt:One ought to travel before he makes up
his opinion: there are two sides to every question,
and the world is right or wrong; I'm sure I don't
know which. Your traveller is a man of privileges
and authoritative, and looks well in the multitude: a
man of mark, and authentic as a witness. And as
for the Old Dominion, I'll warrant me it's a right
jolly old place, with a good many years on its head
yet, or I am mistakenBy cock and pye, I'll go and
see it!What ho! my tablets,
Behold me now in the full career of my voyage of
1*
discovery, exploring the James River in the
steamboat
,
on a clear, hot fifteenth of June, and looking
with a sagacious perspicacity upon the commonest
sights of this terra incognita. I gazed upon the
receding
headlands far sternward, and then upon the
sedgy banks where the cattle were standing leg-deep
in the water to get rid of the flies: and ever and
anon, as we followed the sinuosities of the river, some
sweeping eminence came into view, and on the
crown thereof was seen a plain, many-windowed
edifice
of brick, with low wings, old, ample and stately,
looking over its wide and sun-burnt domain in solitary
silence: and there were the piney promontories, into
whose shade we sometimes glided so close that one
might have almost jumped on shore, where the wave
struck the beach with a sullen plash: and there were
the decayed fences jutting beyond the bank into the
water, as if they had come down the hill too fast to
stop themselves. All these things struck my fancy,
as peculiar to the region.
It is wonderful to think how much more distinct
are the impressions of a man who travels pen in
hand, than those of a mere business voyager. Even
the crows, as we sometimes scared them from their
banquets with our noisy enginery, seemed to have a
more voluble, and, I may say, eloquent caw here
in Virginia, than in the dialectic climates of the
North. You would have laughed to see into what
a state of lady-like rapture I had worked myself, in
my eagerness to get a peep at James Town, with all
my effervescence of romance kindled up by the
renown
of the unmatchable Smith. The steward of
the boat pointed it out when we had nearly passed
itand lo! there it wasan old steeple, a barren
fallow, some melancholy heifers, a blasted pine, and,
on its top, a desolate hawk's nest. What a
splendid
field for the fancy! What a carte blanche for a
painter! With how many things might this little
spot be filled!
What time bright Phbusyou see that James
Town has made me poeticalhad thrown the reins
upon his horse's neck, and got down from his chafed
saddle in the western country, like a tired mail
carrier
,
our boat was safely moored at Rocket's, and I
entered Richmond between hawk and buzzardthe
very best hour, I maintain, out of the twenty-four,
for a picturesque tourist. At that hour, it may be
affirmed generally, that Nature is an absolute liar.
The landscape becomes like one of Hubard's
cuttings
every
thing jet black against a bright horizon:
nothing to be seen but profiles, with all the shabby
fillings-up kept dark. Shockoe Hill was crested
with what seemed palaces embowered in groves and
gardens of richest shade; the chimneys numberless,
like minarets; and the Parthenon of Virginia, on its
appropriate summit, stood in another Acropolis,
tracing
its broad pediment upon the sky in exaggerated
lines. There, too, was the rush of waters tumbling
around enchanted islands, and flashing dimly on the
sight. The hum of a city fell upon my ear; the
streets looked long and the houses high, and every
thing brought upon my mind that misty impression
which, Burke says, is an ingredient of the
sublime
,
and which, I say, every stranger feels on
entering
a city at twilight.
I was set down at The Union, where, for the
first hour, being intent upon my creature comforts,
my time passed well enough. The abrupt transition
from long continued motion to a state of rest makes
almost every man sad, exactly as sudden speed
makes us joyous; and for this reason, I take it, your
traveller in a strange place is, for a space after his
halt, a sullen, if not a melancholy animal. The
proofs of this were all around me; for here was Inot
an unpractised traveller eitherat my first resting
place after four days of accelerated progression, for
the first time in my life in Richmond, in a large
hotel
,
without one cognizable face before me, full of
excellent
feelings, without a power of utterance. What
would I have given for thee, or Jones, or even long
Dick Hardesty! In that ludicrous conflict between
the social nature of the man and his outward
circumstances
,
which every light-hearted voyager feels in
such a situation as mine, I grew desponding. Talk
not to me of the comfort of mine own inn! I hold it
a thing altogether insufficient. A burlesque
solitariness
sealed up the fountains of speech, of the crowd
who were seated at the supper table; and the same
uneasy sensation of pent-up sympathies was to be
seen in the groups that peopled the purlieus of the
hotel. A square lamp that hung midway over the
hall, was just lit up, and a few insulated beings were
sauntering backward and forward in its light: some
loitered in pairs, in low and reserved conversation;
others stalked alone in incommunicable ruminations,
with shaded brows, and their hands behind their
backs. One or two stood at the door humming
familiar
catches and old madrigals, in thoughtful
medleys
,
as they gazed up and down the street, now
clamorous
with the din of carts, and the gossip of
serving-maids
,
discordant apprentice boys, and
over-contented
blacks. Some sat on the pavement, leaning their
chairs against the wall, and puffing segars in
imperturbable
silence: all composing an orderly and
disconsolate
little republic of humoursome spirits, most
pitifully out of tune.
I was glad to take refuge in an idle occupation; so
I strolled about the city. The streets, by degrees,
grew less frequented. Family parties were
gathered
about their doors, to take the evening breeze.
The moon shone bright upon some bevies of active
children, who played at racing games upon the
pavements
.
On one side of the street, a contumacious
clarionet screamed a harsh bravado to a
thoroughgoing
violin, that on the opposite side, in an
illuminated
barber-shop, struggled in the contortions of a
Virginia reel. And, at intervals, strutted past a
careering
,
saucy negro, with marvellous lips, whistling
to the top of his bent, and throwing into shade
halloo
of schoolboy, scream of clarionet, and screech of
fiddle.
Towards midnight a thunder gust arose,
accompanied
with sharp lightning, and the morning broke upon
me in all the luxuriance of a cool and delicious
atmosphere
.
You must know that when I left home,
my purpose was to make my way direct to Swallow
Barn. Now, what think you of my skill as a
traveller
,
when I tell you, that until I woke in Richmond
on this enchanting morning, it never once occurred
to me to inquire where this same Swallow Barn was!
I knew that it was in Virginia, and somewhere about
the James River, and therefore I instinctively
wandered
to Richmond; but now, while making my
toilet
,
my thoughts being naturally bent upon my next
movement, it very reasonably occurred to me that I
must have passed my proper destination the day
before
,
and, full of this thought, I found myself humming
the line from an old song, which runs, Pray what
the devil brings you here! The communicative and
obliging bar-keeper of the Union soon put me right.
He knew Ned Hazard as a frequent visiter of
Richmond
,
and his advice was, that I should take the
same boat in which I came, and shape my course
back as far as City Point, where he assured me that
I might find some conveyance to Swallow Barn,
which lay still farther down the river, and that, at
all events, go where I would, I could not go wrong
in Virginia. What think you of that? Now I hold
that to be, upon personal experience, as true a word
as ever was set down in a traveller's breviary. There
is not a by-path in Virginia that will take a
gentleman
who has time on his hands, in a wrong direction.
This I say in honest compliment to a state that is
full to the brim of right good fellows.
The boat was not to return for two days, and I
therefore
employed the interval in looking about the city.
Don't be frightened!for I neither visited hospitals,
nor schools, nor libraries, and therefore will not play
the tourist with you: but if you wish to see a
beautiful
little city, built up of rich and tasteful villas, and
embellished with all the varieties of town and
country
,
scattered with a refined and exquisite skillcome
and look at Shockoe Hill in the month of June.You
may believe, then, I did not regret my
aberration
.
At the appointed day I re-embarked, and in due
time was put down at City Point. Here some
further delay awaited me. This is not the land of
hackney coaches, and I found myself somewhat
embarrassed
in procuring an onward conveyance. At
a small house, to which I was conducted, I made
my wishes known, and the proprietor kindly
volunteered
his services to set me forward. It was a
matter
of some consideration. The day was well
advanced
,
and it was as much as could be done to reach
Swallow Barn that night. An equipage, however,
was at last procured for me, and off I went. You
would have laughed sans intermission a good
hour, if you had seen me upon the road. I was set
up in an old sulky, of a dingy hue, without springs,
with its body sunk between a pair of unusually high
wheels, that gave it something of a French shrug. It
was drawn by an asthmatic, superannuated racer,
with a huge Roman nose and a most sorrowful
countenance
.
His sides were piteously scalded with the
traces, and his harness, partly of rope and partly of
leather thongs, corresponded with the sobriety of his
character. He had fine long legs, however, and got
over the ground with surprising alacrity. At a
respectful
distance behind me trotted the most
venerable
of outridersan old free negro, formerly a
retainer
in some of the feudal establishments of the low
country. His name was Scipio, and his face, which
was principally made up of a pair of lips hanging
below a pair of nostrils, was well set off with a head
of silver wool that bespoke a volume of gravity. He
had, from some aristocratic conceit of elegance,
indued
himself for my service in a cast-off dragoon cap,
stripped of its bear skin; a ragged remnant of a
regimental
coat, still jagged with some points of
tarnished
scarlet; and a pair of coarse linen trowsers,
barely reaching the ankles, beneath which two bony
feet occupied shoes, each of the superficies and
figure
of a hoe, and on one of these was whimsically
buckled a rusty spur. His horse was a short,
thickset
pony, with an amazingly rough trot, which kept
Scipio's legs in a state of constant warfare against the
animal's sides, whilst the old fellow bounced up and
down in his saddle with the ambitious ostentation of
a groom in the vigour of manhood, and proud of his
horsemanship.
Scipio frequently succeeded, by dint of hard
spurring
,
to get close enough to me to open a conversation,
which he conducted with such a deferential courtesy
and formal politeness, as greatly to enhance my
opinion
of his breeding. His face was lighted up with a
lambent smile, and he touched his hat with an antique
grace at every accost; the tone of his voice was
mild and subdued, and in short, Scipio, though black,
had all the unction of an old gentleman. He had a
great deal to say of the palmy days of Virginia,
and the generations that in his time had been broken
up, or, what in his conception was equivalent, had
gone over the mountain. He expatiated, with a
wonderful relish, upon the splendours of the old
fashioned
style in that part of the country; and told me
very pathetically, how the estates were cut up, and
what old people had died of, and how much he felt
himself alone in the present timeswhich particulars
he interlarded with sundry sage remarks importing an
affectionate attachment to the old school, of which
he considered himself no unworthy survivor. He
concluded these disquisitions with a reflection that
amused me by its profundityand which doubtless
he picked up from some popular orator: When
they change the circumstance, they alter the case.
My expression of assent to this aphorism awoke all
his vanity,for, after pondering a moment upon it,
he shook his head archly, as he added,People
think old Scipio a fool, because he's got no sense,
and, thereupon, the old fellow laughed till the tears
came into his eyes.
In this kind of colloquy we made some twenty
miles before the shades of evening overtook us, and
Scipio now informed me that we might soon expect
to reach Swallow Barn. The road was smooth, and
canopied with dark foliage, and, as the last blush of
twilight faded away, we swept rapidly round the
VOL. I. 2
head of a swamp, where a thousand frogs were
celebrating
their vespers, and soon after reached the gate
of the court-yard. Lights were glimmering through
different apertures, and several stacks of chimneys
were visible above the horizon; the whole mass being
magnified into the dimensions of a great castle. Some
half dozen dogs bounding to the gate, brought a host
of servants to receive me, as I alighted at the door.
Cousins count in Virginia, and have great
privileges
.
Here was I in the midst of a host of them.
Frank Meriwether met me as cordially as if we had
spent our whole lives together, and my cousin
Lucretia
,
his wife, came up and kissed me in the genuine
country fashion:of course, I repeated the ceremony
towards all the female branches that fell in my way,
and by the by, the girls are pretty enough to make
the ceremony interesting, although I think they
consider
me somewhat oldish. As to Ned Hazard, I
need not tell you he is the quintessence of good
humour
,
and received me with that famous hearty
honesty
of his, which you would have predicted.
At the moment of my arrival, a part of the family
were strewed over the steps of a little porch at the
front door, basking in the moonlight; and before them
a troop of children, white and black, trundled hoops
across the court-yard, followed by a pack of
companionable
curs, who seemed to have a part of the
game; whilst a piano within the house served as
an orchestra to the players. My arrival produced a
sensation that stopped all this, and I was hurried by
a kind of tumultuary welcome into the parlour.
If you have the patience to read this long epistle
to the end, I would like to give you a picture of the
family as it appeared to me that night; but if you
are already fatigued with my gossip, as I have good
reason to fear, why you may e'en skip this, and go
about your more important duties. But it is not often
you may meet such scenes, and as they produce some
kindly impressions, I think it worth while to note
this.
The parlour was one of those specimens of
architecture
of which there are not many survivors, and
in another half century, they will, perhaps, be
extinct
.
The walls were of panelled wood, of a
greenish
white, with small windows seated in deep
embrasures
,
and the mantel was high, embellished with
heavy mouldings that extended up to the cornice of
the room, in a figure resembling a square fortified
according to Vauban. In one corner stood a tall,
triangular cupboard, and opposite to it a clock
equally
tall, with a healthy, saucy-faced full moon
peering
above the dial plate. A broad sofa ranged along
the wall, and was kept in countenance by a legion
of leather-bottomed chairs, which sprawled their
bandy-legs
to a perilous compass, like a high Dutch
skater squaring the yard. A huge table occupied the
middle of the room, whereon reposed a service of
stately China, and a dozen covers flanking some
lodgments of sweetmeats, and divers curiously
wrought pyramids of butter tottering on pedestals of
ice. In the midst of this array, like a lordly fortress,
was placed an immense bowl of milk, surrounded by
a circumvallation of silver goblets, reflecting their
images on the polished board, as so many El
Dorados
in a fairy Archipelago. An uncarpeted floor
glistened with a dim, but spotless lustre, in token of
careful housekeeping: and around the walls were
hung, in grotesque frames, some time-worn portraits,
protruding their pale faces through thickets of
priggish
curls.
The sounding of a bell was the signal for our
evening repast, and produced an instant movement
in the apartment. My cousin Lucretia had already
taken the seat of worship behind a steaming urn and
a strutting coffee-pot of chased silver, that had the air
of a cock about to crow,it was so erect. A little
rosy gentleman, the reverend Mr. Chub, (a tutor in
the family,) said a hasty and half-smothered grace,
and then we all arranged ourselves at the table. An
aged dame in spectacles, with the mannerly silence
of a dependant, placed herself in a post at the board,
that enabled her to hold in check some little moppets
who were perched on high chairs, with bibs under their
chins, and two bare-footed boys, who had just burst
into the room, overheated with play. A vacant seat
remained, that, after a few moments, was occupied
by a tall spinster, with a sentimental mien, who
glided into the parlour with some stir. She was
another cousin, Zachary, according to the Virginia
rule of consanguinity, who was introduced to me
as Miss Prudence Meriwether;a sister of Frank's,
and as for her age,that's neither here nor there.
The evening went off, as you might guess, with
abundance of plain good feeling, and unaffected
enjoyment
.
The ladies soon fell into their domestic
occupations, and the parson smoked his pipe in
silence
at the window. The young progeny teased
uncle Ned with importunate questions, or played
at bo-peep at the parlour door, casting sly looks at
me, from whence they slipt off, with a laugh,
whenever
they caught my eye. At last, growing tired,
they rushed with one accord upon Hazard, flinging
themselves across his knees, pulling his skirts, or
clambering over the back of his chair, until worn out
by sport, they dropped successively upon the floor,
in such childish slumber, that not even their nurses
woke them when they were picked up like sacks,
and carried off to bed upon the shoulders.
It was not long before the rest of us followed, and
I found myself luxuriating in a comfortable bed that
would have accommodated a platoon. Here,
listening
to the tree frog and the owl, I dropped into a
profound
slumber, and knew nothing more of this under
world, until the sun shining through my window, and
the voluble note of the mocking bird, recalled me to
the enjoyment of nature and the morning breeze.
And so, Zachary, you have all my adventures up
to the moment of my arrival. For the future, do not
expect that I mean to make you the victim of my
garrulity. I admit there is something tyrannical in
these special appeals to the patience of a friend, so I
shall henceforth set down, in a random way, all that
interests me during my present visit, and when I
2 *
have made a book of it, my dear friend, you may
read it or not, just as you like. It may be
sometime
before we meet, and till then be assured I
wear you in my heart of hearts.
Yours ever,
Mark Littleton
.
Swallow Barn
,
June
20
th
, 1829.
CHAPTER I.
SWALLOW BARN.
Swallow Barn
is an aristocratical old edifice,
that squats, like a brooding hen, on the southern bank
of the James River. It is quietly seated, with its
vassal out-buildings, in a kind of shady pocket or
nook, formed by a sweep of the stream, on a gentle
acclivity thinly sprinkled with oaks, whose
magnificent
branches afford habitation and defence to an
antique colony of owls.
This time-honoured mansion was the residence of
the family of Hazards; but in the present generation
the spells of love and mortgage conspired to translate
the possession to Frank Meriwether, who having
married Lucretia, the eldest daughter of my late
uncle
,
Walter Hazard, and lifted some gentlemanlike
incumbrances that had been silently brooding upon
the domain along with the owls, was thus inducted
into the proprietory rights. The adjacency of his
own estate gave a territorial feature to this alliance,
of which the fruits were no less discernible in the
multiplication of negroes, cattle and poultry, than in
a flourishing clan of Meriwethers.
The buildings illustrate three epochs in the
history
of the family. The main structure is upwards
of a century old; one story high, with thick brick
walls, and a double-faced roof, resembling a ship,
bottom upwards; this is perforated with small
dormant
windows, that have some such expression as
belongs to a face without eye-brows. To this is
added
a more modern tenement of wood, which might
have had its date about the time of the Revolution:
it has shrunk a little at the joints, and left some
crannies
,
through which the winds whisper all night long.
The last member of the domicil is an upstart fabric
of later times, that seems to be ill at ease in this
antiquated
society, and awkwardly overlooks the
ancestral
edifice, with the air of a grenadier recruit posted
behind a testy little veteran corporal. The traditions
of the house ascribe the existence of this erection to
a certain family divan, wheresay the chronicles
the salic law was set at nought, and some pungent
matters of style were considered. It has an
unfinished
drawing-room, possessing an ambitious air of
fashion, with a marble mantel, high ceilings, and
large folding doors; but being yet unplastered, and
without paint, it has somewhat of a melancholy
aspect
,
and may be compared to an unlucky bark lifted
by an extraordinary tide upon a sand-bank: it is
useful as a memento to all aspiring householders
against a premature zeal to make a show in the
world, and the indiscretion of admitting females into
cabinet councils.
These three masses compose an irregular pile, in
which the two last described constituents are
obsequiously
stationed in the rear, like serving-men by the
chair of a gouty old gentleman, supporting the squat
and frowning little mansion which, but for the family
pride, would have been long since given over to the
accommodation of the guardian birds of the place.
The great hall door is an ancient piece of walnut
work, that has grown
too heavy for its hinges, and by
its daily travel has furrowed the floor with a deep
quadrant, over which it has a very uneasy journey.
It is shaded by a narrow porch, with a carved
pediment
,
upheld by massive columns of wood sadly split
by the sun. A court-yard, in front of this, of a
semi-circular
shape, bounded by a white paling, and
having
a gravel road leading from a large and variously
latticed gate-way around a grass plot, is embellished
by a superannuated willow that stretches forth its
arms, clothed with its pendant drapery, like a
reverend
priest pronouncing a benediction. A bridle-rack
stands on the outer side of the gate, and near it a
ragged, horse-eaten plum tree casts its skeleton
shadow
upon the dust.
Some lombardy poplars, springing above a mass
of shrubbery, partially screen various supernumerary
buildings around the mansion. Amongst these is to
be seen the gable end of a stable, with the date of its
erection stiffly emblazoned in black bricks near the
upper angle, in figures set in after the fashion of the
work in a girl's sampler. In the same quarter a
pigeon box, reared on a post, and resembling a huge
tee-totum, is visible, and about its several doors and
windows, a family of pragmatical pigeons are
generally
strutting, bridling and bragging at each other
from sunrise until dark.
Appendant to this homestead is an extensive tract
of land that stretches for some three or four miles
along the river, presenting alternately abrupt
promontories
mantled with pine and dwarf oak, and
small inlets terminating in swamps. Some sparse
portions of forest vary the landscape, which, for the
most part, exhibits a succession of fields clothed with
a diminutive growth of Indian corn, patches of
cotton
or parched tobacco plants, and the occasional
varieties of stubble and fallow grounds. These are
surrounded with worm fences of shrunken chesnut,
where lizards and ground squirrels are perpetually
running races along the rails.
At a short distance from the mansion a brook
glides at a snail's pace towards the river, holding its
course through a wilderness of alder and laurel, and
forming little islets covered with a damp moss.
Across this stream is thrown a rough bridge, and not
far below, an aged sycamore twists its complex roots
about a spring, at the point of confluence of which
and the brook, a squadron of ducks have a cruising
ground, where they may be seen at any time of the
day turning up their tails to the skies, like
unfortunate
gun boats driven by the head in a gale.
Immediately
on the margin, at this spot, the family linen
is usually spread out by some sturdy negro women,
who chant shrill ditties over their wash tubs, and
keep up a spirited attack, both of tongue and hand,
upon sundry little besmirched and bow-legged blacks,
that are continually making somersets on the grass,
or mischievously waddling across the clothes laid out
to bleach.
Beyond the bridge, at some distance, stands a
prominent
object in this picturethe most time-worn
and venerable appendage to the establishment:a
huge, crazy and disjointed barn, with an immense
roof hanging in penthouse fashion almost to the
ground, and thatched a foot thick, with sun-burnt
straw, that reaches below the eaves in ragged flakes,
giving it an air of drowsy decrepitude. The rude
enclosure surrounding this antiquated magazine is
strewed knee-deep with litter, from the midst of which
arises a long rack, resembling a chevaux de frise,
which is ordinarily filled with fodder. This is the
customary
lounge of four or five gaunt oxen, who keep up
a sort of imperturbable companionship with a
sickly-looking
wagon that protrudes its parched tongue, and
droops its rusty swingle-trees in the hot sunshine,
with the air of a dispirited and forlorn invalid
awaiting
the attack of a tertian ague: While, beneath the
sheds, the long face of a plough horse may be seen,
peering through the dark window of the stable, with
a spectral melancholy; his glassy eye moving silently
across the gloom, and the profound stillness of his
habitation now and then interrupted only by his
sepulchral and hoarse cough. There are also some
sociable carts under the same sheds, with their shafts
against the wall, which seem to have a free and
easy air, like a set of roysters taking their ease in a
tavern porch.
Sometimes a clownish colt, with long fetlocks and
dishevelled mane, and a thousand burs in his tail,
stalks about this region; but as it seems to be
forbidden
ground to all his tribe, he is likely very soon
to encounter his natural enemy in some of the young
negroes, upon which event he makes a rapid retreat,
not without an uncouth display of his heels in
passing
;
and bounds off towards the brook, where he
stops and looks back with a saucy defiance, and,
after affecting to drink for a moment, gallops away,
with a hideous whinnowing, to the fields.
VOL. I. 3
CHAPTER II.
A COUNTRY GENTLEMAN.
Frank Meriwether
is now in the meridian of
life;somewhere close upon forty-five. Good cheer
and a good temper both tell well upon him. The
first has given him a comfortable full figure, and the
latter certain easy, contemplative habits, that incline
him to be lazy and philosophical. He has the
substantial
planter look that belongs to a gentleman who
lives on his estate, and is not much vexed with the
crosses of life.
I think he prides himself on his personal
appearance
,
for he has a handsome face, with a dark blue
eye, and a high forehead that is scantily embellished
with some silver-tipped locks, that, I observe, he
cherishes for their rarity: besides, he is growing
manifestly attentive to his dress, and carries himself
erect, with some secret consciousness that his person
is not bad. It is pleasant to see him when he has
ordered his horse for a ride into the neighbourhood,
or across to the Court House. On such occasions,
he is apt to make his appearance in a coat of blue
broadcloth, astonishingly new and glossy, and with a
redundant supply of plaited ruffle strutting through
the folds of a Marseilles waistcoat: a worshipful
finish is given to this costume by a large straw hat,
lined with green silk. There is a magisterial fulness
in his garments that betokens condition in the world,
and a heavy bunch of seals, suspended by a chain of
gold, jingles as he moves, pronouncing him a man of
superfluities.
It is considered rather extraordinary that he has
never set up for Congress: but the truth is, he is an
unambitious man, and has a great dislike to currying
favouras he calls it. And, besides, he is thoroughly
convinced that there will always be men enough in
Virginia willing to serve the people, and therefore
does not see why he should trouble his head about
it. Some years ago, however, there was really an
impression that he meant to come out. By some
sudden whim, he took it into his head to visit
Washington
during the session of Congress, and returned,
after a fortnight, very seriously distempered with
politics
.
He told curious anecdotes of certain secret
intrigues which had been discovered in the affairs of
the capital, gave a pretty clear insight into the views
of some deep laid combinations, and became, all at
once, painfully florid in his discourse, and dogmatical
to a degree that made his wife stare. Fortunately,
this orgasm soon subsided, and Frank relapsed into
an indolent gentleman of the opposition; but it had
the effect to give a much more decided cast to his
studies, for he forthwith discarded the Whig, and
took to the Enquirer, like a man who was not to be
disturbed by doubts; and as it was morally
impossible
to believe what was written on both sides, to
prevent his mind from being abused, he, from this
time forward, gave an implicit assent to all the facts
that set against Mr. Adams. The consequence of
this straight forward and confiding deportment was
an unsolicited and complimentary notice of him by
the executive of the state. He was put into the
commission
of the peace, and having thus become a
public
man against his will, his opinions were observed
to undergo some essential changes. He now thinks
that a good citizen ought neither to solicit nor decline
office; that the magistracy of Virginia is the
sturdiest
pillar that supports the fabric of the
constitution
;
and that the people, though in their opinions
they may be mistaken, in their sentiments they are
never wrong,with some other such dogmas, that, a
few years ago, he did not hold in very good repute.
In this temper, he has of late embarked upon the
mill-pond of county affairs, and, notwithstanding his
amiable and respectful republicanism, I am told he
keeps the peace as if he commanded a garrison,
and administers justice like a cadi.
He has some claim to supremacy in this last
department
;
for during three years of his life he smoked
segars in a lawyer's office at Richmond; sometimes
looked into Blackstone and the Revised Code; was
a member of a debating society that ate oysters once
a week during the winter; and wore six cravats and
a pair of yellow-topped boots as a blood of the
metropolis
.
Having in this way qualified himself for
the pursuits of agriculture, he came to his estate a
very model of landed gentlemen. Since that time
his avocations have had a certain literary tincture;
for having settled himself down as a married man,
and got rid of his superfluous foppery, he rambled
with wonderful assiduity through a wilderness of
romances, poems and dissertations, which are now
collected in his library, and, with their battered blue
covers, present a lively type of an army of
continentals
at the close of the war, or a hospital of veteran
invalids. These have all, at last, given way to the
newspapersa miscellaneous study very enticing to
gentlemen in the countrythat have rendered
Meriwether
a most discomfiting antagonist in the way
of dates and names.
He has great sauvity of manners, and a genuine
benevolence of disposition, that makes him fond of
having his friends about him; and it is particularly
gratifying to him to pick up any genteel stranger
within the purlieus of Swallow Barn, and put him
to the proof of a week's hospitality, if it be only for
the pleasure of exercising his rhetoric upon him.
He is a kind master, and considerate towards his
dependants, for which reason, although he owns
many slaves, they hold him in profound reverence,
and are very happy under his dominion. All these
circumstances
make Swallow Barn a very agreeable
place, and it is accordingly frequented by an
extensive
range of his acquaintances.
There is one quality in Frank that stands above
the rest. He is a thorough-bred Virginian, and
consequently
does not travel much from home, except
to make an excursion to Richmond, which he
considers
3 *
emphatically as the centre of civilization. Now
and then, he has gone beyond the mountain, but the
upper country is not much to his taste, and in his
estimation only to be resorted to when the fever
makes it imprudent to remain upon the tide. He
thinks lightly of the mercantile interest, and in fact
undervalues the manners of the cities generally;
he believes that their inhabitants are all hollow
hearted
and insincere, and altogether wanting in that
substantial
intelligence and honesty that he affirms to be
characteristic of the country. He is a great admirer
of the genius of Virginia, and is frequent in his
commendation
of a toast in which the state is compared
to the mother of the Gracchi:indeed, it is a familiar
thing with him to speak of the aristocracy of talent
as only inferior to that of the landed interest,the
idea of a freeholder inferring to his mind a certain
constitutional pre-eminence in all the virtues of
citizenship
,
as a matter of course.
The solitary elevation of a country gentleman,
well to do in the world, begets some magnificent
notions. He becomes as infallible as the Pope;
gradually acquires a habit of making long speeches;
is apt to be impatient of contradiction, and is always
very touchy on the point of honour. There is
nothing
more conclusive than a rich man's logic any
where, but in the country, amongst his dependants,
it flows with the smooth and unresisted course of a
gentle stream irrigating a verdant meadow, and
depositing
its mud in fertilizing luxuriance.
Meriwether's
sayings, about Swallow Barn, import absolute
veritybut I have discovered that they are not so
current out of his jurisdiction. Indeed, every now
and then, we have some obstinate discussions when
any of the neighbouring potentates, who stand in the
same sphere with Frank, come to the house; for
these worthies have opinions of their own, and
nothing
can be more dogged than the conflict between
them. They sometimes fire away at each other with
a most amiable and unconvinceable hardihood for a
whole evening, bandying interjections, and making
bows, and saying shrewd things with all the courtesy
imaginable: but for unextinguishable pertinacity in
argument, and utter impregnability of belief, there is
no disputant like your country gentleman who reads
the newspapers. When one of these discussions fairly
gets under weigh, it never comes to an anchor again
of its own accordit is either blown out so far to sea
as to be given up for lost, or puts into port in distress
for want of documents,or is upset by a call for
the boot-jack and slipperswhich is something like
the previous question in Congress.
If my worthy cousin be somewhat
over-argumentative
as a politician, he restores the equilibrium of
his character by a considerate coolness in religious
matters. He piques himself upon being a
high-churchman
,
but he is only a rare frequenter of places of
worship, and very seldom permits himself to get into
a dispute upon points of faith. If Mr. Chub, the
Presbyterian tutor in the family, ever succeeds in
drawing him into this field, as he occasionally has
the address to do, Meriwether is sure to fly the
course:he gets puzzled with scripture names, and
makes some odd mistakes between Peter and Paul,
and then generally turns the parson over to his wife,
who, he says, has an astonishing memory.
Meriwether is a great breeder of blooded horses;
and, ever since the celebrated race between Eclipse
and Henry, he has taken to this occupation with a
renewed zeal, as a matter affecting the reputation of
the state. It is delightful to hear him expatiate
upon the value, importance, and patriotic bearing of
this employment, and to listen to all his technical lore
touching the mystery of horse-craft. He has some
fine colts in training, that are committed to the care
of a pragmatical old negro, named Carey, who, in his
reverence for the occupation, is the perfect shadow
of his master. He and Frank hold grave and
momentous
consultations upon the affairs of the stable,
in such a sagacious strain of equal debate, that it
would puzzle a spectator to tell which was the
leading
member in the council. Carey thinks he knows
a great deal more upon the subject than his master,
and their frequent intercourse has begot a familiarity
in the old negro that is almost fatal to Meriwether's
supremacy. The old man feels himself authorized
to maintain his positions according to the freest
parliamentary
form, and sometimes with a violence of
asseveration that compels his master to abandon his
ground, purely out of faint-heartedness.
Meriwether
gets a little nettled by Carey's doggedness, but
generally turns it off in a laugh. I was in the stable
with him, a few mornings after my arrival, when he
ventured to expostulate with the venerable groom
upon a professional point, but the controversy
terminated
in its customary way. Who sot you up,
Master Frank, to tell me how to fodder that 'ere
cretur, when I as good as nursed you on my knee?
Well, tie up your tongue, you old mastiff,
replied
Frank, as he walked out of the stable, and
cease growling, since you will have it your own
way;and then, as we left the old man's presence,
he added, with an affectionate chucklea faithful
old cur, too, that licks my hand out of pure honesty;
he has not many years left, and it does no harm to
humour him!
CHAPTER III.
FAMILY PORTRAITS.
Whilst
Frank Meriwether amuses himself with
his quiddities, and floats through life upon the current
of his humour, his dame, my excellent cousin
Lucretia
,
takes charge of the household affairs, as one who
has a reputation to stake upon her administration.
She has made it a perfect science, and great is her
fame in the dispensation thereof!
They who have visited Swallow Barn will long
remember the morning stir, of which the murmurs
arose even unto the chambers, and fell upon the ears
of the sleepers;the dry-rubbing of floors, and even
the waxing of the same until they were like ice;
and the grinding of coffee mills;and the gibber of
ducks, and chickens, and turkeys; and all the
multitudinous
concert of homely sounds. And then, her
breakfasts! I do not wish to be counted extravagant,
but a small regiment might march in upon her
without
disappointment; and I would put them for
excellence
and variety against any thing that ever was
served upon platter. Moreover, all things go like
clock-work. She rises with the lark, and infuses an
early vigour into the whole household. And yet she
is a thin woman to look upon, and a feeble; with a
sallow complexion, and a pair of animated black
eyes that impart a portion of fire to a countenance
otherwise demure from the paths worn across it, in the
frequent travel of a low country ague. But, although
her life has been somewhat saddened by such
visitations
,
my cousin is too spirited a woman to give up
to them; for she is therapeutical in her constitution,
and considers herself a full match for any
reasonable
tertian in the world. Indeed, I have sometimes
thought that she took more pride in her leech-craft
than becomes a Christian woman: she is even a little
vain-glorious. For, to say nothing of her skill in
compounding simples, she has occasionally brought
down upon her head the sober remonstrances of her
husband, by her pertinacious faith in the efficacy of
certain spells in cases of intermittent. But there is
no reasoning against her experience. She can
enumerate
the casesand men may say what they
choose about its being contrary to reason, and all
that:it is their way! But seeing is believingnine
scoops of water in the hollow of the hand, from the
sycamore spring, for three mornings, before sunrise,
and a cup of strong coffee with lemon juice, will
break an ague, try it when you will. In short, as
Frank says, Lucretia will die in that creed.
I am occasionally up early enough to be witness
to her morning regimen, which, to my mind, is
rather tyrannically enforced against the youngsters
of her numerous family, both white and black. She
is in the habit of preparing some death-routing
decoction
for them, in a small pitcher, and
administering
it to the whole squadron in succession, who
severally
swallow the dose with a most ineffectual
effort at repudiation, and gallop off, with faces all
rue and wormwood.
Every thing at Swallow Barn, that falls within
the superintendence of my cousin Lucretia, is a
pattern
of industry. In fact, I consider her the very
priestess of the American system, for, with her, the
protection of manufactures is even more of a passion
than a principle. Every here and there, over the
estate, may be seen rising in humble guise above the
shrubbery, the rude chimney of a log cabin, where
all the livelong day the plaintive moaning of the
spinning-wheel
rises fitfully upon the breeze, like the
fancied
notes of a hobgoblin, as they are sometimes
imitated in the stories with which we frighten
children
.
In these laboratories the negro women are
employed in preparing yarn for the loom, from which
is produced not only a comfortable supply of winter
clothing for the working people, but some excellent
carpets for the house.
It is refreshing to behold how affectionately vain
our good hostess is of Frank, and what deference she
shows to his judgment in all matters, except those
that belong to the home department;for there she
is, confessedly and without appeal, the paramount
power. It seems to be a dogma with her, that he is
the very first man in Virginia, an expression that
in this region has grown into an emphatic
provincialism
.
Frank, in return, is a devout admirer of
her accomplishments, and although he does not
pretend
to an ear for music, he is in raptures at her
skill on the harpsichord, when she plays at night for
the children to dance; and he sometimes sets her to
singing `The Twins of Latona,' and `Old Towler,'
and `The Rose Tree in Full Bearing' (she does
not study the modern music), for the entertainment
of his company. On these occasions he stands by
the instrument, and nods his head, as if he
comprehended
the airs.
She is a fruitful vessel, and seldom fails in her
annual
tribute to the honours of the family; and, sooth
to say, Frank is reputed to be somewhat restiff
under
these multiplying blessings. They have two
lovely girls, just verging towards womanhood, who
attract a supreme regard in the household, and to
whom Frank is perfectly devoted. Next to these is
a boy,a shrewd, mischievous imp, that curvets
about the house, `a chartered libertine.' He is a
little wiry fellow near thirteen, that is known
altogether
by the nick-name of Rip, and has a
scapegrace
countenance, full of freckles and deviltry: the
eyes are somewhat greenish, and the mouth opens
alarmingly wide upon a tumultuous array of
discoloured
teeth. His whole air is that of an untrimmed
colt, torn down and disorderly; and I most usually
find him with the bosom of his shirt bagged out, so
as to form a great pocket, where he carries apples
or green walnuts, and sometimes pebbles, with which
he is famous for pelting the fowls.
I must digress, to say a word about Rip's
head-gear
.
VOL. I. 4
He wears a non-descript skull-cap, which, I
conjecture from some equivocal signs, had once been
a fur hat, but which must have taken a degree in
fifty
other callings; for I see it daily employed in the
most foreign services. Sometimes it is a
drinking-vessel
,
and then Rip pinches it up like a cocked hat;
sometimes it is devoted to push-pin, and then it is
cuffed cruelly on both sides; and sometimes it is
turned into a basket, to carry eggs from the
henroosts
.
It finds hard service at hat-ball, where, like
a plastic statesman, it is popular for its pliability. It
is tossed in the air on all occasions of rejoicing; and
now and then serves for a gauntletand is flung with
energy upon the ground, on the eve of a battle: And
it is kicked occasionally through the school yard,
after
the fashion of a bladder. It wears a singular
exterior
,
having a row of holes cut below the crown,
or rather the apex, (for it is pyramidal in shape,) to
make it cool, as Rip explains it, in hot weather. The
only rest that it enjoys through the day, as far as I
have been able to perceive, is during school hours,
and then it is thrust between a desk and a bulk-head,
three inches apart, where it generally envelopes in its
folds a handful of hickory-nuts or marbles. This
covering falls downfor it has no lininglike an
extinguisher
over Rip's head, which is uncommonly
small and round, and garnished with a tangled mop
of hair. To prevent the frequent recurrence of this
accident, Rip has pursed it up with a hat-band of
twine.
From Rip the rest of the progeny descend on the
scale, in regular gradations, like the keys of a
Pandean
pipe, and with the same variety of intonations,
until the series is terminated in a chubby,
dough-faced
infant, not above three months old.
This little infantry is under the care of mistress
Barbara Winkle, an antique retainer of the family,
who attends them at bed and board,and every
morning takes the whole bevy, one by one, and
plunges them into a large tub of cold water; after
which, they are laid out on the floor to dry, like
young frogs on the margin of a pool; and then she
dresses and combs them with a scrupulous rigour,
they making, all the while, terribly wry faces. The
faithful dame, as she turns them on her knee, sings
some approved lullabies in a querulous tone of voice,
accompanied by a soothing recitative, which, I have
occasionally observed, is apt to be chanted in rather
an angry and shrill key.
This mistress Barbara is a functionary of high
rank in the family, and of great privileges, from
having
exercised her office through a preceding
generation
at Swallow Barn. She is particularly important
when there are any festive preparations on foot; and
there is then evidently an enhancement of her
official
gravity. She glides up and down stairs with
surprising alacrity, amidst an exceeding din of keys;
and may be found one moment whipping cream, and
another, whipping some unlucky scullion boy;
clattering
eggs in a bowl, scolding servants, and
screaming
at Rip, who is perpetually in her way, amongst
the sweetmeats: All of which matters, though
enacted
with a vinegar aspect, it is easy to see are
very agreeable to her self-love.
She is truly what may be termed a bustling old
lady, and has a most despotic rule over all the
subordinates
of the family. There is no reverence like
that of children for potentates of this description. Her
very glance has in it something disconcerting to the
young fry; and they will twist their dumpling faces
into every conceivable expression of grief, before they
will dare to squall out in her presence. Even Rip is
afraid of her. When the old woman's mad, she is
a horse to whip! he told Ned and myself one
morning
,
upon our questioning him as to the particulars of
an uproar in which he had been the principal actor.
These exercises on the part of the old lady are
neither
rare nor unwholesome, and are winked at by
the higher authorities.
Mrs. Winkle's complexion is the true
parchment
,
and her voice is somewhat cracked. She
takes Scotch snuff from a silver box, and wears
a pair of horn spectacles, which give effect to
the peculiar peakedness of her nose. On days
of state she appears in all the rich coxcombry
of the olden time; her gown being of an
obsolete
fashion, sprinkled with roses and sun-flowers,
and her lizard arms encased in tight sleeves as
far as the elbow, where they are met by silken
gloves without fingers. A starched tucker is
pinned
,
with a pedantic precision, across her breast;
and a prim cap of muslin, puckered into a point
with a grotesque conceit, adorns her head.
Take her altogether, she looks very stately and
bitter. Then, when she walks, it is
inconceivable
how aristocratically she rustles,especially on
a Sunday.
4*
CHAPTER IV.
FAMILY PARAGONS.
My
picture of the family would be incomplete if
I did not give a conspicuous place to my two young
cousins Lucy and Victorine. It is true, they are
cousins only in the second remove, but I have
become
sufficiently naturalized to this soil to perceive
the full value of the relation; and as they
acknowledge
it very affectionately to mefor I was
promoted
to cousin Mark almost in the first hour after
my arrival,I should be unreasonably reluctant not
to assert the full right of blood. Lucy tells me she
is
only
fifteen, and is careful to add that she is one
year and one month older than Vic, for all that
Vic is taller than she. Now Lucy is a little fairy
in shape, with blue eyes and light hair, and partially
freckled and sunburnt,being a very pretty likeness
of Rip, who I have said is an imp of homeliness,a
fact which all experience shows is quite consistent
with the highest beauty. Victorine is almost a head
taller, and possesses a stronger frame. She differs,
too, from her sister by her jet black eyes and dark
hair;though they resemble each other in the
wholesome tan which exposure to the atmosphere
has spread alike over the cheeks of both.
These two girls have been educated at home, and
have grown up together with an almost inseparable
instinct. Their parents, according to the common
notions of such indulgences, have done every thing
to spoil them, but, as yet, completely without effect.
I cannot, however, help thinking, that it is a popular
errour to believe that freedom is not fully compatible
with the finest nurture of the affections. A kindly
nature will most generally expand in the direction
of the charities, and its currents will flow in a
channel
of virtue unless solicited out of their track by evil
enticements. Though the vigilance which is
necessary
to separate the young mind from what is likely
to deceive it, does necessarily contract the theatre
upon which the propensities of the pupil are allowed
to range, it is not in any degree restrictive of her
freedom whilst she is ignorant that there is any thing
forbidden. The opportunity which is afforded by a
country life of maintaining this unconscious restraint,
constitutes its principal preference over the city, in
the education of a young female. There is nothing
more lovely to my imagination than the picture of
an artless girl, tranquilly gliding onwards to
womanhood
in the seclusion of the parent bower;
invigorated
in the affections by the ceaseless caresses of her
nearest kindred, and her taste receiving its daily hue
from the fresh and exquisite colours of nature, as she
sees them in the grove and fountain and varying skies,
remote from the tawdry artifices of a compact and
crowded society: Her first lessons of love imbued
from the lips of a mother; her only lore taught her
at that fire-side which has been from infancy her
citadel of happiness; her emotions allowed to pursue
their unchecked wanderings through all
her
world,
bounded, as she believes it to be, by the objects with
which she has always been familiar; and her
rambles
limited to her ancient neighbourhood, like
the flights of a dove in its native valley.
Lucy and Victorine present a beautiful archetype
of this picture. Meriwether has the tenderest
fondness
for them; and my cousin Lucretia has
cherished
in them that kind of intimacy with their parents
that has more of the intercourse of equals than the
subordination of children. Towards each other
these two girls manifest a gentleness that is the
perfection
of harmony;
Where e'er they went, like Juno's swans,
Still they went coupled and inseparable.
Their tempers, nevertheless, are somewhat in
contrast
.
Lucy is rather meditative for her age,calm
and almost matronly. Thought seems to repose like
sleep upon her countenance, except when it is
warmed by the lively play of feelings that flicker
across it, like breezes upon the surface of a lake.
She is attached to books, and, following the instinct
of her peculiar temperament, her mind has early
wandered through the mysterious marvels of fiction,
which have impressed a certain trace of superstition
upon her infant character. Victorine is more
intrepid
than her elder sister, and attracts a universal
regard, by that buoyant jollity of disposition which,
in a young girl, is the index both of innocence and
affection
.
They both, however, pursue the same
studies
;and
I often see them sitting together at their
common tasks, poring upon the same book, with their
arms around each other's waists. Almost every
eveningand often without any any others of the
familythey walk out for exercise along the
by-paths
upon the river bank. In these excursions they
are attended by two large white pointers, that
gambol
around them in all manner of fantastic play,
soliciting the applause of their pretty mistresses by
the gallant assiduities that belong to the race of these
noble animals.
Meriwether is accustomed to have the girls read
to him some portion of every day, and by this
requisition
,
which he puts upon the ground of a personal
favour, has beguiled them into graver studies than
are generally appropriated to the sex. It is
delightful
to observe what an unwearying devotion they
bestow
upon a labour which they think gives pleasure
to the father. He, of course, looks upon them as
the most gifted creatures in existence; and, truly, I
am almost a convert to his opinion!
A window in the upper story of one of the wings
of the building, overlooks a flower garden; and
around this window grows a profusion of creeping
vine, which is trained to diffuse itself with an
architectural
precision along the wall towards the roof;
and it is evident that the disciplined plant dares not
throw out a leaf or a tendril awry. It is a prim,
pedantic
,
virgin plant, with icy leaves of perdurable
green without a flower to give variety to its trimmed
complexion, except where here and there the
parasite
rose has surreptitiously stolen in amongst its
plexures, and peeps forth from beneath its sober
tapestry
.
In this window, about noon-tide, may be
daily seen, just visible from within the chamber, the
profuse tresses of a head of sandy hair, scrupulously
adjusted in glossy volume; and ever and anon, as it
moves to some slow impulse, is disclosed a studious
brow of fairest white. And sometimes, more fully
revealed, may be seen the entire head of a `lady
bright,' as she seems intent upon a book. The lady
Prudence sits in her bower, and thoughtfully pursues
some theme of romance in the delicious realm of
poesy,or, with pencil and brush, shapes and gilds
the gaudy wings of her painted butterflies, or,
peradventure
,
enricheth her album with dainty sonnets.
And sometimes, in listless musing, she rests her chin
upon her gem-bedizened hand, and fixes her soft
blue eye upon the flower beds, where the humming
bird is poised before the honeysuckle, or the finical
wren prates lovingly to his dame. But, howsoever
engaged, it is a dedicated hour, and `the ladie' is in
her secret bower. I have said profanely, once
before
,
that `a tall spinster' sat at the family board
and now, here she sits in her morning guise, silent
and alone, pondering over uncreated things, and
turning up her imaginative eye to the cerulean
deeps.
Prudence is the only sister of Frank Meriwether,
and, like most only sisters, holds a sort of consecrated
place amongst the household idols. But time, which
notches his eras upon mortal forms, with as little
mercy as if they were mere sticks, has calendared the
stages of his journey in some delicate touches, even
upon this goodly page, and has published the fact,
that Prudence Meriwether has now arrived at that
isthmus of life, in which her pretensions to count with
old or young are equally doubtful. It is settled,
however
,
she has reached all the discretion she will ever
possess. What boots it that she is arrayed in an
urgent vivacity of manner, and an air of thoughtless
joy? Is it not manifestly overdone? and are there
not, as plain as the veteran of the scythe could draw
them, certain sober lines, creeping from the mouth
cheek-ward, that betoken sedate rumination? and
will not every astute, good-humoured bachelor see
that she has come to that mellow time, when a
woman
is especially captivating to him, because she is
more complaisant, and bears her virtues more
meekly
?
For myself, I speak experimentally in behalf of
the brotherhood, and declare it is even so.
The lady in question has undoubtedly thought
very gravely over the important concerns that belong
to her estate, and is fast coming to the conclusion,
that her destiny hereafter is likely to be exercised in
the cares of a single and unlorded dowry. She has
given several indications of this. I find that of late
she talks peremptorily of her decided preference for
the maiden state, and has taken up some newfangled
notions of the unworthiness of the male sex. She
hints, now and then, at some cast-off flirtations of
hers, in which she had the credit, a few years ago,
of disconcerting some spruce gallants of the country.
But all this I consider a mere feint, like that of a
politic commander, who, having made a disastrous
campaign, puts his reputation in repair by the fame
of his early conquests.
There are other fearful prognostics of this temper
dawning upon her manners. She has grown
inveterately
charitable, and addicts herself to matters
that, but a short time ago, were clean out of sight.
Her views have gradually become more
comprehensive
;
and her pursuits have something of the
diffusiveness
of a public functionary. For example, she
is known to be the principal founder of three Sunday
Schools in the neighbourhood; is supposed to have
pensioned out several poor families; besides being a
stirring advocate of the scheme for colonizing the
negroes, and a patroness of sundry Tract Societies;
to say nothing of even a supererogatory zeal for the
suppression of intemperance in the lower sections of
Virginia. These acts cause her to be regarded as a
very model of piety; and I have heard it
whispered
,
that the flattery she has received from divers
young ministers on this score, has actually set her to
writing a book in imitation of mistress Hannah More,
which, however, I set down for pure scandal.
One thing is certain,Prudence is more romantic
than she used to be;for about sun-set, she often
wanders forth alone, to a sequestered part of the
grove, and stalks with a stately and philosophic pace
amongst the old oaks, unbonneted, in a rapturous
contemplation of the radiant tints of evening; and
then, in her boudoir may be found exquisite sketches
from her pencil, of forms of love and beautygallant
knights, and old castles, and pensive ladies,
madonnas
and cloistered nuns,the teeming offspring of
an imagination heated with romance and devotion.
Her attire is sometimes plain, and even negligent, to
a studied degree;but this does not last long; for
Prudence, in spite of her discipline, does not
under-rate
her personal advantages, and it is not unusual
for her to break out almost into a riotous vivacity,
especially when she is brought into communion with
a flaunting, mad-cap belle, that is carrying all before
her:She then, like `a pelting river,' overbears
`her continents,' and, in the matter of dress and
manners, becomes almost as flaunting a mad-cap as
the other.
Her person is very good, although I think it
unnecessarily
erect; and a hypercritical observer might
say her air was rather formal; but that would
depend
very much upon the time when he saw her;
for if it should happen to be just before dinner, in the
drawing-room, he would be ready to acknowledge that
she only wanted a pastoral crook, to make an
Arcadian
of her.
If Prudence has a fault, it is in setting down the
domestic virtues at too high a value;by which
virtues
I mean those undisturbed humours that quiet
VOL. I. 5
life inspires, and which are mistaken for personal
properties,the sleep of the passions, and not the
subjugation of them, which the good people of the
country are fond of praising, as much as if it were a
matter they could help. This point of character is
manifested by our lady in a habitual exaggeration
of the benefits of solitude and self constraint, and
has rendered her, to an undue degree, merciless
towards
the pretensions of those whose misfortune it is
to live in a busier sphere than herself. To my mind,
she is too rigid in her requisitions upon society. This,
however, is a very slight blemish, and amply
compensated
by the many pleasant variations in her
composition. She talks with great ease upon every
subject; and is even, now and then, a little too
high-flown
in her diction. Her manner, at times, might
be called oratorical, more particularly when she
bewails the departure of the golden age, or declaims
upon the prospect of its revival amongst the
rejuvenescent
glories of the Old Dominion. She has awful
ideas of personal decorum and the splendour of her
lineage, but these are almost the only points upon
which I know her to be touchy. Apart from such
defects, which appear upon her character like fleecy
clouds upon a summer sky, or mites upon a
snowdrift
,
she is a captivating specimen of a ripened lady
just standing on that sunshiny verge from which the
prospect below presents a sedate, autumnal
landscape
,
gently subsiding into a distant,
undistinguishable
and misty confusion of tree and field, arrayed in
sober brown. It is no wonder, therefore, that with
her varied perfections and the advantages of her
position
,
the worldby which I mean that scattered
population which inhabits the banks of the James
River, extending inland some ten miles on either
sideshould, by degrees, and almost insensibly,
have propagated the opinion that Prudence
Meriwether
is a prodigy.
CHAPTER V.
NED HAZARD.
Ned Hazard
has of late become my inseparable
companion. He has a fine, flowing stream of good
spirits, which is sometimes interrupted by a slight
under-current
of sadness; it is even a ludicrous
pensiveness
,
that derives its comic quality from Ned's
constitutional
merriment.
He is now about thirty-three, with a tolerably good
person, a little under six feet, and may be seen
generally
after breakfast, whilst old Carey is getting
our horses for a morning ride, in an olive frock, black
stock and yellow waistcoat, with a German
forage-cap
of light cloth, having a frontlet of polished leather,
rather conceitedly drawn over his dark, laughing
eye. This head-gear gives a picturesque effect to
his person, and suits well with his weather-beaten
cheek, as it communicates a certain reckless
expression
that agrees with his character. The same trait
is heightened by the half swagger with which he
strikes his boot with his riding-whip, or keeps at bay
a beautiful spaniel, called Wilful, that haunts his
person like a familiar. Indeed, I have grown to
possess something of this canine attachment to him
myself, and already constitute a very important
member
of his suite. It is a picture worth contemplating,
to see us during one of these listless intervals. For,
first, there is Ned lounging along the court-yard with
both hands in his side pockets, and either telling me
some story, or vexing a great turkey-cock, by
imitating
both his gobble and his strut;before him
walks Wilful, strictly regulating his pace by his
master's
,
and turning his eye, every now and then, most
affectionately towards him; then Meriwether's two
pointers may be seen bounding in circles round him;
a little terrier, that assumes the consequence of a
watch dog, is sure to solicit Ned's notice by
jumping
at his hand; and, last in the train, is myself, who
have learned to saunter in Ned's track with the
fidelity
of a shadow. It may be conjectured from this
picture that Ned possesses fascinations for man and
beast.
He is known universally by the name of Ned
Hazard, which, of itself, I take to be a good sign.
This nicknaming has a flavour of favouritism, and
betokens an amiable notoriety. There is something
jocular in Ned's face, that I believe is the source of
his popularity with all classes; but this general good
acceptation is preserved by the variety of his
acquirements
.
He can accommodate himself to all
kinds of society. He has slang for the stable boys,
musty proverbs for the old folks, and a most
oratorical
overflow of patriotism for the politicians. To
the children of Swallow Barn he is especially
captivating
.
He tells them stories with the
embellishment
of a deep tone of voice that makes them quake
5 *
in their shoes; and with the assistance of a cane and
cloak, surmounted by a hat, he will stalk amongst
them, like a grizzly giant, so hideously erect, that the
door is a mere pigeon-hole to him;at which the
young cowards laugh so fearfully, that I have often
thought they were crying. On such occasions I have
seen them nestle up together in one corner, looking
like a group of white and black cherubim, and
evidently
regarding Ned as the most astonishing
personage
in the whole country side.
A few years ago he was seized with a romantic
fever that principally manifested itself in a conceit to
visit South America, and play knight errant in the
quarrel of the Patriots. It was the most sudden and
unaccountable thing in the world; for no one could
trace the infection to any probable cause;still, it
grew upon Ned's fancy, and appeared in so many
brilliant phases, that there was no getting it out of
his brain. As may be imagined, this matter
produced
a serious disquiet in the family, so that Frank
Meriwether was obliged to take the subject in hand;
and, finding all his premonitions and expostulations
unavailing, was forced to give way to the current of
Ned's humour, hoping that experience would purge
the sight that had been dimmed by the light of a too
vivid imagination. It was therefore arranged that
Ned should visit this theatre of glory, and stand by
the award of his own judgment upon the view. He
accordingly sailed from New York in the Paragon,
bound for Lima, with liberty to touch and trade along
the coast, and, in due time, doubled Cape Horn.
So, after looking at the Patriots in all their positions,
attitudes and relations,with an eye military and
civil,and being well bitten with fleas, and
apprehended
as a spy, and nearly assassinated as a
heretic
,
he carefully looked back upon the whole train of
this fancy, even from its first engendering, with all
the motives, false conclusions, misrepresentations,
and so forth, which had a hand in the adopting and
pursuing of it, and then came to a sober conclusion
that he was the most egregious fool that ever set out
in quest of a wild goose. What the devil could
have put such a thing into my head, and kept me at
it for a whole year, it puzzles me to tell! was his
own comment upon this freak, when I questioned him
about it. However, he came home the most
disquixotted
cavalier that ever hung up his shield at the
end of a scurvy crusade; and to make amends for the
inconvenience and alarm he had occasioned,for my
cousin Lucretia expected to hear of his being
strangled
,
like Laocoon, in the folds of a serpent,he
brought with him an amusing journal, which is now
bound in calf, and holds a conspicuous place in the
library at Swallow Barn. This trip into the other
hemisphere has furnished him with an assortment
of wonders, both of the sea and the land, that are the
theme of divers long stories, which ned tells like a
traveller. He is accused of repeating them to the
same auditors, and Frank Meriwether has a
provoking
way of raising his hands, and turning his eyes
towards the ceiling, and saying in an under-tone,
just as Ned is setting out:
A traveller there was who told a good tale;
By my troth! it was true, but then it was stale.
This invariably flushes Ned's face; and with a
modest expostulation, in a voice of great kindness, he
will say, My dear sir, I assure you I never told you
this beforeyou are thinking of a different thing.
Then, Uncle Nedas Rip said, on one of these
occasions, while he was lying on the floor and kicking
up his heelsyou are going to make as you go.
These things are apt to disconcert him, and
occasion
a little out-break of a momentary peevish, but
irresistibly comic thoughtfulness, that I have said
before
formed a constituent of his temper. It is,
however
,
but for a moment, and he takes the joke like
a hero. It is now customary in the family, when
any thing of a marvellous nature is mentioned, to say
that it happened round the Horn. Ned is evidently
shy of these assaults, and is rather cautious how he
names the Horn if Meriwether be in company.
I have gleaned some particulars of Hazard's
education
,
which, as they serve to illustrate his
character
,
I think worth relating.
When he was ten or eleven years old, he was put
under the government of a respectable teacher, who
kept an academy on the border of the mountain
country, where he spent several years of his life. In
this rustic gymnasium, under the supervision of Mr.
Crab, who was the principal of the establishment,
Ned soon became conspicuous for his hardiness and
address in the wayward adventures and miniature
wars that diversified the history of this little
community
.
He was always an apt scholar, though not the
most assiduous; but his frank and upright qualities
rendered him equally a favourite with the master
and the pupils. He speaks of the attachments of this
period of his life with the unction of unabated
fondness
.
In one of our late rambles, Ned gave me the
following sketch of the circumstances under which
he quitted these scenes of his youth. His father was
about removing him to college, and the separation
was to be final. I have endeavoured to preserve his
own narrative, because I think it more graphic than
mine would be; and at the same time it will show
the gentle strain of affection that belongs to his
nature.
The condition of a schoolboy, said Ned, forces
upon the mind the import of a state of probation,
more soberly than any other position in life. All
that the scripture tells us about the transitoriness
of human affairs,of man being a traveller, and life
a shadow,is constitutionally part and parcel of the
meditations of the schoolboy. He lives amidst
discomforts
;
his room is small and ill-furnished; his
clothes are hung upon a peg, or stowed away in a
chest, where every thing that should be at the top,
is sure to lodge at the bottom; his coat carries its
rent from term to term, and his stockings are
returned
to him undarned from the washer-woman; his
food is rough and unsavoury; he shivers in a winter
morning over a scant and smoky fire; he sleeps in
summer in the hottest room of the house:All this
he submits to with patience, because he feels that he
is but for a season, and that a reversion of better
things awaits him.
My preceptor Mr. Crab was, outwardly, an
austere
man; but his was the austerity which the best
natures are apt to contract from long association with
pupils. His intercourse with the boys was one of
command, and he had but few opportunities of
mingling
in the society of his equals. This gave a rather
severe reserve to his manners; but, at bottom, he had
kindly feelings, which awkwardly manifested
themselves
in frequent favours, conferred without any
visible
signs of courtesy. His wife was a fat,
short-winded
old lady, with a large round face,
embellished
above with a huge ruffled cap, and below, with
a huge double chin. This good lady was rather
too fat to move about, so she maintained a sovereign
station in an ample arm-chair, placed near the door
that led to the kitchen, where she was usually
occupied
in paring apples to be baked up into tough jacks
for our provender, and issuing commands for the
regulation
of her domestic police, in shrill, stirring and
authoritative tones. They had a reasonable number
of young scions growing around them, who,
however
,
were so mingled in the mass of the school as
nearly to have lost all the discriminating instincts that
might indicate their origin.
We were too troublesome a company to
enlist
much of the domestic charities from our tutor;
still, however, in the few gleams of family
endearment
which fell to our lot, I had contracted a kind
of household attachment to the objects that
surrounded
me. Our old master had the grave and solemn
bearing of a philosopher; but sometimes, of winter
nights, when our tasks were done, he joined in our
sports,even got down on the carpet to play marbles
with us, and took quite an eager interest in hearing
our humming tops when we stealthily set them to
bellowing in the room. These condescensions had
a wonderful effect upon us all, for, being rare, they
took us somewhat by surprise, and gave us
something
of the same kind of pleasure which a child
experiences
in patting a gentle and manageable lion.
I had always looked forward, with a boyish love
of change, to the period when I was to be called to
other scenes. And this expectation, whilst it
rendered
me indifferent to personal comforts, seemed also
to warm my feelings towards my associates. I could
pardon many trespasses in those from whom I was
soon to be separated. My time, therefore, passed
along in a careless merriment, in which all trivial
ills were overborne and indemnified in the
anticipations
of the future.
The summons to quit this little sylvan theatre
was contained in a letter that was brought from my
father by Daniel the coachman. It directed me to
return without delay, and intimated, amidst a world
of parental advice, that I was to be removed almost
immediately to college. Notwithstanding the many
secret yearnings I had felt for the approach of this
period, I confess it overmastered me when it came.
Daniel had brought me my pony,a little,
short-necked
,
piggish animal, that in the holidays I used to
ride almost to bedand he himself was ready to
attend
me on one of the coach horses. I had no time
to revolve the matter,so with a spirit part gay and
part melancholy, and with an alacrity of step that I
assumed to conceal my emotions and to avoid the
interchange with my school-fellows of words that I
was too much choked to utter, I went about my
preparations
.
I collected my straggling wardrobe from
the detached service of my comrades, to whom, scant
as it was, I had lent it piece-meal; carefully paid off
sundry small debts of honour, contracted at the
forbidden
game of all fours; and distributed largesses,
with a prodigal hand, amongst the negroes, with
whom I had, for a long time, carried on an active
commerce in partridge-traps, fishing tackle, and other
commodities. I can remember now with what
feelings
I performed this last office, as I stood at the barn
door, where the farm servants were threshing grain,
and protracted, as long as I was able, that mournful
shaking of hands with which the rogues gave me their
parting benedictions;for I always had a vagabond
fondness for the blacks about the establishment.
After this I went into the parlour, where our tender
and plethoric mistress was employed in one of her
customary morning duties of cleaning up the
breakfast
apparatus, and received a kiss from her, as she
held a napkin in one hand, and a tea-cup in the other.
I bestowed the same token of grace upon all the
little
Crabs that were crawling about the room, and, in
the same place, took my leave of the old monarch
himself, who, relaxing into a grim manifestation of
unfeigned sorrow, took me with both hands, and
conducting
me to the window, placed himself in a seat,
where he gave me a grave and friendly admonition,
saying many kind things to me, in a kinder tone than
I had ever heard from him before. Amongst the
rest, he bade me reflect, that the world was wide, and
had many fountains of bitter waters, whereofas I
was an easy, good-natured fellowit was likely to
be my lot to drink more largely than others;he
begged me to remember the many wholesome
lessons
he had given me, and to forget whatever might
seem to me harsh in his own conduct. Then, in the
old-fashioned way, he put his hands upon my head,
and bestowed upon me an earnest and devout
blessing
,
whilst the tears started in both of our eyes. This
last act he concluded by taking from his pocket a
small copy of the Bible, which he put into my hands
with a solemn exhortation that I should consult it in
all my troubles, for every one of which, he told me, I
should find appropriate consolation. I promised, as
well as my smothered articulation permitted, to obey
his instructions to the letter; and, from the feelings
of that moment, deemed it impossible I ever could
have forgotten or neglected them. I fear that I have
not thought of them as much since, as they deserve.
The little Bible I still keep as an affectionate
remembrance
of a very good, though somewhat
unpolished
,
old man.
My cronies, all this time, had been following me
from place to place,watching me as I packed up
every article of my baggage, and asking me hundreds
VOL. I. 6
of unmeaning questions, out of the very fulness of
their hearts. Their time came next. We had a
general embrace; and after shaking hands with every
urchin of the school-room and every imp of the
kitchen
,
I mounted my plump nag, and on one of those
rich mornings of the Indian summer, when the sun
struggles through a soft mist, and sparkles on the hoar
frost, I broke ground on my homeward voyage.
Daniel, with my black leather trunk resting on his
pommelto be carried to the tavern where the mail
stage was to receive itled the way through the lane
that conducted us beyond the precincts of this abode
of learning and frolick, and I followed, looking back
faint-heartedly upon the affectionate and envious rank
and file of the school-room, who were collected in
one silent and wistful group at the door, with their
hard-visaged commander towering above their heads,
and shading his brow from the sun with his hand, as
he watched our slow progress. Every other face,
white or black, upon the premises, was peering
above the paling that enclosed the yard, or gleaming
through the windows of the kitchen. Not a dry eye
was there amongst us; and I could hear my old
master say to the boys, there goes an honest chap,
full of gallantry and good will. In truth, this
parting
touched me to the heart, and I could not help
giving way to my feelings, and sobbing aloud;
until
at last, reaching a turn in the road that concealed
us from the house, the sound of a distant cheering
from the crowd we had left, arose upon the air, and
wafted to me the good wishes of some of the best
friends I have ever parted from.
After the period referred to in this narrative, Ned
was sent to Princeton. That college was then in
the height of its popularity, and was the great resort
of the southern students. Here he ran the usual
wild and unprofitable career of college life. His
father
was lavish, and Ned was companionable,two
relative virtues that, in such circumstances, are apt to
produce a luxuriant fruit. He was famous in the
classical coteries at Mother Priestly's, where they
ate buckwheat cakes, and discussed the state of
parties
,
and where, having more blood than argument,
they made furious bets on controverted questions, and
drank juleps to keep up the opposition.
Amidst the distractions of that period there was one
concern in which Ned became distinguished. They
were never without a supply of goddesses in the
village
,
to whom the students devoted themselves in the
spirit of chivalry. They fell into despair by classes;
and as it was impracticable to allot the divinities
singly, these were allowed each some six or seven
worshippers from the college ranks, who revolved
around them, like a system of roystering planets,
bullying
each other out of their orbits, and cutting all
manner of capers in their pale light. But love, in those
days, was not that tame, docile, obedient minion that
it is now. It was a matter of bluster and bravado,
to swear round oaths for, and to be pledged in cups
at Gifford's. They danced with the beauties at all
the merry-makings, and, in fact, metamorphosed
Cupid
into a bluff Hector, and dragged him by the heels
around every tavern of the village.
As the mistresses were appurtenant to the class,
they were changed at the terms, and given over to
the successors; whereby it generally fell out, that
what advantage the damsels gained in the number of
their admirers, was more than balanced by the
disadvantage
of age. But a collegian's arithmetic makes
no difference between seventeen and thirty. Nay,
indeed, some of the most desperate love affairs
happened
between the sophomores and one or two
perdurable
belles, who had been besonneted through the
college for ten years before.
It was Ned's fortune to drop into one of these
pitfalls
,
and he was only saved from an actual
elopement
by a rare accident which seemed to have been
sent on purpose by his good genius; for, on the very
evening when this catastrophe was to have been
brought about, he fell into a revel, and then into a
row, and then into a deep sleep, from which he awoke
the next morning, shockingly mortified to find that
he had not only forgotten his appointment, but also
his character as a man of sober deportment. The
lady's pride took alarm at the occurrence, and Ned
very solemnly took to mathematics.
Now and then, the affairs of this bustling little
community were embellished with a single combat,
which was always regarded as a highly interesting
incident; and the abstruse questions of the duello
were canvassed in councils held at midnight, in
which, I learn, the chivalrous lore displayed by Ned
Hazard was a matter of college renown.
Engrossed thus, like the states of the dark ages, in
the cares of love, war and politics, it is not to be
wondered at, that the arts and sciences should have
fallen into some disesteem. This period of Ned's
life, indeed, resembled those feudal times, when
barons
fought for lady love,swaggered, and swore by
their saints,and frightened learning into the nests
of the monks. Still, however, there was a generous
love of fame lurking in his constitution, which,
notwithstanding
all the enticements that waylaid his
success, showed itself in occasional fits of close and
useful study.
It pains me to say, that Hazard's days of academic
glory were untimely cropped; but my veracity as a
chronicler compels me to avow, even to the
disparagement
of my friend, that before his course had run
to its destined end, he made shipwreck of his fortunes,
and received from the faculty a passport that
warranted
an unquestioned egress from Nassau Hall;
the same being conferred in consideration of
counsel
afforded, as a friend true and trusty, to a worthy
cavalier, who had answered the defiance of a
gentleman
of honour, to a joust at utterance.
Thus shorn of his college laurels, Ned crept
quietly
back to Swallow Barn, where his inglorious return
astounded the soothsayers of the neighbourhood.
For awhile he took to study like a Pundit,though
I have heard that it did not last long,and in the
lonely pursuits of this period he engendered that
secret
6 *
love of adventure and picturesque incident, that
took him upon his celebrated expedition round the
Horn. But it in no degree conquered his mirthful
temper. His mind is still a fairy land, inhabited by
pleasant and conceited images, winged charmers,
laughing phantoms, and mellow spectres of frolick.
He is regarded in the family as the next heir to
Swallow Barn; but the marriage of his sister, and,
soon afterwards, the demise of his father, disclosed
the encumbered condition of the freehold, to which
he had before been a stranger. He has still,
however
,
a comfortable patrimony; and Frank
Meriwether
having by arrangement taken possession of
the inheritance, together with the family, Ned has
ample liberty to pursue his own whims in regard to
his future occupation in life. Frank holds the estate,
for the present, under an honourable pledge to relieve
it of its burdens by a gradual course of thrifty
husbandry
,
which he seems to be in a fair way of
accomplishing
;
so that Ned may be said still to have
a profitable reversion in the domain. But he has
grown, in some degree, necessary to Meriwether,
and has therefore, of late, fixed his residence almost
entirely at Swallow Barn.
CHAPTER VI.
PURSUITS OF A PHILOSOPHER.
From
the house at Swallow Barn, there is to be
seen, at no great distance, a clump of trees, and in
the midst of these an humble building is discernible,
that seems to court the shade in which it is modestly
embowered. It is an old structure built of logs. Its
figure is a cube, with a roof rising from all sides to a
point, and surmounted by a wooden weathercock
which somewhat resembles a fish, and somewhat a
fowl.
This little edifice is a rustic shrine devoted to
Cadmus
,
and here the sacred rites of the alphabet are
daily solemnized by some dozen knotty-pated and
freckled votaries not above three feet high, both in
trowsers and petticoats. This is one of the many
temples that stud the surface of our republican
empire
,
where liberty receives her purest worship, and
where, though in humble and lowly guise, she
secretly
breathes her strength into the heart and sinews of
the nation. Here the germ is planted that fructifies
through generations, and produces its hundredfold.
At this altar the spark is kindled that propagates its
fire from breast to breast, like the vast conflagrations
that light up and purify the prairie of the west.
The school-house has been an appendage to
Swallow
Barn ever since the infancy of the last
generation
.
Frank Meriwether has, in his time, extended
its usefulness by opening it to the accommodation of
his neighbours; so that it is now a theatre whereon
a bevy of pigmy players are wont to enact the
seriocomic
interludes that belong to the first process of
indoctrination. A troop of these little sprites are seen,
every morning, wending their way across the fields,
armed with tin kettles, in which are deposited their
leather-coated apple-pies or other store for the day,
and which same kettles are generally used, at the
decline of the day, as drums or cymbals, to signalize
their homeward march, or as receptacles of the spoil
pilfered from black-berry bushes, against which these
bare-footed Scythians are prone to carry on a
predatory
war.
Throughout the day a continual buzz is heard
from this quarter, even to the porch of the
mansion-house
.
Hazard and myself occasionally make them
a visit, and it is amusing to observe how, as we
approach
,
the murmur becomes more distinct, until,
reaching the door, we find the whole swarm running
over their long, tough syllables, in a high concert
pitch, with their elbows upon the desks, their hands
covering their ears, and their naked heels beating
time against the benchesas if every urchin believed
that a polysyllable was a piece of music invented
to torment all ears but his own. And, high above
this din, the master's note is sounded in a lordly key,
like the occasional touch of the horn in an orchestra.
This little empire is under the dominion of parson
Chub. He is a plump, rosy old gentleman, rather
short and thick set, with the blood-vessels
meandering
over his face like rivulets,a pair of prominent
blue eyes, and a head of silky hair, not unlike the
covering of a white spaniel. He may be said to be
a man of jolly dimensions, with an evident taste for
good living; somewhat sloven in his attire, for his
coat,which is not of the newest,is decorated
with sundry spots that are scattered over it in
constellations
.
Besides this, he wears an immense
cravat, which, as it is wreathed around his short
neck, forms a bowl beneath his chin, and,as Ned
says,gives the parson's head the appearance of that
of John the Baptist upon a charger, as it is
sometimes
represented in the children's picture books.
His beard is grizzled with silver stubble, which the
parson reaps about twice a week,if the weather be
fair.
Mr. Chub is a philosopher after the order of
Socrates
.
He was an emigrant from the Emerald Isle,
where he suffered much tribulation in the
disturbances
,
as they are mildly called, of his
much-enduring
country. But the old gentleman has weathered
the storm without losing a jot of that broad, healthy
benevolence with which nature has enveloped his
heart, and whose ensign she has hoisted in his face.
The early part of his life had been easy and
prosperous
,
until the rebellion of 1798 stimulated his
republicanism
into a fever, and drove the full-blooded
hero headlong into the quarrel, and put him, in spite
of his peaceful profession, to standing by his pike in
behalf of his principles. By this unhappy boiling
over of the caldron of his valour he fell under the
ban of the ministers, and tasted his share of
government
mercy. His house was burnt over his head,
his horses and hounds (for, by all accounts, he was
a perfect Acteon) were confiscate to the state, and
he was forced to fly. This brought him to America
in no very compromising mood with royalty.
Here his fortunes appear to have been various,
and he was tossed to and fro by the battledoor of
fate, until he found a snug harbour at Swallow Barn;
where, some years ago, he sat down in that quiet
repose
which a worried and badgered patriot is best
fitted to enjoy.
He is a good scholar, and having confined his
reading
entirely to the learning of the ancients, his
republicanism
is somewhat after the Grecian mould.
He has never read any politics of later date than
the time of the Emperor Constantine,not even a
newspaper;so that he may be said to have been
contemporary with schines rather than Lord
Castlereagh
,
until that eventful epoch of his life when
his blazing roof-tree awakened him from his
anachronistical
dream. This notable interruption,
however
,
gave him but a feeble insight into the moderns,
and he soon relapsed to Thucydides and Livy, with
some such glimmerings of the American Revolution
upon his remembrance as most readers have of the
exploits of the first Brutus.
The old gentleman has a learned passion for
folios. He had been a long time urging Meriwether
to make some additions to his collections of
literature
,
and descanted upon the value of some of the
ancient authors as foundations, both moral and
physical
,
to the library. Frank gave way to the
argument
,
partly to gratify the parson, and partly from
the proposition itself having a smack that touched
his fancy. The matter was therefore committed
entirely
to Mr. Chub, who forthwith set out on a
voyage
of exploration to the north. I believe he got as
far as Boston. He certainly contrived to execute
his commission with a curious felicity. Some famous
Elzivirs were picked up, and many other antiques
that nobody but Mr. Chub would ever think of
opening.
The cargo arrived at Swallow Barn in the dead
of winter. During the interval between the parson's
return from his expedition and the coming of the
books, the reverend little schoolmaster was in a
remarkably
unquiet state of body, which almost
prevented
him from sleeping: and it is said that the
sight of the long expected treasures had the happiest
effect upon him. There was ample accommodation
for this new acquisition of ancient wisdom provided
before its arrival, and Mr. Chub now spent a whole
week in arranging the volumes on their proper shelves,
having, as report affirms, altered the arrangement at
least seven times during that period. Every body
wondered what the old gentleman was at all this
time; but it was discovered afterwards, that he was
endeavouring to effect a distribution of the works
according
to a minute division of human science, which
entirely failed, owing to the unlucky accident of
several of his departments being without any volumes.
After this matter was settled, he regularly spent
his evenings in the library. Frank Meriwether was
hardly behind the parson in this fancy, and took,
for a short time, to abstruse reading. They both,
consequently, deserted the little family circle every
evening after tea, and might have continued to do so
all the winter but for a discovery made by Hazard.
Ned had seldom joined the two votaries of science
in their philosophical retirement, and it was
whispered
in the family that the parson was giving Frank
a quiet course of lectures in the ancient philosophy,
for Meriwether was known to talk a good deal, about
that time, of the old and new Academicians. But
it happened upon one dreary winter night, during a
tremendous snowstorm, which was banging the
shutters
and doors of the house so as to keep up a
continual
uproar, that Ned, having waited in the parlour
for the philosophers until midnight, set out to invade
their retreat,not doubting that he should find them
deep in study. When he entered the library, both
candles were burning in their sockets, with long,
untrimmed
wicks; the fire was reduced to its last
embers
,
and, in an arm-chair on one side of the table,
the parson was discovered in a sound sleep over
Jeremy Taylor's Ductor Dubitantium; whilst Frank,
in another chair on the opposite side, was snoring
over a folio edition of Montaigne. And upon the
table stood a small stone pitcher containing a
residuum
of whiskey punch, now grown cold. Frank
started up in great consternation upon hearing Ned's
footstep beside him, and, from that time, almost
entirely deserted the library. Mr. Chub, however,
was not so easily drawn away from the career of
his humour, and still shows his hankering after his
leather-coated friends.
It is an amusing point in the old gentleman's
character to observe his freedom in contracting
engagements
that depend upon his purse. He seems
to think himself a rich man, and is continually
becoming
security for some of the neighbours. To hear
him talk, it would be supposed that he meant to
renovate
the affairs of the whole county. As his
intentions
are so generous, Meriwether does not fail
to back him when it comes to a pinch;by reason
of which the good squire has more than once been
obliged to pay the penalty.
Mr. Chub's character, as it will be seen from this
description of him, possesses great simplicity. This
has given rise to some practical jokes against him,
which have caused him much annoyance. The
tradition in the family goes, that, one evening, the
worthy divine, by some strange accident, fell into an
excess in his cups; and that a saucy chamber-maid
found him dozing in his chair, with his pipe in his
mouth, having the bowl turned downward, and the
ashes sprinkled over his breast. He was always
distinguished by a broad and superfluous ruffle to
his shirt, and, on this occasion, the mischievous maid
had the effrontery to set it on fire. It produced, as
VOL. I. 7
may be supposed, a great alarm to the parson, and,
besides, brought him into some scandal; for he was
roused up in a state of consternation, and began to
strip himself of his clothes, not knowing what he was
about. I don't know how far he exposed himself,
but the negro women, who ran to his relief, made a
fine story of it.
Hazard once reminded him of this adventure, in
my presence, and it was diverting to see with what
a comic and quiet sheepishness he bore the joke.
He half closed his eyes and puckered up his mouth
as Ned proceeded; and when the story came to the
conclusion, he gave Ned a gentle blow on the breast
with the back of his hand, crying out, as he did so,
Hoot toot,Mister Ned!Then he walked to
the front door, where he stood whistling.
CHAPTER VII.
TRACES OF THE FEUDAL SYSTEM.
Virginia
has the sentiments and opinions of an
independent nation. She enjoyed in the colonial
state a high degree of the favour of the mother
country
;
and the blandishments of her climate, together
with the report of her fertile soil and her hidden
territorial
resources, from the first attracted the regard
of the British emigrants. Her early population,
therefore, consisted of gentlemen of good name and
condition, who brought within her confines a solid
fund of respectability and wealth. This race of men
grew vigorous in her genial atmosphere; her
cloudless
skies quickened and enlivened their tempers,
and, in two centuries, gradually matured the sober
and thinkin Englishman into that spirited,
imaginative
being that now inhabits the lowlands of this
state. When the Revolution broke out, she was
among the first of its champions, ardent in the
assertion
of the principles upon which it turned, and brave
in the support of them. Since that period, her
annals
have been singularly brilliant with the fame of
orators and statesmen. Four Presidents have been
given to the Union from her nursery. The first, the
brightest figure of history; the others also master
spirits, worthy to be ranked amongst the greatest of
their day. In the light of these men, and of their
gallant contemporaries, she has found a glory to
stimulate her ambition, and to minister to her pride.
It is not wonderful that in these circumstances she
should deem herself an ascendant star in the Union.
It is a feature in her education and policy to hold
all other interests subordinate to her own.
Her wealth is territorial; her institutions all savour
of the soil; her population consists of landholders,
of many descents, unmixed with foreign alloy. She
has no large towns where men may meet and devise
improvements or changes in the arts of life. She
may be called a nation without a capital. From
this cause she has been less disturbed by popular
commotions, less influenced by popular fervours,
than other communities. Her laws and habits, in
consequence, have a certain fixedness, which even
reject many of the valuable improvements of the day.
In policy and government she is, according to the
simplest and purest form, a republic: in temper and
opinion, in the usages of life, and in the qualities of
her moral nature, she is aristocratic.
The gentlemen of Virginia live apart from each
other. They are surrounded by their bondsmen and
by their dependants; and the customary intercourse of
society familiarizes their minds to the relation of high
and low degree. They are scattered about like the
chiefs of separate clans, and propagate opinions
in seclusion, that have the tincture of baronial
independence
.
They frequently meet in the
interchange
of a large and thriftless hospitality, in which
the forms of society are foregone for its comforts,
and the business of life thrown aside for the
enjoyment
of its pleasures. Their halls are large, and
their boards ample; and surrounding the great
family
hearth, with its immense burthen of blazing
wood casting a broad and merry glare over the
congregated
household and the numerous retainers, a
social winter party in Virginia affords a tolerable
picture
of feudal munificence.
Frank Meriwether is a good specimen of the class
I have described. He professes to value the sober
and hearty virtues of the country. He has a
natural
liking for that plain, unadorned character that
grows up at home. He seeks companionship with
men of ability, and is a zealous disseminator of the
personal fame of individuals who have won any
portion
of renown in the state. Sometimes, I even think
he exaggerates a little, when descanting upon the
prodigies of genius that have been reared in the Old
Dominion; and he manifestly seems to consider that
a young man who has astonished a whole village
in Virginia by the splendour of his talents, must, of
course, be known throughout the United States;
for he frequently opens his eyes at me with an air
of astonishment, when I happen to ask him who is
the marvel he is speaking of.
I observe, moreover, that he has a constitutional
fondness for paradoxes, and does not scruple to adopt
and republish any apothegm that is calculated to
7 *
startle one by its novelty. He has a correspondence
with several old friends, who were with him at
college
,
and who have now risen into an extensive
political
notoriety in the state:these gentlemen
furnish
him with many new currents of thought, along
which Frank glides with a happy velocity. He is
essentially meditative in his character, and
somewhat
given to declamation; and these traits have
communicated a certain measured and deliberate
gesticulation to his discourse. I have frequently seen
him after dinner stride backward and forward across
the room, for some moments, wrapped in thought,
and then fling himself upon the sofa, and com out
with some weighty doubt, expressed with a solemn
emphasis. In this form he lately began a
conversation
,
or rather a speech, that for a moment quite
disconcerted me. After all, said he, as if he had
been talking to me before, although these were the
first words he utteredthen making a parenthesis,
so as to qualify what he was going to sayI don't
deny that the steamboat is destined to produce
valuable
resultsbut after all, I much question(and
here he bit his upper lip, and paused an instant)if
we are not better without it. I declare, I think it
strikes deeper at the supremacy of the states than
most persons are willing to allow. This annihilation
of space, sir, is not to be desired. Our protection
against the evils of consolidation consists in the very
obstacles to our intercourse. Splatterthwaite Dubbs
of Dinwiddie(or some such name,Frank is
famous
for quoting the opinions of his contemporaries.
This Splatterthwaite, I take it, was some old college
chum that had got into the legislature, and I dare say
made pungent speeches,) Dubbs of Dinwiddie made
a good remarkThat the home material of
Virginia
was never so good as when her roads were at
their worst. And so Frank went on with quite a
harangue, to which none of the company replied one
word, for fear we might get into a dispute. Every
body seems to understand the advantage of silence
when Meriwether is inclined to be expatiatory.
This strain of philosophizing has a pretty marked
influence in the neighbourhood, for I perceive that
Frank's opinions are very much quoted. There is a
set of under-talkers about these large country
establishments
,
who are very glad to pick up the crumbs
of wisdom that fall from a rich man's table;
secondhand
philosophers, who trade upon other people's
stock. Some of these have a natural bias to this
venting of upper opinions, by reason of certain
dependencies
in the way of trade and favour: others
have it from affinity of blood, which works like a
charm over a whole country. Frank stands
related
,
by some tie of marriage or mixture of kin,
to an infinite train of connexions, spread over the
state; and it is curious to learn what a decided
hue this gives to the opinions of the district. We
had a notable example of this one morning, not long
after my arrival at Swallow Barn. Meriwether had
given several indications, immediately after
breakfast
,
of a design to pour out upon us the gathered
ruminations
of the last twenty-four hours, but we had
evaded the storm with some caution, when the
arrival
of two or three neighbours,plain, homespun
farmers,who had ridden to Swallow Barn to
execute
some papers before Frank as a magistrate,
furnished
him with an occasion that was not to be lost.
After despatching their business, he detained them,
ostensibly to inquire about their crops, and other
matters of their vocation,but, in reality, to give
them that very flood of politics which we had
escaped
.
We, of course, listened without concern, since
we were assured of an auditory that would not
flinch. In the course of this disquisition, he made
use of a figure of speech that savoured of some
previous
study, or, at least, was highly in the oratorical
vein. Mark me, gentlemen, said he,
contracting
his brow over his fine thoughtful eye, and
pointing
the forefinger of his left hand directly at the face
of the person he addressed, Mark me, gentlemen,
you and I may not live to see it, but our children
will see it, and wail over itthe sovereignty of this
Union will be as the rod of Aaron;it will turn
into a serpent, and swallow up all that struggle with
it. Mr. Chub was present at this solemn
denunciation
,
and was very much affected by it. He
rubbed
his hands with some briskness, and uttered his
applause in a short but vehement panegyric, in which
were heard only the detached words
Demosthenes
and Philip.
The next day Ned and myself were walking by
the schoolhouse, and were hailed by Rip, from one
of the windows, who, in a sly under tone, as he
beckoned
us to come close to him, told us, if we
wanted
to hear a regular preach, to stand fast. We
could look into the schoolroom unobserved, and there
was our patriotic pedagogue haranguing the boys
with a violence of action that drove an additional
supply of blood into his face. It was apparent that
the old gentleman had got much beyond the depth of
his hearers, and was pouring out his rhetoric more
from oratorical vanity than from any hope of
enlightening
his audience. At the most animated part of
his strain, he brought himself, by a kind of climax,
to the identical sentiment uttered by Meriwether the
day before. He warned his young hearersthe
oldest
of them was not above fourteento keep a
lynx-eyed gaze upon that serpent-like ambition which
would convert the government at Washington into
Aaron's rod, to swallow up the independence of their
native state.
This conceit immediately ran through all the
lower
circles at Swallow Barn. Mr. Thong, the
overseer
,
repeated it at the blacksmith's shop, in the
presence
of the blacksmith and Mr. Absalom Bulrush,
a spare, ague-and-feverish husbandman who
occupies
a muddy slip of marsh land, on one of the river
bottoms, which is now under mortgage to
Meriwether
;
and from these it has spread far and wide,
though a good deal diluted, until in its circuit it has
reached our veteran groom Carey, who considers the
sentiment as importing something of an awful
nature
.
With the smallest encouragement, Carey will
put on a tragi-comic face, shake his head very
slowly
,
turn up his eye-balls, and open out his broad,
scaly hands, while he repeats with laboured voice,
Look out, Master Ned! Aaron's rod a black
snake in Old Virginny! Upon which, as we fall
into
a roar of laughter, Carey stares with astonishment
at our irreverence. But having been set to acting
this scene for us once or twice, he now suspects us
of some joke, and asks if there is'nt a copper for an
old negro, which if he succeeds in getting, he runs
off, telling us he is too 'cute to make a fool of
himself
.
Meriwether does not dislike this trait in the
society
around him. I happened to hear two
carpenters
,
one day, who were making some repairs at the
stable, in high conversation. One of them was
expounding to the other some oracular opinion o
Frank's touching the political aspect of the country,
and just at the moment when the speaker was most
animated, Meriwether himself came up. He no
sooner became aware of the topic in discussion than
he walked off in another direction,affecting not to
hear it, although I knew he heard every word. He
told me afterwards that there was a wholesome
tone of feeling amongst the people in that part of the
country.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE BRAKES.
About
four miles below Swallow Barn, on the
same bank of the river, is a tract of land known by
the name of The Brakes. The principal feature in
this region is an extensive range of lowlands,
reaching
back from the river, and bounded by distant
forest
,
from the heart of which tower, above the mass
of foliage, a number of naked branches of decayed
trees, that are distinctly visible in this remote
perspective
.
These lowlands are checkered by
numberless
gullies or minute water-courses, whose
direction
is marked out to the eye by thickets of briars
and brambles. From this characteristic the estate
has derived its name.
A high hill swells upwards from this level ground
in a regular cone, on the top of which stands a large
plain building, with wings built in exact uniformity,
and connected with the centre by low but lengthened
covered ways. The whole structure is of dark
brick, with little architectural embellishment. It
was obviously erected when the ornamental arts
were not much attended to, although there is an
evident
aim at something of this kind in the fancy of
the chimneys which spring up from the sharp gable
ends of the building, and also in the conceited
pyramids
into which the roofs of the low square wings
have been reared. The artist, however, has
certainly
failed in producing effect, if his ambition soared
above the idea of a sober, capacious and
gentlemanlike
mansion.
Seen from the river, the buildings stand partly in
the shade of a range of immense lombardy poplars,
which retreat down the hill in the opposite direction
until the line diminishes from the view. Negro huts
are scattered about over the landscape in that
profusion
which belongs to a Virginia plantation.
This establishment constitutes the family residence
of the proprietor of the estate, Mr. Isaac Tracy,
known generally with his territorial addition,of
The Brakes.
Mr. Tracy is now upwards of seventy years of
age. He has been for many years past a widower,
and seems to stand like an old landmark in the
stream of time, which is destined to have every thing
gliding past it, itself unchanged. The old gentleman
was a stark royalist in the days of the Revolution,
and only contrived to escape the confiscation of his
estate by preserving a strict and cautious neutrality
during the war. He still adheres to the ancient
costume
,
and is now observed taking his rides in the
morning, in a long-waisted coat, of a snuff colour,
and having three large figured gilt buttons set upon
the cuffs, which are slashed after an antiquated
fashion
.
He wears, besides, ruffles over his hands,
and has a certain trig and quaint appearance given by
his tight, dark-coloured small-clothes, and long boots
with tops of brown leather, so disposed as to show a
little of his white stockings near the knee. His
person
is tall and emaciated, with a withered and rather
severe exterior. A formality, correspondent with
his appearance, is conspicuous in his manners, which
are remarkable for their scrupulous and sprightly
politeness
;
and his household is conducted with a
degree
of precision that throws a certain air of
stateliness
over the whole family.
He has two daughters, of whom the youngest has
already counted perhaps her twenty-third year, and
an only son somewhat younger. Catharine, the
eldest
of this family, has the reputation of being
particularly
well educated; but her acquirement is
probably
enhanced, in the common estimation, by a
thoughtful and rather formal cast of character,a
certain soberness in the discharge of the ordinary
duties of life,and a grave turn of conversation, such
as belongs to women who, from temperament, are
not wont to enjoy with any great relish, nor perceive
with observant eyes, the pleasant things of existence.
Bel, the younger sister, is of a warmer
complexion
.
Nature has given her an exuberant flow of
spirits, which, in spite of a stiff and rigid education
imposed upon her by her father, frequently breaks
through the trammels of discipline, and shows itself
in the various forms which a volatile temper
assumes
in the actions of an airy and healthful girl.
Still, however, her sentiments are what nurture has
made them, notwithstanding her physical elements.
VOL. I. 8
She has been accustomed to the cautious and
authoritative
admonitions of her father, which have
inculcated
a severe and exaggerated sense of personal
respect, and a rather too rigorous estimate of the
proprieties and privileges of her sex. These girls
early lost their mother; and their father, at that
period
advanced in years, had already parted with his
fondness and his fitness for society. The
consequence
was that The Brakes, during the minority of
the children, was a secluded spot, cut off from much
of that sort of commerce with the world which is
almost essential to enliven and mature the
sympathies
of young persons.
Both Catharine and Bel are pretty, but after
different
models. The eldest is a placid, circumspect,
inaccessible kind of beauty. Bel, on the other hand,
is headlong and thoughtless, with quick impulses,
that give her the charm of agreeable expression,
although her features are irregular, and would not
stand a critical examination. Her skin is not
altogether
clear; her mouth is large, and her eyes of a
dark grey hue.
Ralph, the brother, is a tall, ill made, awkward man,
with black eyes, and black hair curled in extravagant
profusion over his head. He contracted slovenly
habits
of dress at college, and has not since
abandoned
them; has a dislike to the company of women,
fills up his conversation with oaths, and chews
immense
quantities of tobacco. He has an unmusical
voice, and a swaggering walk, and generally wears
his hat set upon one side of his head. He professes
to be a sportsman, and lives a good deal out of doors,
not being fond, as he says, of being stuck up in the
parlour to hear the women talk. Ralph, however,
is said to be a good fellow at bottom, which means
that he does not show his best qualities in front.
He is famous for his horsemanship, and avows a
strong partiality for Bel on account of her skill in the
same art, which, Ralph says, comes altogether from
his teaching.
This family has always been on terms of intimacy
at Swallow Barn, and of late years their intercourse
has been much increased by the companionship
which has been cultivated between the ladies of the
two houses. Frank Meriwether holds the character
of Mr. Tracy in great respect, and always speaks of
him in a tone of affection, although the old
gentleman
,
Ned says, is a bad listener and a painful talker,
two qualities which sort but ill with the prevailing
characteristics of Meriwether.
There are some points of family history, affecting
the relations of these two gentlemen, which I shall
find occasion hereafter to disclose.
CHAPTER IX.
AN ECLOGUE.
Having
now disposed of all those preliminary
sketches with which I have thought it necessary to
entertain my reader, it is my design to favour him
with some insight into certain particulars of a
domestic
nature which came under my observation
during my visit. These have no other merit than
being faithful narratives of events that are apt to
escape
the eye of the world, and which, nevertheless,
contribute in a conspicuous degree to illustrate some
pleasing points in the characters of individuals.
Hazard and myself were in the habit of taking
frequent rambles together; and it was now on the
morning of the first of July, that we had walked
some distance on the road leading down the river.
In these idle roamings we sometimes fell into strange
caprices. The tide of animal spirits, in this
unobserved
and unfettered intercourse, is apt to rise into
exhibitions that would be called childish, by a
spectator
who was ignorant of the gradual scale by
which the feelings may be elevated into the
empyrean
of foolery. We accordingly, when we got into
the woods, practised ludicrous caricatures of the
drama, which Ned called imitations of the most
distinguished
actors. Sometimes we delivered
pompous
harangues, as if we were in the midst of a
senate
,
and sustained a mock debate in a very
impressive
way, with abundance of action.
This day Ned was more buoyant than usual, and
strained the strings of propriety until they were ready
to crack. In the midst of these grave and sensible
pastimes, we frequently stopped to laugh at each
other, and Ned would exclaim, Are we not a pair
of most immeasurable fools! to which there being
a free assent, we immediately resumed our antics.
After one of these pauses, Ned commenced the
following
lecture, which was delivered with a
countenance
of severe gravity.
Mark, I am astonished that you can find
amusement
in this silly merriment. As for myself, you
are my guest, and I am obliged out of politeness to
accommodate myself to your follies. Are you not
aware that you make a shocking compromise of
your dignity by bawling in this fashion in the woods,
until you scare the crows from their perches? What
a frivolous witling would you be thought, if,
perchance
,
any sober and solemn sort of person should
be on the highway to overhear your nonsense! Your
voice is cracked, especially in its upper tones,your
manner is bad, and your melody execrable. Now,
if you want instruction, listen to this.
Here Ned set up a vociferous stave, which he drew
out into a multitude of quavers.
What do you think of that? said he.
8 *
Tut, I replied; that's a mere squall: it is an
affected and servile imitation of the Signorina: it
wants both force and majesty. Lend me your ears,
and hearken to this.
And here I gave him another flourish, greatly
improving
on his style. Now, said Ned, I know,
Mark, you are vain of that; so sit down here, upon
this large root, and give me an attentive hearing.
I sat down upon the root, as directed.
Let me have no clapping, he continued,
restrain
your transports, and bestow all your thoughts
upon the expression and pathos of this strain. I
challenge
criticism. So be attentive.
With this prelude, Ned threw himself into the
attitude
of a singer, pressing his hands passionately
upon his bosom, and making a great many
gesticulations
of his body, while he poured forth a loud and
long bravura strain, that made the woods re-echo
from many distant points.
It is necessary here to mention, that our previous
conversation this morning had dwelt much upon the
character of the family at The Brakes, in which Ned
had communicated a good deal of what I have
detailed
in the last chapter. Bel Tracy had been
alternately
the subject of his satire and his praise.
Amongst other things, he had mentioned her skill in
music, and her fine voice, which, however, he
qualified
by some strictures upon her over-refined style of
singing, and her attachment to Italian songs in
preference
to those in her own tongue. All our
volunteer
effusions had been sung to words of our own,
which were ridiculous enough. In this last flourish
of Ned's he expended all the variations of his voice
upon the doggrel couplet,
Bel Tracy against the field!
Against the field Bel Tracy!
And the concluding words, Bel Tracy, were
reverberated through the woods to a thousand
reduplications
,
and with every conceivable intonation
and inflexion of his strong and somewhat musical
voice,increasing in vigour and animation as he
repeated the words,and bringing his solo to a
close with a multitude of fantastical trills, and
violently
magnified gestures.
A merry morning you make of it, Mr. Hazard!
said Bel Tracy, reining up her horse immediately at
Ned's back. You call up spirits from the woods
and they are here. But I think you need not have
been so violent in your invocations.
My sister Bel has reason to be thankful, said
Catharine, who was close beside her sister, for
your teaching her name so familiarly to the
river-gods
.
The lute of Orpheus was certainly not more
potent in its enchantment.
The devil! said Ned to me, in amazement,
what a surprise!
That was decidedly the most languishing
assault
upon poor Bel's heart that was ever made upon
it, said Harvey Riggs, a gentleman who was in the
train of the two ladies.
It was as good as a dozen dogs treeing an
opossum
,
said Ralph Tracy, who made up a fourth in
the party.
This cavalcade had been galloping along the
sandy
and noiseless road, until they came within
hearing
of Hazard's voice, when they had halted
unobserved
,
and listened to the whole of Ned's unlucky
strain; and, as he drew to a close, had advanced
stealthily upon us, and effected the surprise I have
related.
Ned was utterly confounded. His arms dropped
to his sides, and he wheeled suddenly round on his
heel to front the group, who were bearing him down
with peals of laughter. He looked sheepishly about
him, and when the laugh had in some degree
subsided
,
he introduced me to the company, saying,
after
he had done so,
Mr. Littleton and myself, Bel, were only
practising
a serenade with which we intended to regale
you at The Brakes. But as you have heard the
rehearsal
,
you will spare us the midnight visit we had
designed.
Bel was somewhat piqued with this profane use of
her name, and scarcely concealed the feeling which
it had provoked, notwithstanding the merriment that
it excited at the moment. She replied,
Perhaps we have mutual reason to rejoice in this
meeting then, for my father, I think, is not fond of
such refined and delicate strains.
It was in your own best style, said Ned, with
provoking want of address, it was a genuine Italian
flight.
Is'nt it a pity, Mr. Littleton, said Bel, that
Edward Hazard should be so merciless upon his
friends?
Hazard has already created so strong an interest
in me to make your acquaintance, Miss Tracy, that
I scarcely regret the ludicrous accident that has
brought it about so soon, I replied.
Come, Bel, forgive me, said Hazard, collecting
himself,for he had been strangely fluttered through
the former part of this dialogue. I own I am the
most egregious buffoon, and certainly the most
unlucky
one, in this country. Littleton and myself
have been running riot all the morning, and, whether
in jest or earnest,he continued in a lower voice
your name is constantly upon my lips.
As Ned said this, he had approached familiarly to
Bel's stirrup, and offered her his hand, which she
took with great kindness,and then remarked, that
they were on their road to Swallow Barn, and would
not longer interrupt our studies. Upon this Harvey
Riggs and Bel rode forward at a gallop, the former
looking back over his shoulder, and calling out to
Ned,
We shall give a good account to Meriwether of
your morning occupation. I will take care to have
justice done you, Ned.
The devil take your justice, said Hazard, as
they rode away.
Catharine and Ralph followed them, at a more
leisurely pace. Ned stood looking along the road at
the retreating party, for some moments. Bel was
mounted on a beautiful sleek bay mare, which sprang
forward with an uncommonly spirited motion. Her
figure showed to great advantage on horseback,
being
graceful and easy. Her dress was a riding habit
of nankeen, fancifully trimmed with green, and fitting
her shape with accurate adaptation. She wore a
light hat of the same colour as her dress, sufficiently
prominent in front to guard her face from the sun,
without concealing it; and over her right shoulder
floated a green veil, that descended from the hat, and
fluttered in the breeze as she moved forward.
Was there ever, said Ned, turning round to me,
after this troop had disappeared, was there ever
a more unlucky discovery than that! of all persons
in the world, to be caught in the height of our
tomfoolery
by that little elf Bel Tracy! Just to be taken
in the high flood of our nonsense! And with her
name, too, most sacrilegiously burlesqued to these silly
woods! I should scarcely have regarded it if it had
happened with any body else; but she has such a
superserviceable stock of conceit about elegance and
refinement in her mind, that I don't doubt she will
find in this cursed adventure a pretext to abuse me
in her prayers for the next twelvemonth. And then,
she will go home and tell that stiff old curmudgeon,
her father, that I am the very antipodes of a polished
man. Faith, she has said that before! And Harvey
Riggs, added Ned, musing, will not improve the
matter, because he will have his joke upon it. And
then sister Kate,Heaven save the mark!who is
like a simpering, stately mother abbess, will
pronounce
my conduct undignified; that's
her
word:
and so will Bel, for that matter. Why, Mark, in the
name of all the trumpery devils! had'nt you your
eyes about you?
Egad, said I, they surprised our camp
without
alarming the sentinels. But after all, what is it?
They can only say they met a pair of `fools in the
forest,' and, certainly, they need not travel far to do
that, any day!
By the by, Mark, said Ned, changing his
mood, and brightening up into a pleasanter state of
feeling, did you note Bel's horsemanship,how
light, and fearless, and debonair she rides? And, like
a fairy, comes at your bidding, too! She studies
postures, sir, from the pictures; reads descriptions of
the ladies of chivalry, and takes the field in imitation
of them. Her head is full of these fancies, and she
almost persuades herself that this is the fourteenth
century. Did you observe her dainty fist, `
miniardly
begloved,'as the old minstrels have it?
she longs to have a merlin perched upon it, and, is
therefore endeavouring to train a hawk, that, when
she takes the air, she may go in the guise of an
ancient
gentlewoman. She should be followed by her
falconer.
And have a pair of greyhounds in her train,
said I.
Aye, and a page in a silk doublet, added
Ned.
And a gallant cavalier, I rejoined, to break
a lance for her, instead of breaking jokes upon her.
I am almost tempted to champion her cause, against
such a lurdan as you, myself. But let us hasten
back to Swallow Barn, for our presence will be
needed.
After this adventure we returned to the
mansion-house
,
with some misgiving on the part of Hazard.
He talked about it all the way, and dwelt
somewhat
fearfully upon the raillery of Harvey Riggs
and Meriwether, who, he observed, were not likely
to drop a joke before it was pretty well worn.
The servants were leading off the horses as we
arrived
at the gate, and the family, with their visiters,
were collected in the porch, with all eyes turned to
us as we approached. There was a general uproar
of laughter at Ned, who took it in good part, though
with not many words.
When the mirth of the company had run through
its destined course, Bel called Hazard up to her, and
said:
You are a shabby fellow, Edward. I have two
causes of quarrel with you. You have not been at
The Brakes for a week or more,and you know we
don't bear neglect:and secondly, I don't think you
have a right to be frightening Mr. Littleton with my
name, however lawful it may be to amuse the
gentle
geese of the James River with it.
Bel, replied Hazard, upon my honour, I
never was more solemn in my life than at the very
moment you rode upon us. And as to my
remissness
,
I have had no sentiment on hand since Mark
Littleton has been with me, and I did not know
what I should say to you. Besides, I have a regard
for Mark's health, and I was not disposed to
interrupt
it with one of your flirtations. He is a little
taken already, for he has been praising you and your
mare ever since you passed us. If he knew what a
jockey you were, in all things, he would give you
very little encouragement.
Pray heaven, said Bel, if he be a virtuous
man, he be not spoiled by such a madcap jester as
yourself! Mr. Littleton, I hope you will not believe
Edward, if he has been telling you any thing to my
disadvantage;I am never safe in his hands.
I will tell you what I told him, Bel, said
Hazard, getting round close to her ear, where he
whispered what was too low to be heard.
You are incorrigible! cried Bel, laughing and
at the same time shaking her riding whip at him.
And with these words she ran into the hall, and
thence up stairs at full speed, followed by the rest
of the ladies.
Is 'nt she a merry creature? said Ned to me,
in an affectionate tone, as we entered the door in the
rear of the party.
VOL. I. 9
CHAPTER X.
COLLOQUIES.
The
party from the Brakes caused a great
uproar
within the whilom tranquil precincts of Swallow
Barn. The ladies had congregated in one of the
chambers, from whence might be heard the racket of
exclamation and laughter, which, as far as I am
acquainted
with the sex, belongs to every feminine
conventicle; whilst below, the hall re-echoed with
the loud and bluff greetings of the gentlemen, the
heavy tramp of boots upon the uncarpeted floor, and
the usual noisy gaiety of an assemblage of joyous
and idle spirits.
There was something worthy of note in the
appearance
and manners of Harvey Riggs. A short,
square built person, with the dress of a gentleman,
but so negligently assorted and worn, as to give even
a comic effect to his exterior; a weather-beaten
visage
,
pockmarked, and of a dry complexion; the
ripeness of forty beaming in eyes of undefined colour,
but bright and shortsighted; a small upturned nose;
a large and well shaped mouth; an uncommonly
large head, bedecked with a tremendous shock of
disorderly hair, that curled upon the cape of his coat:
these formed the most prominent points in his
outline
.
He had that mellowness in his looks that
belongs
to a man who has conversed much with the
world; who has seen it in its pleasant aspects; is
familiar with revels, and sits up late o' nights;
and has often been caught by the dawn at a card
table; a countenance of confessed and unmitigated
homeliness, but far from displeasing, from its entire
absence of pretension, and from an expression of
waggery that played upon its features.
His company is much sought after, and, what may
seem a little paradoxical, is particularly valued by
the females of his acquaintance. It is not unusual
for that sex to elevate into favour those individuals
of ours who are capable of contributing to their
amusement, however free from outward attractions.
Harvey Riggs had a vein of strong good sense,
which, united to a learned skill in the ways of
society
,
gave him great advantages. He is related to
the Tracys, and had recently arrived from Richmond
upon a customary visit at the Brakes, where he was
now in the high career of that service which was
most agreeable to him, that of a squire of dames,
with nothing to do but pick up amusement
where-ever
it was to be found.
We were collected in the hall at the foot of the
stair-case, where some refreshments had been placed
upon a table. It is a common custom in
Virginia
,
about an hour before dinner, to prepare a
bowl of toddy, which is kept in ice until the
company
meet at the table. Harvey Riggs had some
reputation in the concoction of this compound, and,
as the proper hour had arrived, he was already
engaged
in this occupation. Ned, said he, as he
was busily employed with a pitcher in each hand,
pouring the contents from one to the other, by way
of ripening the mixture, how far do you call it
from here to where we caught you practising your
cantata?
Something upwards of a mile, replied Ned.
Well, sir, continued Harvey, Bel and I rode
that in three minutes:There's a girl for you! Poor
cousin Kate followed us at a demure gallop, with
Ralph swearing at her, like a trooper, all the way.
I will match Bel for speed against any thing in this
low country. You know how she talks about
discretion
,
and decorum, and what's elegantand all
that.Yet, she thinks no more of a ditch, or a
moderate
worm fence,if they come in her way,than
she does of a demi-semi-quaver on the piano; she
flies over it singing.
Bel was always a brave girl, said Ned; you
know how the Spanish ladies ride;booted and
spurred. If Bel had one of their saddles, I don't
doubt
That every time Edward Hazard looked at it,
we should be favoured with some long story, told us
twenty times over, about the good people round the
Horn, cried out Bel, from the head of the stairs,
where she was quietly leaning over the balustrade,
and looking down into the hall.
This was followed by a laugh against Ned, both
up stairs and below. As for the matter of that,
rejoined Hazard, if I were inclined to tell stories, I
have seen feats enough performed on Ralph's saddle,
to give me all the occasions I desire. Indeed, I
could give a very true account of a lady crossing a
certain stream on a blind plough-horse, Bel, without
saddle or bridle either.
Edward! returned Bel, as she retreated from
the balustrade, you have no respect for treaties.
Not after they have been broken by one of the
belligerents, said Ned.
So much for listening where you had no business,
exclaimed Ralph, in a rather ungracious tone of voice.
I come as an ambassador from the Brakes,
charged with a commission to you, said Harvey
Riggs, addressing himself to Meriwether, and desire
to acquit myself of it at once. Here is an epistle,
as Mr. Tracy terms it, which was to be put into
your own hands with care and speed. Singleton
Swansdown is expected, and arrangements are to
be made for the immediate settlement of that
interminable
boundary-line dispute which has been
vexed
for forty years. My good kinsman, Mr. Tracy, is
anxious that you should expedite Swansdown's
departure
,
and I venture to add my own request, in
the name of charity and all the cardinal virtues, that
you will detain this gentle carpet knight the shortest
practicable time.
I devoutly believe, replied Meriwether, that
if this old law-suit between our families should be
brought to a close by this device,even if it should
9*
go in Mr. Tracy's favour,it will cost him some
unpleasant
struggles to part with it.
It is impossible to settle it yet, said Harvey,
all the oracles are against it. Mammy Diana,
who is a true sybil, has uttered a prophecy, which
runs thus`That the landmarks shall never be
stable
until Swallow Barn shall wed the Brakes.' Ned,
the hopes of the family rest upon you.
Meriwether opened the letter, and read as
follows
:
Dear and Respected Friend,Touching the
question of the law-suit which, notwithstanding the
erroneous judgments of our unlearned courts, still
hangs in unhappy suspense, I am moved by the
consideration
urged in your sensible epistle to me of the
fifteenth ultimo, to submit the same, with all the
matters of fact and law pertinent to a right decision
thereof, to mutual friends, to arbitrate the same
between
us; not doubting that the conclusion will be
agreeable to both, and corroborative of the
impressions
which I have entertained, unaltered from the
first, arising of this controversy with my venerated
neighbour, the late Walter Hazard.
What stake I have is insignificant in comparison
of the value of vindicating the ground on which I
have stood for forty years and upwards, and also of
relieving our lineal and collateral kindred from
vexatious
disputes in time to come.
I have written to my young friend, Singleton O.
Swansdown, Esq. of Meherrin,
Very young! interrupted Harvey, almost as
juvenile as the law-suit.
Son of my late worthy kinsman, Gilbert
Swansdown
,
as a proper gentleman to act in my behalf, and
late letters from him signify his ready pleasure to do
me this service. His advices inform me that he will
be at the Brakes in this present week. Although I
could have wished that this arbitrament should in
nowise fall into the hands of lawyersseeing that
we have both had reason, to our cost, to pray for a
deliverance from the tribeyet, nevertheless, it is not
becoming in me to object to your nomination of
Philpot
Wart, Esq. who is a shrewd and wary man, and
will doubtless strive to do the right between us.
I would desire, moreover, that it be understood
as a preliminary, that no respect shall be had to the
quibbles and law quirks wherewith the courts have
entertained themselves, to my detriment, hitherto in
these premises.
Praying that unnecessary delay shall not hinder
the speedy return of Mr. Swansdown, when his
occasions
shall call him hence, I beg leave to subscribe
myself,
Respected and dear Sir,
Your very obedient and obliged servant,
ISAAC TRACY.
Habit converts our troubles into pleasures,
said Meriwether, as he stood with this letter in his
hand, after he had finished reading it, and now
began
to descant, in one of his usual strains; and my
old friend Tracy has so long interested himself with
this inconsiderable claimfor it is not of the value
of a sharpshinone hundred acres of marsh land,
that no man would buythat, to tell the truth, I
would long since have given it up to him, if I did not
think it would make the old gentleman unhappy to
take the weight of it off his mind. Felicity, sir, is
an accident; it is motion, either of body or mind; a
mode of being, as the logicians call it. Let the best
machine of man be constructed, with all the
appertinences
of strength, faculty, thought, feeling, and
with all the appliances of competence and ease, and
it will rust from disease; the springs and wheels
will grow mouldy; the pipes become oppilated with
crudities, and death will ensue from mere
obstruction
.
But give it motion
But what do you think, interrupted Harvey, of
the old gentleman's selecting Singleton Swansdown
to reverse the decision of all the courts in Virginia,
with Philly Wart, too, to back them?
The shrewdest person, replied Meriwether,
smiling, and bringing down his left hand over his
face, as he threw his head backward, doubtless
may be beguiled by his prepossessions. Singleton's
a right clever fellow after all; and Mr. Tracy has a
great respect for him, growing out of family
connexions
,
and his regulated tone of manners, which are
very kind and conciliatory to the old gentleman.
But he is a devil of an ass, said Harvey, and I
had like to have blundered out as much, yesterday
at dinner, when Mr. Tracy told us he was coming
to the Brakes; but, happily, I was afraid to swear
before my cousin Kate.
Why I dare say, rejoined Meriwether,
Swansdown
will be entirely competent to this case,
particularly
with my friend Philly at his elbow, to show
him his road. I have been turning over in my mind,
he continued, aside to Riggs, to contrive to give
the old gentleman the advantage in the law-suit, if
I can so arrange it as to let him win it upon a show
of justice; for if he suspected me of a voluntary
concession
to him, he would not be pleased; and, upon
my soul! I find a difficulty in managing it.
Can't our friend Wart, said Harvey, patch up
a case against you, that shall deceive even Mr.
Tracy?
I shall so instruct him, replied Meriwether,
and it will afford us some speculation to observe
how reluctantly my good neighbour will part with
this bantling of his, when it is decided.
It has been his inducement, said Harvey, to
study the laws of Virginia from beginning to end;
and it has furnished him more conversation than
any other incident of his life.
CHAPTER XI.
PRANKS.
The
dinner hour arrived, and found our company
in the tone of spirits indicated by the recitals in the
last chapter.
Bel's thoughts bounded along in a current of
uncontrolled
gaiety, and it seemed as if Hazard had
set himself particularly to the task of provoking her
into this animated humour, by a series of assaults
which put upon her the necessity of reply. Without
wearing the semblance of flattery, this device had
all its effects, since it served to display the vivacity
and good nature of the lady, and to present her to
the company in the most playful and agreeable
positions
.
It was, however, utterly destitute of that
show of reverence which all women are pleased to
exact, even for their foibles, and, therefore, bore the
aspect of favours impoliticly conferred. Bel might
even have found a pretext to be offended with
Hazard
,
but for the manifest good feeling towards her
which shone out above all his raillery.
Catharine, at times, showed even a prudish
reserve
,
and, in consequence, neither Ned nor Harvey
Riggs ever ventured upon a jest with her. Indeed,
it is observable of Harvey, that, under the externals
of a volatile flow of spirits, he conceals a careful
policy to give a complimentary complexion to
whatever
falls from him. Prudence sustained her part in
the sportiveness of the day, and was alternately
sentimental
and mettlesome, thoughtless or grave, as the
occasion served.
As the evening advanced, the tide of frolic
feeling
ran higher, and it was at last resolved to
despatch
a messenger to the Brakes, to say that the
party would remain at Swallow Barn all night.
After tea the ladies made a concert around the old
harpsichord. Then some lively airs were played,
and at length, by a universal vote, my cousin
Lucretia
was seated at the instrument, and all the rest of
the company, except Frank Meriwether, were on
the floor, dancing reels and cotillions. The children
grouped about the corners of the room in an ecstasy
of delight. Mistress Barbara, who had stolen
quietly
into the apartment, relaxed her features into a
wormwood smile, and shook her head at Harvey
Riggs's drolleries; and the domestics of the family
gathered about the doorway, or peeped in at the
open windows.
From a breeze, the pervading mirth rose into a
gale. The gentlemen romped, and the ladies, in
defiance
of the established discipline, encouraged the
merriment by unconstrained laughter. Now and
then, indeed, Catharine bridled up, and resisted the
torrent of rebellious spirits by a statelier pace; but
Bel gave way to it, like a true child of nature, and
permitted her swift flowing blood to have its full
sway.
In the midst of this confused and mingled scene,
Lucy and Victorine appeared like children, in the
graceful playfulness of their age; springing about
with the easy motions and delighted looks of young
novices, to whom the world is a sunny picture of
pleasure and harmony.
Exhausted, at length, we took our seats, and
gradually
subsided into that lower and more equable
temper which is apt to follow violent excitements.
Harvey Riggs and Ned Hazard were observed to
withdraw from the parlour, and it was sometime
before they reappeared. In their absence they had
been making preparation for a melodrama, which
was now announced by Rip. The subject of this
new prank was The Babes in the wood. Rip and
one of the little girls were to enact the babes; and
accordingly, in due time, two candles were set upon
the floor to represent the stage lights; the company
were arranged in front;the children were laid out,
and ordered to keep their eyes shut; a piece of baize
covered them, instead of leaves, and Rip raised his
head, for an instant, to inform the audience that
there was to be a great storm. Suddenly a servant
came in and blew out the candles,all except the
two on the floor. This was followed by a
tremendous
racket in the hall, that was principally
occasioned
by the violent slamming of doors, which was
designed to imitate thunder;then came a flash of
lightning that made our audience start;it was
produced by firing gunpowder outside of the room;
and to give a perfect verisimilitude to the storm, a
most dismal hissing and pattering of rain assailed
every ear. This was, undoubtedly, the liveliest part
of the drama. It continued with unabated violence
for some moments, producing equal amazement and
diversion in the region of, what may be called, the
boxes,but finally became rather oppressive by
a volume of pungent vapour that diffused itself
through the apartment, with a strange savour, that
set us all to coughing. Surrounded by this pother
of the elements, Ned and Harvey entered, each with
a huge sabre,their faces smutted with cork, and
their figures disguised in old uniform coats, oddly
disproportioned to their persons. Here they strutted
about, making tragic gestures, and spouting fierce
blank verse. The rain, at intervals, sank upon the
ear, as if dwindling into a gentle mist, and anon
rose with redoubled fury and increasing pungency,
up to its former violence. The play, however, was
interrupted by an incident which I must not omit.
The rain had, for the last time, fallen into a mere
drizzle, and, at the very moment when the tempest
ought to have howled its loudest, it dropped into
perfect
silence. More rain! cried Ned: Give us
more rain.
Instead of rain, a giggle came from the hall, from
the midst of which Carey's voice was heard, saying,
Master Ned, it's no use; the frying pan's got
cold; it wont make no more noise.
VOL. I. 10
Shouts of uproar followed this disclosure, which
was made with a laughable sobriety on the part of
the old negro. Ned had given private instructions
to Carey to heat that implement of the kitchen, and
to bring it near the parlour door, where it was his
cue to fry a slice of fat bacon, until the storm was
over, the effects of which we had already felt. The
confusion of this announcement from Carey put an
end to the tragedy, and the company, as it was now
late, separated for the night, in the best humour with
each other.
The withdrawal of the larger portion of the
family
to their chambers, left us in a different mood.
The night was calm and clear, and our late
boisterous
occupations inclined us to contemplate the
present
repose of nature. We sauntered a short
distance
from the house. The moon had risen, and was
flinging a wizard glare over the tree-tops. A heavy
dew had fallen upon the grass, and imparted an
eager chilliness to the atmosphere. The grove
resounded
with those solemn invocations which are
poured forth by the countless insects of the night,
that keep their vigils through the livelong hours of
darkness,shrill, piercing and melancholy. The
house dogs howled at the moon, and rushed at
intervals
tumultuously forward upon some fancied
disturber
;
for the dog is imaginative, and is often
alarmed with the phantoms of his own thoughts. A
distant cock, the lord of some cabin hen-roost, was
heard, with a clear and trumpet-like cadence,
breaking
the deep stillness of this midnight time, like a
faithful warder on the battlements telling the hour
to the sleepers. Every thing around us was in
striking contrast with the scenes in which we had
just been engaged. We grew tranquil and
communicative
;
and thoughtless of the late houror rather
alive to its voluptuous charmwe completed our
short circuit, and had gathered again into the porch,
where we lay scattered about upon the benches, or
seated on the door-sill. Here, whilst we smoked
segars, and rambled over the idle topics that played
in our thoughts, Harvey Riggs engaged himself in
preparing a sleeping draught of that seductive
cordial
which common fame has celebrated as the
native
glory of Virginia. It is a vulgar error, Harvey
contends, to appropriate the mint sling to the
morning
.
It is, he remarked with solemn emphasis,
the homologous peculiar of the night,the rectifier
of the fancy,the parent of pleasant dreams,the
handmaid of digestion,and the lullaby of the brain:
in its nature essentially anti-roral; friendly to
peristaltics
and vermiculars; and, in its influence upon
the body, jocund and sedative. I have recorded
Harvey's express words, because in this matter I
conceive him to be high authority.
Upon this subject Harvey is eloquent, and whilst
we sat listening to his learned discriminations in the
various processes of this manufacture, our attention
was suddenly drawn to another quarter by the notes
of a banjoe, played by Carey in the court-yard. He
was called up to the door, and, to gratify my
curiosity
to hear his music, he consented to serenade the
ladies under their windows. Carey is a minstrel of
some repute, and, like the ancient jongeleurs, he
sings the inspirations of his own muse, weaving into
song the past or present annals of the family. He is
considered as a seer amongst the negroes on the
estate, and is always heard with reverence. The
importance this gives him, renders the old man not a
little proud of his minstrelsy. It required, therefore,
but little encouragement to set him off; so, after
taking a convenient stand, and running his fingers
over his rude instrument by way of prelude, he
signified
his obedience to our orders.
The scene was really picturesque. Carey was
old, and the infirmities of age were conspicuous upon
his person; his head was hoary, and now borrowed
an additional silver tint from the moonbeam that
lighted up his figure. Our eager group, that stood
watching him from the midst of the rose bushes in
which we were partly embowered; the silent hour,
interrupted only by the murmur of the occasional
breeze; the bevy of idle dogs that lay scattered over
the ground; the mistiness of the distant landscape;
and the venerable mass of building, with its alternate
faces of light and shade, formed a combination of
images and circumstances that gave a rich
impression
to our feelings.
Carey, for a moment, tuned his instrument with
the airs of a professor, smiled, and looking round to
Hazard, asked, in a half whisper, what shall I play,
Master Ned?
What you like best, Carey. Give us something
that you can recommend.
Well, said Carey, striking off a few notes, I'll
try this:
The rich man comes from down below,
Yo ho, yo ho.
What he comes for, I guess I know,
Long time ago.
He comes to talk to the young lady,
Yo ho, yo ho.
But she look'd proud, and mighty high,
Long time ago.
And in this strain, clothed in his own dialect, he
proceeded
to rehearse, in a doggerel ballad, sung with a
chant by no means inharmonious, the expected
arrival
of Swansdown at the Brakes, and the probable
events of his visit, which, he insinuated, would be
troublesome to Ned Hazard, and would, as the song
went,
Make him think so hard he could'nt sleep.
Can't you give us something better than that?
interrupted Ned.
Ah! that makes you very sore there, master
Ned Hazard, said the old negro, putting his hand
on Ned's breast.
Tut! replied Ned, you croak like a frog
to-night
;
sing something worth hearing.
Give us `Sugar in a Gourd,' or `Jim Crow,' cried
out Ralph Tracy, none of your dd cantabiles.
I'll sing you my dream, master Ned, said
Carey
,
10 *
but the young mistresses would rather hear
about their sparks than any thing else. It's so all
the world over.
Here Carey struck up another air, in the same
off-hand
manner, the purport of which was, that, as
he lay sleeping in his cabin, a beautiful lady
appeared
to him, and told him that he must instruct his
young master, when he went a-wooing, that there
were three things for him to learn: he must never
believe his mistress to be light of heart because she
laughed; nor that she was offended because she
looked angry; nor that she would not marry him
because she had given one refusal.
Carey sings like a discreet augur, said Harvey
Riggs, and has almost as delicate a note as the
carpenter's
tool of that name, when it dives into the
mystery of a white-oak log. Now, old gentleman,
you have done your duty, so creep to your kennel;
and here's something to cross your palm with.
God bless you, master Harvey, and young
masters
all! cried the old groom, as he retired with a
repetition of many formal bows.
We withdrew to our rooms, where, some time
after
we were in bed, we could hear the negroes
dancing
jigs to Carey's banjoe in the court-yard. In the
midst of these noises I sank to sleep,thus
terminating
a day that had been marked by a succession of
simple pastimes richly characteristic of country life.
CHAPTER XII.
AN EMBARRASSED LOVER.
The
ladies had announced their intention of
returning
to the Brakes before breakfast; and,
accordingly
,
the next morning soon after the dawn, the
court-yard was alive with the stir of preparation.
Horses, dogs and servants filled the enclosure with
a lively bustle, and the inmates of the house thronged
the door and porch. Bel, with the wholesome bloom
of the morning on her cheek, displayed those spirits
that belong to young and ardent girls when they are
conscious of being objects of admiration. She danced
about the hall, and sang short passages from songs
with a sweet and merry warbling.
We owe you our thanks, gentlemen, this
morning
,
said she, for Mr. Carey's saucy ditty last
night. And do you seriously call that croaking a
serenade, Edward?Cousin Harvey, I set down all
the impertinence of it to you. Well, help me to my
saddle, and when I am on horseback I will tell you
my mind. I am not afraid to speak when I have a
swift foot under me.
At this, Ned advanced somewhat officiously to
lead the animal which Bel was about to mount, up to
the steps.
No, no, Edward! said Bel, checking his
eagerness
to perform this service, I never want
assistance
to get into my seat when cousin Harvey is by;
I have trained him for my own use. See how well
he understands his duty!
Harvey came round to the stirrup side of the mare,
and stooping down, whilst he locked his two hands
so as to form a step:
Now, Bel, your left foot,so; bear on my
shoulder, and there you are, said he, as she obeyed
his instructions, and sprang lightly from the ground,
by the assistance of his hand, into the saddle.
I flatter myself, said Bel, that was gracefully
done. Have I not an excellent cavalier, Mr.
Littleton
,
to put me here with so little trouble?
It is seldom, I replied, that a gentleman finds
so ready a pupil.
Edward, continued Bel, how long would you
be learning such a feat?
Indeed, said Ned, I should readily take to
such a service, if my hand were deemed as worthy
of your slipper as your cousin Harvey's.
Then, replied Bel, come to the Brakes, and
perhaps I shall teach you to be useful in future.
Bring Mr. Littleton with you, and resolve to make
yourselves as agreeable as you can; for, in truth,
we have an especial need of gay friends. I am
afraid that even cousin Harvey will fall into our
moping humours, unless we can procure him merry
companions, and that very soon.
I have practised already, said Ned, with a
serious
air, too many antics to keep your favour. If
I grow worse on that score, it will be because it
gives you pleasure to see what a fool I can make of
myself. We shall not fail to visit the Brakes in a
very short time.
The sun is up, said Bel; so, fair betide you
all! Then speaking in an affectionate tone to the
petted animal on which she rode,Now, Grace,
forward.
The mare rose on her hind legs with an active
motion, and sprang off at a brisk speed.
Catharine had all this time been quietly mounting
by the aid of a chair, and talking in a subdued tone
to Prudence and the ladies around her. She now
said some amiable things at parting, urged Hazard
and myself to come to the Brakes, and rode forward
with a becoming propriety of gait, attended by Ralph;
Harvey had followed close at the heels of Bel
and before the rays of the sun had fallen below the
highest tree-tops, the equestrians were out of sight.
After breakfast, I found Hazard sitting at the
door, examining a small box of fishing tackle. A
few cane rods leaned against one of the pillars of the
porch, and Rip, together with a little ape-faced
negro
,
was officiously aiding in the inspection of the
lines, and teasing Ned with a catechism of
questions
appertaining to the purpose of his present
employment
;
their drift was to ascertain how far it
comported with his design to take them along
wherever he might be bent.
The day looks so well, said he to me, that I
am about to propose a ramble along the brook, and
we will take these rods with us, to help us to a little
pastime. `The angler, at the least, hath his
wholesome
walk and merry at his easeas the quaint
prioress
of Sopwell, I think, saysa sweet air of the
sweet savour of the mead flowers that maketh him
hungry:and if he take fish, surely no man is
merrier
than he is in his spirit.' We shall not want
conversation even if the fish should fail us.
Rip, and the flat-nosed pigmy that hung about
him in quality of henchman, were, of course, to
accompany
us. These two efficient auxiliaries were
forthwith despatched to procure bait. Away they
went,Rip at a bound across the railing of the
porch, and Belzebub, (such was Ned's appellative
for the black,) down the steps into the yard, with a
mouth distended from ear to ear, making somersets
over the green sward of the enclosure. In a few
moments the latter was on his way to the stable
with a long-handled hoe across his shoulder, and
a small tin vessel in his hand, to collect worms;
whilst Rip was following up some devoted
grasshoppers
across the lawn, and flapping down his
much-abused
beaver upon them, with a skill that showed
this to be a practised feat.
A brief delay brought in our active marauders
with an abundant spoil; and we then set forth on
our expedition, each provided with a long rod and its
appertenances; our young attendants shouldering
their weapons, and strutting before us with amazing
strides and important faces.
As we loitered along, we fell into a half-serious
conversation, which principally concerned the
persons
who had lately left us. Ned told me
anecdotes
of Harvey Riggs, and gave me many
particulars
relating to Catharine and Ralph; but it was
observable
that his notice of Bel was rather cursory
and insufficient. I perceived from the manner in
which he came up to this subject, and his immediate
retreat from it, and the repetitions of the same
stratagem
,
that Ned was rather anxious that I should
express
some curiosity to know more of Bel than he had
communicated. Finding this, it rather amused me to
disappoint him; because I was sure he would, after
a while, volunteer a more special revelation.
I need hardly say, after the details I have already
communicated in my previous sketches, that Ned
was pretty fairly in love with Bel. The truth was
notorious to the whole family, and, I believe, to all
the subordinates and dependants of Swallow Barn,
as much as any piece of country gossip could be
and that is saying a great deal. This was very
evident to me in the little incident in which Bel
surprised
him the day before. Besides, Rip, who is
inconveniently
shrewd in such matters, took occasion
this morning, just after the ladies left us on their
return
to the Brakes, to whisper to me, as we entered
the breakfast room, Uncle Ned wanted mightily to
lift Bel to her horse, because he likes the very ground
she walks on. And Harvey Riggs did not mince
matters when he spoke of it. Then, old Carey had
twisted it into his rhyme on the night before. Yet,
strange as it may appear, Ned, with all these proofs
against him, was such an owl as to think it a
profound
secret to all the world except himself. Such
is the hallucination of a gentleman afflicted with this
malady!
So great is the natural frankness of Hazard's
character
,
that all attempted concealments of his feelings
have a comic extravagance; and in this matter, his
zeal to disguise the truth now and then led him to
counterfeit an ill acted but most perilous indifference.
This was the cause of his inexpert efforts at raillery
upon his mistress; his continually falling pell-mell
upon her foibles, alarming her pride, laughing at
her conceits, and making unconscionable jests upon
points that women are not apt to endure. Instead
of haunting her society, like more skilful lovers, he
rather affected to regulate his approaches by the
rules of ordinary intercourse; was awkward in his
attentions; seemed to lose his intrepidity in her
presence
;
and, by some froward destiny, to be for ever
presenting himself to her view in those aspects which
were most likely to offend her conceptions of a lover.
Thus, his burlesque display of the night before,
though producing diversion, assailed some of her
most determinate prepossessions. I have said that
she had a vein of romance. This engendered some
fantastic notions touching propriety of manners, and
even gave her a predilection for that solemn foppery
which women sometimes call dignity and high
wrought refinement; and which, it has been already
perceived, did not enter in the slightest proportion
into any one motion of Ned Hazard. Her own
temper was exactly at war with this formal
pretension
;
but by a certain ply of her mind, picked up
perhaps in some by-path of education, or nurtured
by a fanciful conceit of the world, or left upon her
memory amongst the impressions of some character
she had been taught to admire, or peradventure
which is equally probablethe physical disclosure
in her organization of some peculiarly aristocratic
drop of blood inherited from some over-stately
grandam
,
and re-appearing at the surface after the lapse
of a century;from whatever cause, it was produced,
she considered an orderly, measured, graceful
movement
,
a choice adaptation of language, reverence
of deportment, and, above all, entire devotedness,
essential to the composition of, what she termed, a
refined gentlemana character which runs a fair
risk of being set down in the general opinion as
sufficiently
dull and insipid. Bel overlooks the total
absence of these gifts in Harvey Riggs, and says his
playfulness (she uses a soft expression) is quite
delightful
.
I explain this anomaly by the fact that
Harvey is entirely out of the question as a lover; and
that Bel has unwarily permitted her nature to
counsel
her opinion in Harvey's case; by reason of which,
her good-humoured cousin has taken the citadel of
her favour by surprise. Ned Hazard she regards in
quite a different light. Her sentinels are all at their
posts when he makes a demonstration.
I sometimes think there is a little spleen at the
bottom of Ned's treatment of Bel, a momentary
sub-acid fretfulness, occasioned by her professing to
VOL. I. 11
hold in estimation the grave and empty pedantry of
Singleton Swansdown, the very model of a delicate
and dainty gentleman. Bel says, he is so like the
hero of a novel; which Ned has once or twice
repeated
to me, with the remark, that it was cursed
fudge.
I have related enough to enable my reader to
comprehend
the spirit of the dialogue between Ned and
myself, that I am about to record. We had
reached
an old sycamore on the bank of the brook, and
had thrown our lines into a deep pool formed by the
narrow stream under the roots of the tree, and taken
our seats upon the grass in its shade. As I
expected
,
Ned had begun, at last, to talk more freely of
Bel; and I found that I was gaining rapidly upon his
confidence by the gravity with which I listened to
him. I affected total ignorance of his concern in this
question, and praised or dispraised with a judicial
impartiality. Ned particularly desired to open his
bosom to me on the love affair, but he found great
difficulty in contriving such a train of conversation
as might introduce it in a natural manner. I
remained
provokingly dull of apprehension. It is
universally
true, that no man of sober sense can, with any
decent face, disclose the fact of his being in love
even to his most intimate friend. He looks like a
fool, attempt it when he will.
Mark, said Ned; and here followed a pause,
in which he wore a strange look of discomfiture.
Well! said I, looking full in his face.
The beginning was too abrupt, so Ned evaded it
with
Bel's a lively girl.
Very.
Curse that little slippery minnow! said he, as
he pulled up his naked hook; it has nibbled away
three excellent baits; but I can't manage to get it
at the point of the hook.
Throw in again, Ned, said I, laughing,
perhaps
you will have better luck next time.
Littleton! here was another pause; did you
hear what a reproach Bel gave me for not having
been at the Brakes lately?
I cannot imagine how you should deserve it,
I remarked, living so near, too.
These women are always jealous of attentions;
said Ned. It is not above ten days since I was
there.
They exact a great deal of their lovers, I
replied
;
now I suppose she would have you trudging
there at least twice or three times a week, if she
had her way. But she is unreasonable, Ned. I
would not submit to it, I continued, in a bantering
tone, with a view to help him to a disclosure which
I began to perceive was likely to be protracted.
Lovers! said Ned, not, however, in any tone of
surprise.
He had it on his lips to follow up the word with a
full confession; but hesitating one moment, that unit
of time was fatal: his heart failed him, and like a
ship that misses her stays, he fell back again into the
wind.
If Bel Tracy had her way, he continued,
without
denying my imputation, she would have her
father's house filled with admirers through the whole
year. She would import them by the gross, and
change them with every voyage of the steamboat.
She is a perfect cormorant of admiration.
They do say, that your friend Swansdown looks
that way with an eager eye, and, if reports be true,
something is likely to come of it.
I thought if I could rouse Ned's jealousy a little,
he would come with a bolder front to the question,
and therefore I made the insinuation implied in this
remark. Ned answered with great promptness, and
an unusual degree of fire,
Never. Bel's a woman of good sense, and
discriminates
with remarkable acuteness. She has
some odd fancies, but it is all talk with her; she does
not act upon them. You may depend upon it she
has her working-day notions for use, and her
conceits
for holidays. She might tolerate Swansdown
on Sunday evening, but she would not give a
toy-puppet
for him on Monday morning.
I know how she discriminates, I replied; and
besides, I understand that her father likes the idea
very well. Bel is a dutiful girl, and does as her
father
bids her. Moreover, when a woman of a lively
imagination once permits her fancy to light upon a
lover, it is quite immaterial what manner of man he
be; the fancy is apt to settle the business for itself.
Swansdown, said Ned, alarmed by the
suggestion
which I had forced so confidently upon him,
and therefore rising into a tone of anger, is the
most preposterous assthe most lackered, tinselled
pretenderthe most unflavoured coxcomb in
Virginia
.
Weak, sir, weak as water-gruel; not fit to
stand by Bel Tracy's chair with a shawl when her
waiting-woman signifies she is going to walk. Sir,
he has nothing in him but a few tawdry shreds, which
are all shown in fifteen minutes. Bel Tracy will
none of him! I speak disinterestedly, I would not
associate with her, if I thought she could seriously
endure Singleton Swansdown.
No matter for all that, said I; Bel, as you
say, likes even the counterfeit of dignity, and that,
by all accounts, Swansdown possesses, at least.
Folly! cried Ned; I know she is touched
with that distemper, and that it does make a woman
impracticable. But her natural sense will get the
better of it. However, you may reason as you will
about it, I know that she does not care that for him,
(snapping his fingers,) I have reason to know it
personally
,
he continued, with some warmth.
What reason?
Damn it, if you will have it, I am in love with
her myself; exclaimed Hazard, with a petulant
emphasis
,
and then bursting out into a laugh. Mark,
you must not mention it: it is a foolish thing, that
will happen to a man when he has nothing to do. I
never told any one before; so keep it secret, as you
are my friend.
11 *
Is it possible! I returned: Why did'nt you tell
me before? Here have I been taking your part
against Bel Tracy all this time; and now it appears
I ought to have been on the other side.
I thought you would laugh at me, said he.
Indeed, I assure you upon my honour, I think to
be in love one of the most serious, nay solemn, things
in the world. And does she encourage you?
I should say so. You know there are a
thousand
little passages in a woman's life, that show how
her humour lies. You observed yesterday how she
spoke to me? and this morning when she insisted
upon
our coming to the Brakes? Trifles!but the
manner
of the thing! Besides, I frequently send her books,
and write notes with them, which she always
receives
without the least scruple.
Did you ever show her any very particular
attentions
?
Frequently. Almost whenever I had a chance.
As how?
Why I can hardly describe them. You saw that
ivory-handled riding-whip this morning? I presented
that to her.
The deuce you did!
She once said in my hearing, that she would
like to have some Cologne of a particular kind; so,
about three months afterwards, I brought her a large
supply from Richmond myself.
No!
And I have sent her, I suppose, at different times,
at least a dozen young partridges: she is fond of
raising them.
Indeed!
I made Hafen Blok one night, about a year ago,
go over to the Brakes, and play his fiddle for an hour
under her window.
There was something pointed in that! And
you went there, of course, yourself very often?
No, not very. It might have alarmed her; she
is very sensitive.
You spoke to her when you met, I suppose?
Mark, you are laughing at me, said Ned, all
at once aroused by my replies. But you know
these things depend entirely upon the circumstances
of time and place and looks, and many particulars
that I cannot give you an idea of.
Entirely, said I. But I think, after all, from
your account of your particular attentions, the lady
might be blind enough to mistake their import.
She could not mistake them, he replied,
because
all this was after I had addressed her.
So, ho! You addressed her then?
Like a most miserable varlet I did, replied Ned.
It was strange. But she acted with admirable
spirit. I'll tell you how it happened. About a year
ago I dined at the Brakes with a large company;
and we drank a great deal of champagne. I think
I must have been possessed with a devil, for I was
walking with Bel alone on the porch, after night-fall:
the moon was bright above us, and I was rattling
away more boldly than I ever did in my life before,
Some how or other she said something to me,
God knows what,but, by the faith of a gentleman,
I addressed her in downright English.
What then?
What then! She gave me the flattest refusal
you can conceive; and ran away laughing.
That was encouraging!
How could she have done otherwise? said
Ned. Bel Tracy is a girl of a nice sense of
propriety
,
and thought it impudent in me to propose in
that way. She laughs about it now, and says that
she knew I intended it as a joke. I don't think she
ever will believe that I am in earnest! However,
that made her acquainted with my design, and if,
after that, she received my advances well,don't
you think it looks as if something might come out of
it?Well, sir, since that I have rode out with her
twenty times.
Alone?
No. She always makes Ralph or Harvey
Riggs or somebody else of the party. But that shows
she is sensitive on the subject, and does not consider
it so much of a joke as she pretends.
Have you ever said any thing to her since?
Faith! I was so completely driven from my
wires that evening, that I never could touch the
subject
since.
Why, you always had the reputation of being a
brave man!
There is a great difference, said Ned,
between
bravery, man-ward and woman-ward. I
would as lief march up to an alligator, to box him
about the eyes in a pair of kid gloves, as come up
deliberately of a cool morning, in the drawing-room,
or any where else, to Bel Tracy, with a
straightforward
declaration of love. It is so hard to groove
such a thing into conversation. A man gets his
nerves flurried, and he can hardly talk on common
subjects, with such an intention in his head. I don't
know a single topic that one can take hold of with a
surety that it will bring him straight to the point.
You may depend upon it, that a man who addresses
a woman must go at it like a French rope-dancer,
hop on the rope without a word of introduction, and
trust to the balance-pole to preserve him through his
flourishes.
We must order this thing differently in future,
said I. I dare say, together we can find out her
exact opinion upon the subject.
If it should be after dinner, said Ned, I could
court her almost any day; for I should lay in as
much courage as the case required. It is mere
moonshine when a man is merry. But then, Bel
is so fastidious on that point, that she would be sure
to floor me at the first word.
And then, your fall would be so much the
greater
,
I added, in proportion to your previous
elevation
.
It is my opinion that we should try her with
cool heads.
Before we ended this discussion we had several
times changed our ground, and had, at this moment,
wandered to the inmost recess of a grove of tall
trees. Hazard, having eased his mind of its weight,
changed our topic, and directed my attention to the
scenery around us. The trees were principally
beech, poplar and sycamore, springing from a moist
carpet of matted grass. The forest was free from
underwood, except an occasional thicket of
blackberries
,
or a straggling grapevine swung across from
tree to tree, embracing the branches of both in its
serpent-like folds, or here and there where some
prim old maidish poplar, long and lean, was
furbelowed
with wild ivy, and in this sylvan millinery,
coquetted with the swaggering Zephyr that seemed
native to the grove. Through this sequestered shade
the stream crept, with a devious course, brattling, now
and then, at the resistance of decayed trunks that
accident had thrown across the channel, but quickly
after subsiding into silence. As we advanced, the
swarms of tadpoles darted from the shallows into
deeper water; the apple-bugs (as schoolboys call
that glossy black insect which frequents the summer
pools, and is distinguished for the perfume of the
apple
)
danced in busy myriads over the surface of the
still water; the large spider, resembling a wheel
without its rim, seemed to move in every direction
on his little seas, as if driven by the wind; and hosts
of small fish sprang upwards at every mote that fell
upon the stream. Occasionally the grey-squirrel
vaulted furtively across our path to some
neighbouring
tree; and our attention was frequently called to
the harmless water-snake, with his head thrust under
a stone, and the folds of his body glistening in the sun,
as the stream washed over him.
Rip and his goblin page, both of whom had been
long out of sight, were now in view. They had
grown weary of their patient employment, and were
wading through the brook with their trowsers drawn
above the knee, Rip leading the way and directing
the motions of Belzebub, who preserved an affected
subordination to his master, and imitated all his
gestures
with a grin of saucy good nature. They were
carrying on a pernicious warfare against the frogs,
and, by the capture of several distinguished
individuals
of the enemy, had spread consternation and
dismay along the whole riparian settlement;
insomuch
,
as Rip declared, That not a Frenchman
amongst them dared to show his goggle eyes through
the mud.
Hazard had taken some dozen of small fish, and
pursued his sport with the skill of an angler, whilst
I sat on the bank and watched the successive
depredations
of the game upon my bait, until, in an
attempt to land a voracious mullet, I lost my hook;
An evil fish, as the authority quoted by Ned
affirms
,
for he is so stronge enarmyd in the mouthe,
that there may no weke harnays hold him. The
sun had now travelled up to his meridian, and we
proposed a return. So, gathering up our spoils, and
calling in our skirmishers from the battle of the frogs,
we took up our line of march; the two dripping and
muddy mignons of our suite bringing up the rear,
each bearing a string of fish, hung by the gills upon
a willow rod. In this array we soon regained the
court-yard of Swallow Barn.
CHAPTER XIII.
A MAN OF PRETENSIONS.
It
is to be remarked in regard to all love affairs,
that whatever may be the embarrassment of the
disclosure
,
there is by no means the same difficulty in
conversing about them afterwards. When the ice
is once broken, your genuine lover is never tired of
talking about his mistress.
For twenty-four hours after our late ramble, Ned
talked, almost incessantly, upon the same subject.
He would let it drop for a moment, but he was sure
to come speedily back upon it with a new face, as if
it were a matter that required a serious deliberation;
and he would insinuate, that, in the present stage of
the business, my advice was important to determine
whether he should go on with it; although it was
easy enough to perceive that his mind was not only
quite made up, but keenly set upon the prosecution
of the affair. Then, he would affect to be greatly
undecided as to some minute particular of conduct.
Again, he had his doubts whether, upon the whole,
she really did encourage him. In this sentiment
he was sincere, although he endeavoured to persuade
himself that the matter was reasonably certain.
These doubts made him restless, droll and solemn;
VOL. I. 12
but again changing his mood, he presented the entire
action to me, from beginning to end, as a laughable
affair; and that would make him swear at it, and
say it was very queerunaccountable
extraordinary
;that
it put a man in such an awkward
situation
!
But his conclusion to it all was, that there was
no use in talking about it,matters had gone so far
that there was no alternative; he was committed on
the point of honour, and bound as a gentleman to
make his pretensions good. I vexed him a little by
saying I did not think so; and that if it was
distasteful
to him, I thought he was at liberty to retire when
he chose. This baulked his humour. So I
consented
to admit his premises for the future, and
allow
that he was bound in honour. With this
admission
he proceeded in his argument. It all amounted
to the same thing, and the only varieties I
discovered
after this, were in his positions. He argued it
perpendicularly, walking, jumping, dancing; then
horizontally, lolling over three chairs, stretched out
on a bed, and perched in the windows; then
manually
,
washing, dressing, whistling, singing and
laughing
.
In short, he behaved himself throughout the
whole debate, like a man in love.
We were at the height of this disquisition, on the
morning following Ned's first confessions, about an
hour before dinner, in my chamber, extended at full
length upon the bed, with our feet set up against the
bed-posts, when Rip came running in, almost out of
breath, saying, that if we wanted to see something
worth looking at, we should come down stairs
quickly, for there was Mr. Swansdown spinning up
to the house, and making the gravel fly like hail; and
there was aunt Prue, in the drawing room, fixing a
book before her in such a hurry! and Mrs. Winkle
scolding about the custards:And wasn't there
going
to be fun!
I went to the window, and could see the
phenomenon
that excited Rip's admiration approaching
the mansion like a meteor. A new light blue curricle,
with a pair of long-tailed bay horses in fine keeping,
driven by a gentleman of a delicate, emaciated
figure
,
and followed by a servant in livery, had just
entered the court-yard. The plate of the harness
and mouldings glittered with an astounding
brilliancy
in the sun, and the spokes of the wheels
emitted
that spirited glare that belongs to an equipage of
the highest polish. The horses were reined up at
the door, and the gentleman descended. It was
very evident that Mr. Singleton Oglethorpe
Swansdown
was a man to produce a sensation in the
country.
Hazard and myself repaired to the hall.
Meriwether
received his guest with the plain and cordial
manner that was natural to him. Mr. Swansdown
has a tall figure, and an effeminate and sallow
complexion
,
somewhat impaired perhaps by ill health,
a head of dark hair, partially bald, a soft black eye,
a gentle movement, a musical, low-toned voice, and
a highly finished style of dress. He was very
particular
in his inquiries after the family; and having
gone through many preliminary civilities, he was
shown to a chamber to make his toilet for dinner.
Soon afterwards, he appeared in the drawing room,
where he was remarkable for his sober, winning
affability
.
He flattered Mrs. Meriwether upon her
good health, and the fine appearance of the children.
Lucy and Victorine he thought were going to be
very beautiful (Lucy and Victorine both blushed:)
they made him feel old, when he recollected their
infant gambols: Master Philip (otherwise Rip) was
growing up to be a fine manly fellow, (at this, Rip
crept slyly behind him, and strutted in the opposite
direction with many grimaces,) it was time to give
up his nickname; he didn't like nicknames. He
was very complimentary to Prudence Meriwether,
which had a visible effect upon her, and made her
animated; and thought his friend Meriwether looked
younger and more robust than when they last met.
He told Hazard that he was very much wanting in
Richmond, by a party of ladies who were going off
to the North, and that he, Ned, had made a great
impression upon them. In short, Mr. Swansdown
seemed determined to please every body, by the
concern
which he manifested in their happiness; and
this was done with such a refined address, and such
practised composure, as to render it quite taking.
There is nothing equal to the self-possession of a
gentleman who has travelled about the world, and
frequented the circles of fashion, when he comes
into
a quiet, orderly, respectable family in the
country
.
It is pleasant to behold what delight he takes
to hear himself talk.
Swansdown had inherited from his father an
estate
on the Meherrin, in the most southern quarter
of Virginia. He was now about the prime of life,
and still a bachelor. Being, therefore, a gentleman
without much to keep him at home, he had recently
travelled over Europe, and was conversant in the
principal cities of this continent. He has twice
been very nearly elected to Congress, and ascribes
his failure to his not being sufficiently active in the
canvass. Upon this foundation he considers himself
a public man, and of some importance to the
government
.
It is remarked of him, that he is a very
decided
Virginian when he is out of the state, and a great
admirer of foreign parts when he is at home. His
memory is stored with a multitude of pretty sayings,
and many singular adventures that have befallen him
in his sundry travel, which he embellishes with a
due proportion of sentiment. He has the renown of
a poet and of a philosopher, having some years ago
published a volume of fugitive rhymes, and being
supposed now to be engaged in a work of a grave,
speculative character, which it is predicted will
reflect
credit upon the literature of the South.
That he is a bachelor is the fault only of his stars,
for he has courted a whole army of belles between
Maine and Georgia, in which divers wooings he has
been observed to do remarkably well for the first
two weeks; after which, somehow or other, he falls
off unaccountably. And it is said that he can
reckon more refusals on his head than a
thorough-paced
,
political office-hunter. He is what the sailors
12 *
call an unlucky ship. One misfortune in love
matters
makes many, and three are quite ill-omened in
the calculation of a high-toned, fashionable dame.
This calamity has been so often reduplicated upon
Swansdown, that it is thought he begins to lower his
pretensions, and talk in a more subdued tone upon
the subject. He is believed now to encourage the
opinion that your raging belles are not apt to make
the best wives; that a discreet lady, of good family
and unpretending manners, is most likely to make a
sensible man happy; great beauty is not essential;
the mad world of fashion is a bad school; and some
such other doctrines that indicate reflection, if not
disappointment.
In pursuance of this temperate philosophy, he is
supposed to be casting his eye about the country, and
investigating more minutely the products of those
regions over which he has hitherto travelled with too
much speed for accurate observation; like a
military
engineer whose first survey is directed to the
most prominent points of the ground, and who
retraces
his steps to make his examination of the
subordinate
positions.
From an intimacy of long standing between Mr.
Tracy and the father of Swansdown, the former
has a strong prepossession in favour of the son,
which is cherished by Singleton in a course of
assiduous
attentions, and, no doubt, enhanced in some
degree by the studied and formal cast of his
manners
.
Mr. Tracy does not fail to speak of him as a
man of excellent capacity and solid judgment; and
has therefore admitted him into a somewhat
confidential
relation. He says, moreover, that Singleton
is remarkably vivacious, and a man of attic wit.
This appears odd enough to those who have the
honour
of this worthy's society.
What I have said will explain how it came to pass
that this gentleman had been selected as Mr.
Tracy's
arbitrator in the question of the boundary line.
It was with a view to the final arrangement of this
subject that Swansdown had lately arrived at the
Brakes; and he had now visited Swallow Barn in
respect to that identical negotiation.
The ladies had just retired from the dinner-table,
and we were sitting over our wine, when Harvey
Riggs and Ralph Tracy rode up to the door. This
addition to our company gave a spur to the
conversation
of the table. Swansdown had become
animated
and eloquent. He descanted upon the
occasion
of his visit: that to gratify his old friend, Mr.
Tracy, he had prevailed upon himself to proffer his
services to terminate a difficult controversy, which,
he had been given to understand, was of some
duration
.
This was one of those imperfect obligations
which appertain to the relation of friendship. He
ventured to suggest an opinion, that the issue would
be auspicious to their mutual interests, and took leave
to indulge the hope, that neither of his amiable and
excellent friends would find occasion to regret the
arrangement.
Meriwether answered these diplomatic
insinuations
with a bend of the head that implied entire
acquiescence
,
and with an occasional remark that
showed the little importance he attached to the
matter
.
Ned and Harvey Riggs exchanged looks, drank
their wine, and listened to the oracle. Swansdown,
in the course of the evening, was continually
reminded
of something he had seen at Florence, or Vienna,
or other places. The river, which was visible from
our windows, put him in mind of the Lake of
Geneva
;
it only wanted the mountains. Then, he had
choice anecdotes to tell of distinguished personages
in Boston or New York; and a most pithy piece of
scandal that had transpired last winter at
Washington
.
Meriwether bowed his head again, but very
much like a man who was at a loss how to reply,
and continued to listen with the utmost suavity.
Harvey Riggs, however, often drew the discourse
into a parenthesis, as if to get at such subsidiary
particulars
as were necessary to elucidate the narrative,
and generally, by this mischievous contrivance, took
off the finish which the speaker studied to give to his
recital.
A neat little pamphlet of verses some time ago
made its appearance at Richmond, in hot press, and
on the finest paper. It was a delicate effusion of
superfine sentiment, woven into a plaintive tale; and
had dropped, apparently, from some amaranthine
bower formed by the sun-gilt clouds, as they floated,
on one vernal evening, over the fashionable quarter
of Richmond,it was so dainty in its array, and so
mysterious in its origin. From whence could it
come, but from the Empyrean, or from Hybla, said
the ladies of Richmond; or from the divine pen of
the fastidious and super-sentimental Swansdown?
Ned Hazard had brought this beautiful foundling to
Swallow Barn, and had given it to Prudence
Meriwether
to nurse. It was now upon the
window-seat
.
It is necessary to state, that amidst all the criticism
of Richmond, and the concurring determination of
every body to impute the verses to Swansdown, and
the consequent reiteration of that imputation by all
companies, he never gave a plain denial of his
paternity
;
but, on the contrary, took pleasure in hearing
the charge, and was so coquettish about the matter,
and insinuated such gentle doubts, that it was
considered
a case of avowed detection.
This dapper and delicious little poetical sally was
christened The Romaunt of Dryasdale, in the title
page, but was more generally known by the name of
The Lapdog Romance, which Harvey Riggs had
bestowed upon it.
I suppose you have seen this before? said
Hazard
to Swansdown, as he threw the book upon the
table before him.
Swansdown picked it up, hastily turned over the
leaves, smiled, and replied, It has made some stir in
its day. But things like this are not long-lived,
however
well executed. This seems to have kept its
ground much longer than most of its species.
The common opinion, said Ned, is not
backward
to designate its author.
Of course, replied Swansdown, if a man has
ever been guilty in his life of stringing couplets, he
becomes a scapegoat ever after. Is it not somewhat
strange that I should be perpetually charged with
this sort of thing? But it is long since I have
abandoned
the banks of the Helicon. I protest to you
I have not time for this kind of idling. No, no,
gentlemen, charge me with what indiscretion you
please, but spare me from the verses, as you are
Christian men!
If we could believe the rumours, said Harvey,
we should not doubt the origin of this effusion; but
I rely more on my own judgment. I can pretty
surely detect the productions of persons I am
acquainted
with: there is a spice, a flavour, in a man's
conversation, which is certain to peep out in the
efforts
of his pen. Now this work is diametrically
opposite
to every thing we know of Mr. Swansdown.
In the first place, it is studied and solemn, and wants
Swansdown's light and familiar vivacity. Secondly,
there is an affectation of elegance utterly at war
with his ordinary manners. Thirdly,
Oh, my dear sir, cried Swansdown, save me
from this serious vindication of my innocence. You
can't be in earnest in thinking any one believes the
report?
They do say so, replied Harvey, but I have
always defended you. I have said that if you chose
to devote your time in this way, something of a more
permanent and solid character would be given to the
world.
I have been bantered with it by my friends in
the North, added Swansdown, but that is a
gantlet
which every man, who dabbles in literature, must
expect to run.
I have forgotten the name of the poem, said
Meriwether, with innocent gravity.
It is called The Romaunt of Dryasdale, said
Swansdown.
Or The Lapdog Romance, added Ned.
Swansdown coloured slightly, and then laughed,
but without much heart.
Fill up your glass, Mr. Swansdown, said
Meriwether
,
the truth of wine is better than all the
fiction
of poetry. Is this thing much admired?
A good deal, replied Swansdown.
Amongst the young ladies of the boarding-school,
especially, said Harvey.
If I were disposed to criticise it, said Ned, I
should say that the author has been more successful
in his rhyme than in his story.
Yes, added Harvey, the jingle of the verse is
its great merit, and seems to have so completely
satisfied
the writer, that he has forgotten to bring the
story forward at all. I have never been able to make
out exactly what is the subject of it.
Then the sentiment, continued Hazard, in
which it abounds, is somewhat over-mystical;one
flight runs so into the other, that it is not very easy
to comprehend them.
That, said Harvey, is an admirable invention
in writing. The author only gives you half of what
he means, leaving you to fill up the rest for yourself.
It saves time, and enables him to crowd a great deal
into a small space.
At this, Swansdown gave another laugh, but
somewhat
dry and feeble.
There is another thing about this poem, said
Ned, it has some strange comparisons. There is
one here that Prudence has marked; I suppose she
has found out its meaning, and as that is a fortunate
enterprise, she has taken care to note it. The poet
has endeavoured to trace a resemblance between
the wing of Cupid and his mistress's breath; and he
sets about it by showing, that when Cupid takes a
flight on a spring morning, with his wings bound with
roses, he must necessarily, at every flutter, shake off
some of these odoriferous flowers; and then, as the
lady's breath is redolent of aromatic flavours, the
resemblance
is complete. I'll read the passage aloud,
if you please.
Meriwether, said Swansdown in evident
embarrassment
,
but still endeavouring to preserve a
face of gaiety, suppose we take a turn across your
lawn before dark?We want a little motion.
Wont you stay to hear this flight of Cupid?
asked Ned, taking up the book.
I have no doubt it is very fine, said
Swansdown
.
But your account of it is so much better,
that I should not like to weaken the impression
of it.
Saying this, he retreated from the dining room,
and waited at the front door for Meriwether, who
almost immediately followed.
In the evening our party played at whist;
Prudence
and the poet making partners against
Meriwether
and Harvey; whilst the rest of us sat round
as spectators of the game. Mr. Chub, as usual,
smoked his pipe in the porch, and the children slept
about the corners of the room. Swansdown had
grown dull, and his particularly accomplished
bearing
appeared somewhat torpid, except now and then,
when he had occasion to make an inquiry respecting
the game, which he did in a manner that no vulgar
whist-player may ever hope to emulate: as thus,
putting on an interrogative look, gently bending his
body forward, extending his left arm a little outward
from his breast, and showing a fine diamond ring on
his little finger, and asking with a smile,so soft
that it could hardly be called a smile,spades are
trumps?
VOL. I. 13
CHAPTER XIV.
MY GRAND UNCLE.
My
grand uncle Edward Hazard, the father of
Walter, was, from all accounts, a man of an active,
speculating turn. He was always busy in schemes
to improve his estate, and, it is said, threw away a
great deal of money by way of bettering his fortune.
He was a gentleman who had spent a considerable
portion of his life in England, and when he settled
himself, at last, in possession of his patrimony at
Swallow Barn, he was filled with magnificent
projects
,
which, tradition says, to hear him explain, would
have satisfied any man, to a mathematical
demonstration
,
that with the expenditure of a few thousand
pounds, Swallow Barn would have risen one
hundred
per cent in value. He was a very
authoritative
man, also, in the province; belonged frequently
to the House of Burgesses; and was, more than
once, in the privy council. The family now look
up to my grand uncle Edward, as one of the most
distinguished individuals of the stock, and take a
great deal of pride in his importance: they say he
was a most astonishing rake in London, and a
wonderful
speaker in the provincial legislature.
Connected with these two developments of his
character, there are two portraits of him at Swallow
Barn. One represents him in an embroidered coat
without a cape, a highly worked cravat, tied tight
enough round his neck to choke him, which makes
his eyes seem to start from their sockets; an
inordinately
bedizened waistcoat, satin small-clothes, silk
stockings, and large buckles in his shoes. His
complexion
is of the most effeminate delicacy, and his
wig seems to form a white downy cushion for a
small fringed cocked-hat. By the portrait, he could
not have been much above twenty years of age; and
his air is prodigiously conceited. The second
picture
exhibits only his bust. It presents a gentleman
with a fine, bluff, and somewhat waggish face, past
the meridian of life, arrayed in brown, with the
oratorical
expression of one about to make a speech.
Now it must be made known, that the tract of
land, called the Brakes, belonging to the Tracy
family, lies adjacent to Swallow Barn. In old times
the two estates were divided by a small stream that
emptied into the James River, and that is still known
by the name of the Apple-pie Branch. This rivulet
traverses a range of low grounds for some miles,
occasionally
spreading itself out into morasses, which
were formerly, and in some places are now,
overgrown
with thickets of arrow-wood, nine-bark, and
various other shrubs, the growth of this region. The
main channel of the stream through these tangled
masses, was generally distinct enough to be traced
as a boundary line, although the marsh extended
some distance from each bank. In the course of
this stream there is one point where the higher ground
of the country stretches in upon the bed of the marsh,
from either side, so as to leave a gorge of about a
hundred yards in width, from both of which
eminences
the spectator may look back upon the low
lands of the swamp for nearly a mile.
Just at that period of the life of my grand uncle
when his fever of improvement had risen to its
crisis, and when he was daily creating immense
fortunes,in his dreams,it struck him, upon
looking
at the gorge I have described, that with very
little
trouble and expense, he might throw a stout
breastwork from one side to the other, and have as
fine a mill-dam as any man could possibly desire.
It was so simple an operation that he was surprised
it had never occurred to him before. And then a
flour mill might be erected a short distance below,
which would cost but a trifle,and the inevitable
result would be, that this unprofitable tract of waste
land would thereupon become the most valuable
part of the estate.
I am told that it belonged to the character of my
grand uncle to fall absolutely in love with every new
project. He turned this one over in his mind for
two or three nights; and it became as clear to him as
daylight, that he was to work wonders with his mill.
So, reflecting that he had but sixteen irons in the
fire at this time, he went to work without a
moment's
delay. The first thing he did was to send an
ordr to Bristol, (for he never had any opinion of
the mechanics at home,) for a complete set of mill
machinery; and the second, to put up a house of
pine weather-boards, for the mill.
Contemporaneously
with this last operation, he set about the
dam; and, in the course of one summer, he had a
huge breastwork of logs thrown across the path of
the modest, diminutive Apple-pie, which would have
terrified the stream even if it had been a giant.
As soon as this structure was completed, the
waters
began to gather. My grand uncle came down
every day to look at them, and as he saw them
gradually
encroaching upon the different little mounds
of the swamp, it is said he smiled, and remarked to
his son Walter, whom he frequently took with him,
that it was strange to see what results were
produced
by human art. And it is also told of him,
that he made his way, during this rising of the
waters
,
to a tree in the bed of the dam, to notch with
his penknife a point to which the flood would
ultimately
tend; that, while stooping to take a level
with the breast of the dam, he lost his balance, and
was upset into a pool, formed by the encroaching
element; and that, when Walter expected to see
him in a passion at this mishap, he rose laughing,
and observed, that the bed of the dam was a
damned bad bed; which is said to be the only pun
that ever was made in the Hazard family, and
therefore
I have put it on record.
In a few days, with the help of one or two rains,
13 *
the dam was completely full; and, to the infinite
pleasure of my grand uncle, a thin thread of water
streamed over one corner of the dam,the most
beautiful little cascade in the world; it looked like a
glossy streamer of delicate white ribbon. My grand
uncle was delighted. There, my boy, said he to
Walter, there is Tivoli for you! We shall have our
mill a-going in a week.
Sure enough, that day week, off went the mill.
All the corn of the farm was brought down to this
place; and, for an hour or two that morning, the
mill clattered away as if it had been filled with a
thousand iron-shod devils, all dancing a Scotch reel.
My grand uncle thumped his cane upon the floor
with a look of triumph, whilst his eyes started from
his head, (so as to produce a wonderful resemblance
to his youthful picture,) as he frequently exclaimed to
the people about him, I told you so; this comes of
energy and foresight; this shows the use of man's
faculties, my boy!
It was about an hour and a half, or perhaps two
hours,as my authority affirms,after the
commencement
of this racket and clatter in the mill, that
my grand uncle, and all the others who were intent
upon the operation, were a little surprised to
discover
that the millstone began to slacken in its speed;
the bolting cloth was manifestly moving lazily, and
the wheels were getting tired. Presently, a dismal
screech was heard, that sounded like all the
trumpets
of Pandemonium blown at once; it was a
prolonged
,
agonizing, diabolical note that went to the
very soul.
In the name of all the imps of Tartarus, and
blackguard fiends of Acheron!(a famous
interjection
of my grand uncle,) what is that? It's only
the big wheel stopped as chock as a tombstone,
said the miller, and it naturally screeches, because,
you see, the gudgeon is new, and wants grease.
Hereupon a court of inquiry was instituted; and,
leading the van, followed by the whole troop, out
went my grand uncle to look at the head-gate.
Well, not a thing was to be seen there but a large
solitary bull-frog, squatted on his hams at the
bottom
of the race, and looking up at his visiters with
the most piteous and imploring countenance, as much
as to say, I assure you, gentlemen, I am
exceedingly
astonished at this extraordinary convulsion, which
has left me, as you perceive, naked and dry. Then
the court proceeded upon their investigation towards
the dam, to observe how that came on.
I can readily imagine how my grand uncle looked,
when the scene here first presented itself to his view.
It must have been just such a look as Sir Peter
Teazle
is made to put on, when the screen falls: a look
of droll, waggish, solemn, silent wonder, which, for
the time, leaves it a matter of perfect doubt whether
it is to terminate in a laugh or a cry. In the first
place, the beautiful ribbon cascade was clean gone.
In the second, there were all the little tussocks of the
swamp, showing their small green heads above the
surface of the water, which would hardly have covered
one's shoe-top; and there were all the native shrubs
of the marsh, bending forwards, in scattered groups,
like a set of rose bushes that had been visited by a
shower; dripping wet, and having their slender stalks
tangled with weeds; and there was, towards the
middle, a little line of rivulet meandering down to
the edge of the dam, and then holding its
unambitious
course parallel with the breastwork, deploying
to the left, where it entered the race, and tripping
along gently, down to the very seat of the bull-frog.
Hoity, toity, cried my grand uncle, after he had
paused long enough to find speech, here is some
mistake in this matter!
Now, it is a principle of physics, that an
exhausted
receiver is the worst thing in the world to make a
draught upon. The mill-dam was like a bank that
had paid out all its specie; and, consequently, could
not bear the run made upon it by the big wheel,
which, in turn, having lost its credit, stopped
payment
with that hideous yell that wrought such a
shock upon the nerves of my grand uncle.
In vain did the old gentleman ransack the stores
of his philosophy, to come at this principle. He
studied the case for half an hour, examined the dam
in every part, and was exceedingly perplexed.
Those rascals of muskrats have been at work,
said he. So, the examination was conducted to this
point; but not a hole could be found. The soil is
a porous, open, filtrating kind of soil, said the old
gentleman.
It seems to me, master, said an arch looking
negro, who was gaping over the flood-gate upon the
muddy waste, that the mill's run out of water.
Who asked you for your opinion, you
scoundrel
?
said my grand uncle in a great fury,for he
was now beginning to fret,get out of my sight,
and hold your tongue!
The fellow is right, said the miller, we have
worked out the water, that's clear!
It's a two-hour-mill, added the negro, in a voice
scarcely audible, taking the risk of my grand
uncle's
displeasure, and grinning saucily but
goodhumouredly
,
as he spoke.
It is said that my grand uncle looked up at the
black with the most awful face he ever put on in his
life. It was blood-red with anger. But, bethinking
himself for a moment, he remained silent, as if to
subdue his temper.
There was something, however, in the simple
observation
of the negro, that responded exactly to my
grand uncle's secret thoughts; and some such
conviction
rising upon his mind, gradually lent its aid to
smother his wrath. How could he beat the poor
fellow
for speaking the truth! It was,and he now saw
it written in characters that could no tbe mistaken,
it was, after all his trouble, and expense, and fond
anticipations
,
a two-hour-mill.
Stop the mill, said my grand uncle, turning
round, and speaking in the mildest voice to the
miller
,
stop the mill; we shall discontinue our work
to-day.
'Squire, replied the miller, the mill has been as
silent as a church for the last hour.
True, said my grand uncle, recollecting
himself
;
come Walter, we will mount our horses, and
think over this matter when we get home. It is very
extraordinary! Why did'nt I foresee this? Never
mind, we will have water enough there to-morrow,
my boy!
He slowly went to the fence corner, and untied
his horse, and got up into his saddle as leisurely as if
he had been at a funeral. Walter mounted his,
and they both rode homeward at a walk; my grand
uncle whistling Malbrouk all the way, in an under
key, and swinging his cane round and round by the
tassel.
CHAPTER XV.
THE OLD MILL.
It
fortunately happened that a tolerably wet
season
followed this first experiment of the mill. But
with all the advantages of frequent rains, the
mortifying
truth became every day more apparent, that my
grand uncle's scheme of accommodating the
neighbourhood
with a convenient recourse for grinding
their corn, was destined to be baulked, in the larger
share of its usefulness, by that physical phenomenon
which was disclosed to him on the first day of his
operations; to wit, that his capacious reservoir was
emptied in a much more rapid ratio than it was
filled. It was like a profligate spendthrift whose
prodigality exceeded his income. The consequence
was that the mill was obliged to submit to the
destiny
of working from one to two hours in the
morning
,
and then to stop for the rest of the day, except
in the very wet weather of the spring, (and then
there was no great supply of corn,) in order, by the
most careful husbandry, to wring from the reluctant
little water-course a sufficient fund for the next day's
employment.
This was a serious loss to the country around;
for my grand uncle had talked so much about his
project, and extolled his benefaction so largely, that
the people had laid out their accounts to take all their
grist to his mill. They came there, all through the
summer, in crowds; and nothing was more common
than to see a dozen ruminative old horses, with as
many little bare-legged negroes astride upon them,
with the large canvass mill-bags spread out for
saddles
,
all collected of a morning round the mill door,
each waiting for his turn to get his sack filled.
Sometimes these monkeys were fast asleep for hours
on their steeds; and sometimes they made great
confusion about the premises with their wild shouts,
and screams, and rough-and-tumble fights in which
they were often engaged. But it invariably fell out
that at least half were disappointed of their errands,
and were obliged to attend the next day. In the
dry spells the mill stopped altogether. These things
gave great dissatisfaction to the neighbourhood, and
many good customers abandoned the mill entirely.
I am told, also, that the old gentleman was
singularly
unfortunate in his choice of a miller. He had
a great giant of a fellow in that station, who was
remarkable
for a hard-favoured, knotty, red head, and
a particularly quarrelsome temper. So that it often
happened, when the neighbours expostulated in
rather too severe terms against the difficulty of
getting
their corn ground, this functionary, who was a
little of the mould of the ancient miller in the mother
country, made but few words of it, and gave the
remonstrants
a sound threshing, by way of bringing
them to reason. Then again, the dam formed a
large pestilent lake, and, by its frequent exposure of
the bottom to the sun, engendered foul vapours that
made the country, in the autumn, very unhealthy.
These circumstances, in process of time, worked
sadly to the disparagement of my grand uncle's
profits
,
and set the people to talking in harsh terms
against his whole undertaking. They said the worst
thing they could of it, That it was a blasted
thun-dergust
mill, and not worth a man's while to be
fooling about it with his corn, as long as he could
get it ground any where else, if it was ten miles
off!
In process of time the miller was turned away:
and then the machinery got out of order, and my
grand uncle would not repair; and so that mill came
to a dead halt. Following the course of nature, too,
the dam began to manifest symptoms of a premature
old age. First, the upper beams decayed by the
action
of the sun upon them; after these, the lower
parts of the structure broke loose. But what with
drift wood, and leaves, and rubbish, the mound, which
constituted the breastwork, remained sufficiently
firm to support the pond for some years. It was a
famous place for black snakes and sun fish in
summer
,
and wild ducks in winter. All this time the
stream found a vent through an opening that had
been worn in the breastwork; and, consequently,
the race had become entirely dry, and grown over
with grass.
Year after year the surface of the pond grew
gradually
VOL. I. 14
less. It retreated slowly from its former edge,
and became narrower. At length, at the breaking
up of one unusually boisterous, wet and surly winter,
there came on, in the month of March, a week of
heavy and incessant rain. This celebrated week
closed with one of the most furious tempests ever
remembered
in that part of the country. The heavens
poured down their wrath upon the incontinent
mill-dam
;
the winds rushed, with a confounding energy,
over this desolate tract, driving the waters before
them in torrents; and away went the rickety old
breastwork, with all the imprisoned pool behind it.
The next morning the tempest subsided. The
sun smiled again over the chilly scene; and there
was the fuming and affrighted little Apple-pie, in all
its former insignificance. Not a trace of the
breastwork
was left; and there was to be seen the foul
and slimy bed of the mill pond, exposed in shocking
nakedness to the eye. Long green tresses of weed,
covered with the velvet of many years' accumulation
beneath the surface of the water, lay strewed about,
wherever any stubborn shurb occurred to arrest their
passage; huge trunks of trees, moss-grown and
rotten
,
were imbedded upon the muddy surface; briers,
leaves, and other vegetable wrecks were banked up
on each other in various forms, mingled, here and
there, with the battered and shapeless carcasses of
the smaller vermin that frequented the pond. The
wind swept with a brisk and whistling speed over
this damp bottom, and visited, with a wintry
rigour
,
the shivering spectators whom curiosity had
attracted to witness the ravages of the night; but, in
the midst of all, the feeble and narrow Apple-pie
shot hastily along, with a turbid stream, pursuing his
course through, under, and around the collected
impediments
in his path, as near as possible in the very
same channel which, ten or fifteen years before, he
had been wont to inhabit; as if unconscious that this
disturbance in the face of nature could be attributed,
in the slightest degree, to such an inefficient and
trifling
imp as himself: by no means an unimpressive
type of the confusion and riot which the most sordid
and paltry passions may produce in the moral world,
when suffered to gather up and gangrene in the
system
.
As I have introduced this narrative to make my
reader acquainted with the merits of the controversy
relative to the boundary line, it is necessary that I
should inform him, that when my grand uncle first
entered
upon this project of the mill, he immediately
opened a negotiation with Mr. Gilbert Tracy, his
neighbour,who was at that time the proprietor of the
Brakes,for the purchase of so much of the land, or
rather of the marsh, which lay eastward of the
Apple-pie
Branch, as was sufficient for the projected
mill-dam
.
I have already told my readers that the Branch
itself was the dividing line between the two estates;
and, consequently, my grand uncle was already in
possession of all westward of that line. In his
communications
with Mr. Gilbert Tracy on this subject,
he unfolded his whole scheme, and, without the
least difficulty, obtained the purchase he desired.
There were several letters passed between them,
which stated the purpose contemplated; and the
deed that was executed on the occasion also recites,
that Edward Hazard, Esquire, of Swallow Barn,
conceiving it to be a matter of great importance to
the good people residing on, frequenting and using
the lands in the vicinage of the stream of water,
commonly known and called by the name of the
Apple-pie Branch, that a convenient and
serviceable
mill, adapted to the grinding of wheat, rye, and
Indian corn, should be constructed on the said
Apple-pie
,
&c.: And also, that the said Edward Hazard,
Esquire, having carefully considered the capacity,
fall, force of water, head and permanency of the said
Apple-pie Branch for the maintenance and supply
of a mill as aforesaid; and being convinced and
certified
of the full and perfect fitness of the same, for
the purposes aforesaid; the said Gilbert Tracy
transferred, &c., a full title to so much of the said
land as it may be found useful and necessary to
occupy
in the accomplishment of the said design, &c.;
the said Edward Hazard paying therefor at the
rate of one pound, current money of Virginia, for
each and every acre thereof.
By this conveyance, the western limit of the
Brakes was removed from the channel of the Branch
to the water edge of the mill-pond, as soon as the
same should be created.
My grand uncle, after the failure of his scheme,
could never bear to talk about it. It fretted him
exceedingly
;
and he was sure to get into a passion
whenever it was mentioned. He swore at it, and
said a great many harsh things; for, I am told, he
was naturally a passionate man, and was not very
patient under contradiction. He would not even go
near the place, but generally took some pains, in his
rides, to avoid it. When they told him that the storm
had carried away the dam, he broke out with one
of his usual odd kind of oaths, and said, he was
glad of it; it was a hyperbolical, preposterous
abortion
;he
must have been under the influence of the
moon when he conceived it, and of Satan when he
brought it forth; and he rejoiced that the winds of
heaven had obliterated every monument of his folly.
Besides this, he said many other things of it equally
severe.
The date of this freak of the old gentleman was
somewhere about the middle of the last century.
The ruin of the mill is still to be seen. Its roof has
entirely disappeared; a part of the walls are yet
standing, and the shaft of the great wheel, with one
or two of the pinions attached, still lies across its
appropriate
bed. The spot is embowered with ancient
beech trees, and forms a pleasant and serene picture
of woodland quiet. The track of the race is to be
traced by some obscure vestiges, and two mounds
remain, showing the abutments of the dam. A range
of light willows grows upon what I presume was
once the edge of the mill-pond; but the
intervening
marsh presents now, as of old, its complicated
14 *
thickets of water plants, amongst which the
magnolia
,
at its accustomed season, exhibits its beautiful
flower, and throws abroad its rich perfume.
Before the period of the Revolutionary war, Gilbert
Tracy paid the debt of nature. The present
proprietor
,
his eldest son, inherited his estate. Old
Edward
Hazard figured in that momentous struggle,
and lived long enough after its close to share, with
many gallant spirits of the time, the glories of its
triumph
.
Isaac, the son of his old friend, preserved a
neutral position in the contest; and, being at heart
a thorough-going loyalist, the intercourse between
him and the family at Swallow Barn grew rare and
unsocial. The political principles of the two
families
were widely at variance; and, in those times,
such differences had their influence upon the private
associations of life. Still it is believed, and I suppose
with some foundation for the opinion, that the good
offices of my grand uncle, secretly exerted, and
without
even the knowledge of Mr. Tracy, had the effect
to preserve the Brakes from confiscation,the
common
misfortune of the disaffected in the war: An
affectionate remembrance of his old friend Gilbert,
and the youth of the successor to the estate at that
time, being imagined to have actuated Edward
Hazard
in this manifestation of kindness.
My grand uncle, very soon after the peace, was
gathered to his fathers, and has left behind him a
name, of which, as I have before remarked, the
family
are proud. Amongst the monuments which
still exist to recal him to memory, I confess the old
mill, to me, is not the least endearing. Its history
has a whimsical bearing upon his character,
illustrating
his ardent, uncalculating zeal; his sanguine
temperament
;
his public spirit; his odd perceptions;
and that dash of comic, headstrong humorousness
that, I think, has reappeared, after the shifting of
one generation, in Ned.
I, accordingly, frequently go with Ned to this spot;
and, as we stretch ourselves out upon the grass, in
the silent shade of the beech trees, or wander around
the old ruin, the spot becomes peopled to our
imaginations
with the ancient retainers of Swallow Barn;
the fiery-headed miller; the elvish little negroes who
have probably all sunk, hoary-headed, to the grave,
leaving their effigies behind, as perfect as in the days
when they themselves rode to mill; and last of all,
our venerable ancestor.
Out of these materials, we fabricate some amusing
and touching stories.
CHAPTER XVI.
PROCEEDINGS AT LAW.
It
was about the year 1790, that my uncle
Walter
began to turn his attention to the condition of the
Apple-pie frontier.
Until this time, ever since the miscarriage of the
unfortunate enterprise of the mill, this part of the
domain
had been grievously neglected. It was a
perfect
wilderness. No fences had ever been erected,
on either side, to guard the contiguous territories
from encroachment; and there were numerous
cow-paths
leading into the thickets, which afforded a
passage, though somewhat complicated, from the
one estate to the other. The soil was cold and
barren
,
and no cultivation, therefore, was expended upon
this quarter. In fact, it may be said to have
belonged
to the colts, pigs, heifers, racoons, opossums and
rabbits of both proprietors. The negroes still
consider
it the finest place in the whole country to catch
vermin, as they call the three latter species of animals;
and I myself, frequently in my ranges through this
region, encounter their various gins and snares set in
the many by-paths that cross it.
The tract of marsh land, occupied by the dam in
old times, did not exceed, on the Tracy side of the
Branch, above thirty acres. It was a slip of about
half a mile in length, and perhaps, at its widest part,
not more than two hundred yards broad, that
bordered
on that side of the Branch. This slip, of course,
constituted the subject matter of my grand uncle's
purchase from Mr. Gilbert Tracy.
It occurred to Walter Hazard, about the period I
have referred to above, that this bottom might be
turned to some account, if it were well drained,
cleaned of its rank growth of brushwood, and
exposed
to the sun and then set in grass. It would
doubtless, he thought, make an excellent pasture for
his cattle; and, at all events, would contribute to
render the surrounding country more healthy.
If my uncle Walter had been a man in the least
degree given to superstitious influences, he would
have seen, in the ill-fated schemes of his father in
this direction, the most inauspicious omens against
his success in his contemplated achievement. But
he was a man who never thought of omens, and was
now altogether intent upon adding a rich and
convenient
meadow to his estate.
It seemed that the Apple-pie was to be the fountain
of an Iliad of troubles to the Hazard family.
When Walter Hazard was ready to go to work,
somewhere about midsummer, he turned in twenty
hands upon the marsh, and forthwith constructed
some rectangular ditches, traversing it upon both
sides of the branch, sufficiently near to carry off the
water. Whilst he was employed at this work, and
not dreaming of any other obstacles than those that
were before his eyes, he was exceedingly surprised
to receive a letter from Mr. Isaac Tracy, which, in
the most friendly and polite terms, intimated that the
writer had just been made acquainted with Captain
Hazard's (my uncle always bore this title after the
war,) design of draining the marsh; and regretted to
learn that he had assumed a proprietary right over a
portion of the domain that appertained to the Brakes.
The letter proceeded to acquaint my uncle that this
infringement involved a question affecting the family
dignity; and, therefore, it was suggested, that it
became
necessary to remonstrate against it, more from
considerations of a personal nature, than from any
regard to the value of the soil thus brought into
dispute
.
Now it so happened that Mr. Tracy had, for
some time past, been revolving in his mind this
subject
,
to wit,the right of ownership over the bed of
the mill-dam, after the accident that brought it again
into the condition in which it existed before the
erection
of the mill. He had examined the deed from
his father, part of which I have recited in a former
chapter, and that document favoured the conclusion,
that as the grant had been made for a specific
purpose
,
the failure of that purpose restored the original
owner to all his former prerogatives.
This brought him to studying the law of the
matter
,
and he soon became perfectly assured that he
understood all about it. In short, he took up a bold,
peremptory and dogged opinion, that he was in,as
he remarked,of his former estate: that it was a
grant
durante
the existence of the mill-pond; a
feoffment
defeasible upon condition subsequent, and a
dozen such other dogmas which tickled the worthy
gentleman excessively, when they once made a
lodgment
in his brain. There is nothing in the world, I
believe, that produces a more sudden glory in the
mind, than the first conceits of a man who has made
some few acquisitions in an abstruse science: he is
never at rest until he makes some show of his stock
to the world; and I have observed that this remark
is particularly applicable to those who have got a
smattering of law. Mr. Tracy ran off with the thing
at full speed. He affected to consult his lawyer
upon the matter, but always silenced all attempts of
that adviser to explain, by talking the whole time
himself, and leaving him without an answer.
It was in the height of this fevour that he received
the information of my uncle's proceedings; and it
was with a kind of exultation and inward chuckling
over the certainty of his rights, that he sat down and
addressed Captain Hazard the letter of which I have
spoken. There was another sentiment equally
active
in Mr. Tracy's mind to spur him on to this
action
.
The lord of a freehold coming by descent
through two or three generations, and especially if he
be the tenant in tail, is as tenacious as a German
Prince of every inch of his dominions. There is a
segniorial pride attached to his position, and the
invasion
of the most insignificant outpost conveys an
insult to the lawful supremacy; it manifests a
contemptuous
defiance of the feudal dignity. Mr. Tracy
felt all this on the present occasion, and, perhaps,
rather more acutely in consequence of the partial
alienation between his own and his neighbour's
family
,
produced by the late political events, and which
was, at this period, but very little removed.
The letter came upon my uncle like a gauntlet
thrown at his feet. He was somewhat choleric in
temper, and his first impulse was to make a quarrel
of it. It seemed to him to imply a dishonest
intrusion
.
However, when he came to consider it more
maturely, he could find no fault either with its tone
or its temper. It was a frank, polite and seemly
letter enough: If it was Mr. Tracy's land, said
my uncle, he certainly had a right to say so: and
in truth, as he thought more about it, he came to
the conclusion that it looked well to see a gentleman
inclined to stand by his rights: it was what every
man of property ought to do!
In this feeling, my uncle wrote his reply to Mr.
Tracy's letter, and filled it with every observance of
courtesy, but, at the same time, steadily gainsaying
his neighbour's opinions of the right, and desiring
that the matter should be investigated for their
mutual
satisfaction. This communication was
followed
by the instant withdrawal of his people from the
debatable ground, and, for the time, with an
abandonment
of the meadow scheme.
Never were there, in ancient days of bull-headed
chivalry, when contentious monk, bishop or knight
appealed to fiery ordeal, cursed morsel, or wager of
battle, two antagonists better fitted for contest than
the worthies of my present story. My uncle had
been a seasoned campaigner of the Revolution, with a
sturdy soul set in an iron frame, and had grown, by
force of habit, a resolute and impregnable defender
of his point. Mr. Tracy, I have already described
as the most enamoured man in the world of an
argument
.
And here they were, with as pretty a field
before them as ever was spoiled by your
peace-makers
.
The value of the controversy not one groat;
its issue, connected with the deepest sentiment that
lay at the bottom of the hearts of both,the pride
of conquest!
Mr. Tracy's first measure was to write a long
dissertation upon the subject, in the shape of an
epistle
,
to my uncle. It was filled with discussions upon
reversionary interests, resulting uses, and all the
jargon
of the books, plentifully embellished with a
prodigious
array of learning, contained in pithy Latin
maxims, in which the lawyers are wont to invest
meagre and common thoughts with the veil of
science
.
It was filled, moreover, with illustrations and
amplifications and exaggerations, the fruit of a
severe
and learned study of his case by the writer.
Then followed my uncle's reply, in which it was
clear that he did not understand a word of the
argument
that was intended to prostrate him. After this
came rejoinder and surrejoinder, and reduplications
of both, poured in by broadsides. Never was there
so brisk a tourney of dialectics known on the banks
of the James River! The disputants, now and then,
VOL. I. 15
became sharp, and my uncle, whenever this was
the case, obtained a decided advantage by a certain
caustic humour, that he handled with great dexterity.
Eventually, as it might have been foreseen, they
resolved
to go to law, and institute an amicable
ejectment
.
Here a difficulty arose. It was hard to
determine
which should be plaintiff, and which defendant;
since it was not quite clear who was in possession.
Mr. Tracy insisted, with all imaginable politeness,
upon making my uncle the compliment of appearing
as the plaintiff in the action, which the latter
obstinately
refused, inasmuch as he was unwilling it
should be understood by the world that the suit had
been one of his seeking. This was adjusted, at last,
by Mr. Tracy's commencing the proceeding himself.
It began in the county court; and then went to the
superior court; and then to the court of appeals.
This occupied some years. All the decisions, so far
as they had gone, had been in favour of my uncle;
but there were mistakes made in important points,
and proofs omitted, and papers neglected to be filed.
Mr. Tracy was deeply vexed at the issue, and waxed
warm. So, the whole proceedings were commenced
anew, and carried a second time through the same
stages. The principal points were still in my uncle's
favour. His antagonist bit his lips, affirmed the
utter
impregnability of his first positions, and resolved
not to give up the point. Never was there a case so
fruitful of subdivisions! Jury after jury was brought to bear upon it; and twenty times every trace of the
original controversy was entirely out of sight. At
length they got into chancery, and then there was
the deuce to pay!
Year after year rolled away, and sometimes the
pretty little quarrel slept, like the enchanted
princess
,
as if it was not to wake again for a century.
And then again, all of a sudden, it was waked up,
and shoved and tossed and thumped and rolled and
racketed about, like Diogenes' tub.
It was observable, throughout all this din and
bustle, that Mr. Tracy was completely driven out
of every intrenchment of law and fact; which, so
far from having the effect of moderating his opinion
or his zeal, set him into a more thorough and
vigorous
asseveration of his first principles.
He affirmed that the juries were the most
singularly
obtuse and obstinate bodies he had ever
encountered
;
and that the courts were, beyond all
question, the most incurably opinionated tribunals
that ever were formed.
In the height of this warfare, the death of the
defendant
,
my uncle, occurred; which for some years
again lulled all hostilities into a profound slumber.
After a long interval, however, the contest was
resumed
;
and it now fell to the lot of Frank
Meriwether
to enter the lists. No man could be more
indisposed
by nature to such an enterprise; and it was
plainly discernible that our old friend of the Brakes
was also beginning, in his old age, to relax into a
pacific
temper.
It must be remarked, that during the latter years of
this struggle the two families had grown to be upon a
very intimate footing, and that at no period had the
legal disquiets the least influence whatever upon the
private regards of the parties.
In order, therefore, to get rid of the troubles of
carrying
on the debate, Frank Meriwether had thrown
out some hints of a disposition to settle the whole
affair
by a reference to mutual friends; and would
gladly at any time have relinquished all claim to the
disputed territory, if he could have contrived to do
so without wounding the feelings of his neighbour,
who was now singularly tenacious to have it appear
that his only object in the pursuit was to vindicate
his first decided impressions. The old gentleman,
therefore, readily agreed to the arbitration, and still
fed his vanity with the hope that he should find in
the private judgment of impartial men, a sound,
practical, common sense justification of his original
grounds in the controversy.
This result is to be risked upon the opinions of
Singleton Oglethorpe Swansdown and Philpot Wart,
Esquires, who are immediately to convene for the
consideration of this momentous subject.
CHAPTER XVII.
STRANGE SYMPTOMS.
My
reader will recollect, that before my
digression
to show the merits of the question touching the
boundary line, I left Mr. Swansdown seated, after
tea, at a game of whist. This game is a special
favourite
in the low country of Virginia, and possesses
an absorbing interest for Meriwether. Prudence
is not behind her brother either in the skill or the
devotion
of a thorough-bred player; and Harvey Riggs
may very justly be set down as pre-eminent in this
accomplishment. The poet and philosopher was the
only one of the party at the table who may be said
to have ever been at fault during the evening.
I do not pretend myself to be well versed in the
mysteries of this silent and cogitative recreation; but
I have often had occasion to observe that a genuine
whist-player is apt, for the time, to be one of the most
querulous of mortals. He makes fewer allowances
for the frailty of his brethren than any other member
of society. The sin of not following suit, or losing a
trick, or not throwing out a good card in the right
place, is, in his eyes, almost inexpiable, and does not
fail to bring down upon the delinquent that sharp,
unmitigated and direct rebuke that implies, you
15 *
must be a blockhead, or you never would have
thought of doing so stupid a thing! This is
sometimes
insinuated in a look, sometimes conveyed in
a question, and often inferred by a simple
ejaculation
.
Swansdown was not unfrequently taken to task
by his antagonists. Harvey Riggs would stop, put
down his cards upon the table, and, with a biting
affectation
of mildness, observe, Really, Mr.
Swansdown
,
if I could only count upon your observing the
rules of the game, I should know what to play; but
as it is, I am exceedingly perplexed! Even Frank
Meriwether, with all his benignant impulses, would
sometimes throw himself back into his chair, and
putting his hand across his forehead, would draw it
slowly down to his chin, as if studying a contingency
which, from the play of the other party, had baffled
his calculations: and sometimes he would break out
into an interjectional whistle, and come down
suddenly
with a card upon the table, as he said, Now,
Mr. Swansdown, I believe you have given me that
trick! To all these implied imputations against his
dexterity, the gentleman would reply in the most
polite
manner imaginable,with a lambent smile upon
his features,by a compliment to the superior
address
of his partner, expressive of his reliance upon
her ability to rescue him from the fatal tendency of
his own errors.
It was quite perceivable that Prudence by no
means joined in this vituperation of her coadjutor;
but, on the contrary, frequently checked the license
of the other two, and said many things in
extenuation
of his aberrations from the laws of the game.
Indeed, I thought she carried this vindication further
than his case required. But it never failed to
produce
a grateful recognition from him, and a frequent
attempt to excuse himself upon the ground, that Miss
Prudence had herself to blame, as her conversation
was very much calculated to seduce such a tyro as
he was, from the proper study of his part in the play.
At all such sallies, Prudence looked modestly;
readjusted
herself in her seat, and smiled upon the
poet.
Before the party broke up, the lady was quite
animated
.
Her demeanour was characterized by a
certain
restless attempt at composure, and a singularly
vivacious kind of sobriety,partly sentimental,
partly
witty, and exceedingly lady-like. I will not say
she had designs upon the peace of our new guest,
but it looked prodigiously like it!
When she retired to her chamber, she was
manifestly
under some serious or strange influences. It is
reported of her, that she sang one or two plaintive
songs; showed a slight disposition to romp, above
stairs, with Lucy and Vic; then she took a seat in
her open window, looked out on the moon, and
fette a gentil sighin the phrase of the lady of
the ballads. It is, moreover, reported, that she
remained
in the window until long past midnight.
Something ailed her; but it was not told! Perhaps
some soft and blandishing vision floated before her
pensive eye; some form from the fairy world of her
imagination, at this hour wore its robes of light, and
careered upon the moonbeam, or bounded with the
silver ray along the tree-tops that fluttered in the
dewy breeze! or, perchance, in the deep shades of
the grove that slept in dark masses before her
chamber
lattice, the spectres of her thought beckoned her
regards, and filled her mind with new and holy
contemplations
!
I am all unlearned in the mystery of so
serene a creature's secret communions; and it does
not become me to indulge conjecture upon such a
perilous question. I therefore content myself with
reporting the simple fact, that in that window she
sate, to all appearance doing nothing, until every
other sentient being at Swallow Barn was hushed in
sleep. What could it mean?
The next morning there was another phenomenon
exhibited in the family, equally strange. An hour
before breakfast, Prudence, arrayed with unusual
neatness, was seated at the piano, apparently
beguiling
the early day with the rehearsal of a whole
volume
of sonnets. This was an unwonted effort,
for her music had fallen, of late, into disrelish,and
it had been supposed, for a year past, that she had
bidden a careless adieu to all its charms. But this
morning she resumed it with a spirit and a
perseverance
that attracted the notice of all the domestics.
It boded, in their simple reckonings, some impending
disaster. Such a change in the lady's habits could
import no good! They intimated, that when people
were going to give up the ghost, such marvels were
the not unusual precursors of the event. It was
as bad, one of the servant maids remarked, as to
hear a hen crow at night from the roost, and she
should'nt wonder if something was going to happen,
a burying, or a wedding, or some such dreadful
thing!
But Prudence was not melancholy. On the
contrary
,
she smiled, and seemed more cheerful than
ever.
After breakfast, Mr. Swansdown passed an hour
or two in the parlour, and fascinated the ladies by
the pleasantry of his discourse. He fell into a
conversation
with Prudence upon literary topics, and
nothing could be more refreshing than to hear how
much she had read, and how passionately she
admired
!
It was hard to tell which was best pleased
with this comparison of opinionsit was so
congenial
!
Prudence proclaimed Cowper to be her
favourite
bard, and that was exactly Swansdown's
preference
.
They both disliked the immorality of Byron,
and admired Scott. And both recited delicious lines
from The Pleasures of Hope.'Tis distance
lends enchantment to the view, declaimed
Swansdown
,
following the line up with twenty more. Tis
distance, echoed Prudence,as if it had been a
simultaneous
thought,and responded throughout, in
a softer voice, and with an enraptured eye, to the
whole recitation. Good souls! Delightful unison!
Why has cruel fatePooh! Nonsense! I shall grow
sentimental myself, if I say another word about
them!
Before noon, Swansdown's equipage was at the
door. Meriwether had arranged the examination of
the boundary line to take place on Wednesday next.
In the mean time, the belligerent parties, on either
side, were to make their hostile preparations.
With the most gracious condescension, the
philosopher
,
poet, patron, arbitrator, and aspiring
statesman
,
ascended his radiant car, and whisked away
with the brisk and astounding flourish that belongs
to this race of gifted mortals.
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE NATIONAL ANNIVERSARY.
The
event with which I have closed the last
chapter, took place on the morning of the Fourth of
July, a day that is never without its interest even in
the most secluded parts of our country. It was to be
celebrated at The Landing, a place about a mile
and a half distant, on the bank of the river, where
the small river boats are usually moored to take in
their cargoes. To this spot Ned proposed that we
should ride after dinner.
It was a holiday; so Rip had permission to
accompany
us, and Carey was directed to have our
horses at the door. We were amused to find that
the old groom had not only brought out our own
cavalry
,
but also a horse for himself: and there he
stood, holding our bridles, arrayed in his best coat,
with a pair of old top-boots drawn over loose
pantaloons
of striped cotton which were scrupulously
clean. He wore his spurs, and carried also a
riding-whip
.
His mien was unusually brisk, and, after an
ancient fashion, coxcombical. He ventured to tell
us that Master Frank thought he ought to attend us
to the Landing, as there was goings on down there,
upon account of the fourth of July. The truth
was, that learning our destination, he had slipped off
to Meriwether to ask his permission to go with us.
Our aged squire rode at a mannerly distance
behind
us; and Rip, on a hard-mouthed and obstinate
colt, that belonged to him, trotted by our sides, with
both hands pulling in the bridle, and his legs thrust
forward to enable him to counteract the constant
tendency of his steed to run away. Rip protests that
Spitfirefor so he calls his coltis the easiest-going
animal on the place, although each particular step
lifted him at least six inches above his saddle, and
almost entirely stopped his talking, because the
motion
shook the words out of his mouth somewhat in
the same manner that water comes out of a bottle.
However, no man ever thinks ill of his horse.
Our road lay through thickets of pine, in the shade
of which we advanced rapidly, and we soon reached
the Landing. There are very few villages in the
tide-water country of Virginia: it is intersected by
so many rivers, that almost every plantation may be
approached sufficiently near by trading vessels to
gratify the demands of the population, without the
assistance of those little towns which, in other
parts of the United States, sprout up like
mushrooms
.
There are yet, therefore, to be seen the
vestiges
of former trading stations on all the principal
rivers
;
and the traveller is not unfrequently surprised,
when, having consulted his map, and been informed
of some village with a goodly name, he learns that
he has unwarily passed over the spot, without being
conscious of any thing but a ruinous tenement
standing
on the bank of a river, embowered in deep and
solitary shade.
The Landing, which we had now reached, had
originally
been used for a foreign trade, in which
vessels
of a large class, a long time ago, were
accustomed
to receive freights of tobacco, and deposit the
commodities required by the country, in return. It
is now, however, nothing more than the place of
resort
for a few river craft, used in carrying the
country
produce to market. There were two or three
dilapidated buildings in view, and, among these, one
of larger dimensions than the rest, a brick house, with
a part of the roof entirely gone. A rank crop of
Jamestown weed grew up within, so as to be seen
through the windows of the first story. Indian corn
was planted on the adjacent ground up to the walls,
and extended partly under the shelter of a few
straggling
old apple trees, that seemed to stand as living
mementoes of an early family that had long since
been swept from beneath their shade. An air of
additional
desolation was given to this ruin by an
extensive
swamp that reached almost up to the rear of the
building, and over which the river spread its oozy
tide, amongst a thick coat of bulrushes. This
tenement
,
tradition says, was once the mansion of an
emigrant merchant from Glasgow, who here
ruminated
in quiet over his slow gains, and waited with
a disciplined patience for the good ship which once
a year hove in sight above the headland that
bounded
his seaward view. I can imagine now, how that
harbinger of good tidings greeted his eye in the gloom
VOL. I. 16
of the great forest; and with what stir and
magnified
importance the fitting arrangements were made
for her reception! How like a winged deity she
came fluttering into this little road, with all her pomp
of apparelwith foam upon her breast, and shouts
upon her deckgliding in upright stateliness to her
anchorage, as she gathered up her sails in the
presence
of the wondering eagle and frightened heron!
What was once the warehouse, but now used for
a ferry house, stood with its gable end at the
extremity
of a mouldering wharf of logs. In this end
there was a door studded with nails, and another
above it opening into the loft. The ridge of the roof
projected over these doors and terminated in a beam,
where were yet to be seen the remains of a block
and tackle. On the land side the building was
enlarged
by sheds, to which was appended a rude
porch. A sun-dried post supported what was once
a sign, whereon a few hieroglyphics denoted that this
was a place of entertainment, notwithstanding its
paper-patched windows and scanty means of
accommodation
.
Some thirty or forty persons were collected at the
Landing. The porch of the shabby little hostelry was
filled by a crowd of rough looking rustics, who were
laughing boisterously, drinking, and making ribald
jokes. A violin and fife were heard, from within the
building, to a quick measure, which was
accompanied
with the heavy tramp of feet from a party of
dancers. A group of negroes, outside of the house,
were enjoying themselves in the same way, shuffling
through the odd contortions of a jig, with two sticks
lying crosswise upon the ground, over which they
danced, alternately slapping their thighs and
throwing
up their elbows to the time of the music, and
making strange grimaces. A few tall, swaggering
figures, tricked out in yellow hunting-shirts trimmed
with green fringe, and their hats, some white and
some black, garnished with a band of red cloth and
ragged plumes of the same colour, that seemed to
have been faded by frequent rains, stood about in
little knots, where they talked loudly and swore hard
oaths. Amongst these were mingled a motley
collection
of lank and sallow watermen, boys, negroes
and females bedizened in all the wonders of country
millinery. At the fences and about the trees, in the
vicinity of the house, was to be seen the counterpart
of these groups, in the various assemblage of horses
of every colour, shape and degree, stamping,
neighing
and sleeping until their services should be
required
by their maudlin masters. Occasionally,
during
our stay, some of these nags were brought
forward
for a race, which was conducted with increased
uproar and tumult.
Contrasted with this rude and busy scene was the
voluptuous landscape around us. It was a
picture
of that striking repose, which, I think, is
peculiar
to the tide water views; soft, indolent and
clear, as if nature had retreated into this drowsy
nook, and fallen asleep over her own image, as it was
reflected from this beautiful mirror. The river was
upwards of a mile in width, and upon its bosom
were seen, for many a rood below, those alternate
streaks of light and shade that are said to point out
the channel, where its smooth surface was only
ruffled
by the frequent but lonely leap of some small
fish above the water. A few shallops were hauled
up on the beach, where some fishing nets were
stretched upon stakes, or spread upon the fences on
the bank. At the distance of two or three hundred
yards from the shore there was a slim pole planted
in the river, probably to mark a fishing ground, and
upon the very top of this was perched, with a
whimsical
air of unsociableness, a solitary swallow,
apparently
ruminating on the beauteous waste of waters
below him: and above this glittering expanse, some
night-hawks skimmed, soared and darted in pursuit
of the hordes of insects that bickered through the
atmosphere
.
The sun was within half an hour of his journey's
endand, nearer to theirs, were two negroes, who
were rapidly approaching the shore with a boat load
of crabs and cucumbers, the regular stroke of their
oars falling on the ear as if measuring the stillness
of the evening. Far below, and seemingly
suspended
in air amongst the brilliant reflexions of the
heavens
,
lay a small schooner at anchor, fixed as by a
spell, and, nevertheless, communicating a sense of
animation to this tranquil world by its association
with the beings that trod its noiseless deck.
We had wandered, after dismounting from our
horses, all round the purlieus of the crowd. Rip had
recognized some familiar features amongst the
country
volunteers, and had already found out the
drummer
,
who had hung his martial instrument around his
shoulders; and the delighted boy was beating away
at it with all his might. Carey had collected about
him a set of his old cronies, to whom he was
delivering
a kind of solemn harangue, of which we could
only observe the energy of his gesticulations. The
ferry-boat lay attached to the wharf, and on the stern
benches were seated three or four graver looking
men in coarse attire, who were deeply discussing
questions that occasionally brought them into a high
tone of voice, and, now and then, into a burst of loud
laughter. Ned had led me up to this group, and, in
the careless indolence of the moment, we had thrown
ourselves out at full length across the seats; Ned
with his legs dangling over the gunwale, with
Wilful
lying close by, and reposing his head upon his
lap.
The principal personage in this collection was
Sandy Walker, a long, sun-burnt waterman, who
was the proprietor of the hotel, and evidently a man
of mark amongst his associates. One of the others
was a greasy gentleman in a blue coat, out at
elbows
,
with a nose lustrous with living fire. These
two were the principal speakers, and they were
debating
an intricate point of constitutional law, with
more vehemence than perspicacity. At length, an
appeal was made to Ned, by Sandy, who was
infinitely
the most authoritative in his manner of the
whole group.
Can't Congress, said Sandy, supposing they
16 *
were to pass a law to that effect, come and take a
road of theirn any where they have a mind to, through
any man's land? I put it to Mr. Ned Hazard.
Not by the Constitution, said the gentleman in
the greasy coat, with marked emphasis.
Well, said Ned, we'll hear you, Sandy.
Sandy rose up, and lifting his hand above his head,
as he began,
I say it stands to reason
It stands to no such thing! rejoined the other,
interrupting him, if it's against the Constitution,
which I say it is undoubtedly,to come and take a
man's land without saying, by your leave; if I may
be allowed the expression, Mr. Ned Hazard, it's
running against a snag.
Silence, said Ned, Mr. Walker has the plank;
we can only hear one at a time!
Why, sir, continued Sandy, argumentatively,
and looking steadfastly at his opponent, with one eye
closed, and, at the same time, bringing his right hand
into the palm of his left; they can just cut off a
corner, if they want it, or go through the middle,
leaving one half here, and tother there, and make
you fence it clean through into the bargain; or,
added
Sandy, giving more breadth to his doctrine, go
through your house, sir.
Devil a house have I, Sandy! said the other.
Or your barn, sir.
Nor barn nother.
Sweeping your bed right from under you, if
Congress
says so. Arn't there the canal to go across the
Allegheny mountain? What does Congress care
about your state rights, so as they have got the
money!
Canals, I grant you, said his antagonist; but
there's a difference between land and water,
evidently
posed by Sandy's dogmatic manner, as well
as somewhat awed by the relation of landlord, in
which Sandy stood, and whom, therefore, he would
not rashly contradict. But, said he, in a more
softened tone, and with an affected spice of courtesy
in his accost, Mr. Walker, I'd be glad to know if
we could'nt nullify.
Nullify! exclaimed Sandy, nullify what?
said he, with particular emphasis on the last word.
Do you know what old Hickory said down there
in the Creek nation, in the war, when the Indians
pretended they were going to have a ball play?
No.
`If you don't go and wash all that there paint
from your faces, I'll give you the shockingest ball
play you ever had in all your lives.'
You don't tell me so! exclaimed the red-nosed
gentleman with animation, and bursting out into a
tremendous laugh.
Did'nt he say so, Ned Hazard? I beg your
pardon
,
Mr. Ned Hazard? ejaculated Sandy, and
turning to Ned.
I think I have heard so, said Ned, though I
don't believe he used that exact expression.
It was something like it, said Sandy: well,
that's the sort of nullification you'd get.
Things are getting worse and worse, replied the
other. I can see how it's going! Here, the first
thing General Jackson did when he came in, he
wanted to have the President elected for six years;
and, by and by, they will want him for ten! and
now they want to cut up our orchards and
meadows
,
whether or no; that's just the way Bonaparte
went on. What's the use of states if they are all to
be cut up with canals and rail-roads and tariffs? No,
no, gentlemen! you may depend, Old Virginny's not
going to let Congress carry on in her day!
How can they help it? asked Sandy.
We hav'nt
fout
and bled, rejoined the other,
taking out of his pocket a large piece of tobacco, and
cutting off a quid, as he spoke in a somewhat
subdued
tone, we hav'nt
fout
and bled for our liberties
to have our posterity and their land circumcised
after
this rate, to suit the figaries of Congress. So let
them try it when they will!
Mr. Ned Hazard, what do you call state rights?
demanded Sandy.
It's a sort of a law, said the other speaker, taking
the answer to himself, against cotton and wool.
That's a fact, cried Sandy, and, in my
thinking
,
it's a very foolish sort of a business.
There's where you and me differs, responded
the other.
Well, said Ned, it's a troublesome question.
Suppose we wait until we hear what Old Virginia
says about it herself! And as for us, Sandy, it is
getting
late, and we must go.
These words concluded the colloquy; and, soon
after, having summoned our cavalcade, we set out
on our return to Swallow Barn, where we arrived
some time after night-fall.
Ned detailed the dialogue I have just described to
Frank Meriwether, in the course of the evening,
and, from what Frank let fall,for he grew grave
on the subject,I have reason to think that he has
some fearful misgivings of the ambitious designs of
the general government. He is decidedly of the
state rights party.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE COUNTY COURT.
On
Monday morning Meriwether announced to us
that the County Court was to commence its session,
and, consequently, that he was obliged to repair to
the seat of justice.
I have before intimated that my kinsman is one
of the quorum, and has always been famous for his
punctuality in the discharge of his judicial functions.
It was, moreover, necessary for him to be there
today
,
because his business with Philly Wart, in
regard
to the arbitration, enjoined it upon him to meet
that legal luminary without delay.
He insinuated a wish that Ned and myself should
accompany him. I think Frank is a little vain of
his appearance on the bench. We readily assented
to his proposal.
Meriwether never moves on these state occasions
without old Carey, who has a suit of livery that is
preserved almost exclusively for this service.
Accordingly
,
the old man this morning was decorated
with all his honours, of which the principal consisted
in a thick drab coat, edged with green; and, as the
day was very hot, Carey suffered as much under his
covering as an ancient knight of the Crusades, in
his linked mail, on the sandy plains of Syria.
His master, too, had doffed the light and careless
habiliments in which he accommodated himself,
usually, to the fervours of the season, and was now
pranked out in that reverential furniture of broad
cloth which he conceived befitted the solemn import
of the duties he was about to discharge.
He rides a beautiful full-blooded sorrel; and his
pride in all matters that belong to his equitation is
particularly conspicuous in the fresh and
comfortable
character of his housings and horse furniture,
He has a large new saddle, luxuriously stuffed and
covered with a richly worked coat of yellow
buck-skin
.
The stirrups hang inordinately low, so that it
is as much as he can do to get the point of his boot
into them. But he sits with a lordly erectness upon
his seat, and manages his horse with a bold and
dexterous hand. On horseback he is a perfect
personation
of an opulent, unquestioned squire,the
very guardian genius of the soil and its prerogatives
fearless, graceful and masterly, his fine athletic
figure appearing here to its greatest advantage.
Ned and myself formed a part of his retinue, like
a pair of aids somewhat behind the
commander-in-chief
,
insensibly accommodating our position to the
respect inspired by his bearing and rank. Old
Carey
,
in his proper place, brought up the rear. Our
journey to the court house was about twelve miles,
and as we occasionally brought our horses to a
gallop
,
we arrived there at an early hour.
The sitting of this court is an occasion of great
stir. The roads leading to the little county capital
were enlivened by frequent troops of the
neighbouring
inhabitants, that rode in squadrons, from all
directions
.
Jurors, magistrates, witnesses, attorneys
of the circuit, and all the throng of a country side
interested in this piepowder justice, were rapidly
converging to the centre of business.
Upon our arrival, a considerable part of the
population
had already assembled, and were scattered
about the principal places of resort, in decent and
orderly groups, in which all seemed intent upon the
quiet and respectful discharge of their several errands.
The court house is a low, square, brick building,
entirely unornamented, occupying the middle of a
large area. It has an official appearance given to it
by a huge door of a dingy exterior and ample
windows
covered with dust and cobwebs. An humble
and modest little building, of the same material,
stands on one corner of the area, and by the
well-worn
path leading hence to the temple of Themis, it
may be seen that this is the only depository of
the county records. At a distance further off, a
somewhat larger edifice claims a public character,
which is denoted by one or two of the windows
being
grated. A few small forest trees have been set
in the soil, over this space, which, by their feeble
growth and shelterless condition, as well as by the
formal and graceless precision with which they have
been distributed, show that the public functionaries
have at times had one or two abortive inspirations
of a spirit of improvement, and a transient passion
for beauty.
In front of the court house there is a decayed and
disjointed fixture, whose uses seem now to have gone
by. It is a pillory, with the stocks below it, and was
occupied at the moment of our visit, as a place of
meeting for a few idle negroes, who were seated on
the frame at a game of pushpin. Immediately in
this neighbourhood the horses of the crowd whose
occasions brought them to the scene, were fastened
to racks erected for that purpose; and the adjacent
fence-corners became gradually appropriated in the
same way.
Half a dozen frame dwellings, partially obscured
by trees and generally of a neat exterior, were
scattered
over the landscape, and made up the village
if so sparse an assemblage be entitled to that name.
There are two places of entertainment. The first,
a little shrunken, single-storied edifice, concealed
behind
a rough, whitewashed piazza. The second is
an old building of some magnitude, composed
entirely
of wood, and, from the profusion with which
its doors and windows have been supplied with
architectural
embellishments, must formerly have been a
private residence of note.
Our cavalcade stopped at the latter of these rival
establishments; and we dismounted under a broad,
flaunting sign, that screeched slowly upon its hinges
in the breeze, and seemed to give a responsive note
VOL. I. 17
to a party of geese, that were greeting every fresh
troop that arrived with a vociferous, periodical
cackle
.
There were several respectable-looking
gentlemen
collected about the door; and Meriwether's
arrival was met with many kind and hearty
expressions
.
We were shown into a room that, from its
air of neatness, was evidently kept as an apartment
of more worship than that in which the larger
portion
of the visiters of the hotel were assembled.
This room was garnished with carvings and
mouldings
of an ancient date. The floor had suffered
from the ravages of time, and had a slope towards
an ample hearth, whose unsightly aperture was
embowered
by a tasteful screen of the tops of asparagus
plants. Some pieces of mahogany furniture, black
with age and glistening like ebony, stood against the
wall; and above them hung divers besmirched
pictures
representing game cocks in pugnacious
attitudes
,
distressingly clipt of their feathers, the
Godolphin
Arabian, Flying Childers and some other
victors
of the turf, all in black frames; and which, from
the hue that time had flung over the copperplate,
seemed to be gleaming through an atmosphere
obfuscated
with smoke.
The hour soon came round for opening the court.
This was announced by a proclamation, made in a
shrill, attenuated voice, from the court house door;
and was followed by an immediate movement, from
all directions, to that quarter. The little hall in
which justice was administered was crowded almost
to overflowing. A semi-circular gallery, raised five
or six feet above the floor, at the further end of the
hall, was already occupied with a bevy of Justices
nearly a dozen, perhapssome of whom had flung
their feet upon the rail before them, and were lolling
back upon their seats, ready to proceed to their
judicial
employments. Our friend Meriwether occupied
his place with a countenance of becoming
importance
.
Indeed, the whole bench presented a fine
picture of solid faces and figures, that might be said
to be a healthy and sturdy specimen of this pillar of
the sovereignty of the state;and was well
calculated
to inspire a wholesome respect for that inferior
and useful magistracy which has always been so
much a favourite of the people of Virginia.
Immediately under the gallery of the Justices, sat
the clerk of the court; and, on either side of his desk,
within the area of the semi-circle, were benches
designed
for the juries. Fronting this array of the
court and jury, was a long, narrow platform,
guarded
all round with railing, and elevated a few feet
above the floor, within whose constricted confines
were disposed some five or six members of the
bar, most incommodiously perched upon seats of a
height out of all proportion to the human figure;
and, before these, a narrow desk extended the whole
distance, so as to give to the place of their
accommodation
somewhat of the dimensions of a pew.
These courts hold their sessions monthly, and
their jurisdiction reaches almost all the ordinary
legal
requirements of the county; but, as the territorial
limit over which they preside is generally small, it
requires but a few days to despatch the business of
each term.
The first matter that occupied the attention of the
court was the marshalling of the grand jury, to whom
the usual charge was delivered. This office was
assigned
by the court to one of the members of the
bar, a young practitioner, who did not fail to
embellish
the summary of duties, which he unfolded to
their view, with a plentiful garniture of rhetoric.
Notwithstanding the portentous exaggeration of the
solemnity of the occasion, and the multitudinous
grave topics which were urged upon the grand
inquest
,
it seems that this quintessence of the freehold
dignity was sadly puzzled to find employment in
any degree commensurate with the exaltedness of its
function. It is said that the jurors revolved in their
minds the whole list of national grievances. One
party suggested the idea of presenting the
established
mode of electing the President of the United
States as a grievance to the good people of the
county; another thought of a formal denunciation
of the Tariff; a few advocated an assault upon the
Supreme Court; but all were happily brought into a
harmonious concurrence in the design of presenting a
mad-cap ragamuffin, by the name of Jemmy Smith,
for disturbing the peace of a camp-meeting by
drinking
whiskey and breeding a riot within the confines
of the conventicle. Accordingly, after an hour's
deliberation
upon these various suggestions, they
returned
to the court room with a solitary bill, made
out in due form, against Jemmy; and, this matter
constituting the sum total of their business for the
term, they were thereupon discharged, with the
thanks of the court for the able and vigilant
administration
of their inquisitorial duties.
Jemmy Smith had anticipated this act of
authority
;
and was now in court, ready to stand his trial.
He had already selected his counsela flowery and
energetic advocate, whose strength lay, according to
the popular opinion, in his skill in managing a jury.
The name of this defender of Jemmy's fame was
Taliaferro, (pronounced Tolliver,) or, as it was
called
for shortness, Toll Hedges, Esq. a gentleman
whose pantaloons were too short for him, and whose
bare legs were, consequently, visible above his
stockings
.
Toll's figure, however, was adorned with a
bran-new blue coat, of the most conceited fashion,
which, nevertheless, gave some indications of
having
been recently slept in, as it was plentifully
supplied
with down from a feather bed. He was
conspicuous
,
also, for an old straw hat, that had been
fretted at the rim by a careless habit in handling it.
This learned counsel had apparently been keeping
his vigils too strictly the night before, for his eyes
were red, and his face inflamed. His frame had all
the morning languor of a sedulous night watcher:
and, altogether, Toll did not appear to be in the best
condition to try his case. However, he had now
taken his seat at the bar; and close beside him sat
his client, Jemmy Smith, an indescribably
swaggering
,
saucy blade, who had the irreverence to come
17 *
into court without coat or waistcoat, and to show a
wild, grinning, disorderly countenance to his peers.
Whilst the gentleman who conducted the case for
the Commonwealth was giving a narrative of
Jemmy's
delinquencies to the jury, and was vituperating
that worthy's character in good set terms, Toll was,
to all appearance, asleep upon his folded arms,
resting
on the desk before him. When the charge was
fairly explained, one witness was called to support
it. This individual was pretty much such a looking
person as Jemmy himself. He was rather
down-faced
and confused in his demeanor before the court,
and particularly shabby in his exterior; but he told
a plain, straight forward story enough, in the main,
and his evidence went the full length of all the
traverser's
imputed enormities. The truth was, Jemmy
had certainly broke into the camp and played some
strange antics, considering the sanctity of the place.
But, during all this time, Taliaferro Hedges, Esq.
maintained his recumbent position, except, now and
then, when Jemmy, feeling himself pinched by the
testimony, would recline his head to whisper in his
counsel's ear, which act would rouse him enough to
bring upon Jemmy a rebuke, that was generally
conveyed
by pushing him off, and an injunction to be
quiet. At length, the whole story was told, and bad
enough it looked for Jemmy! The attorney for the
commonwealth now informed Mr. Hedges, that the
witness was at his disposal. At this, Toll
completely
roused himself, and sitting bolt upright, directed a
sharp and peremptory catechism to the witness, in
which he required him to repeat the particulars he
had before detailed. There was something bullying
in the manner of the counsel, that quite intimidated
the witness, and the poor fellow made some sad
equivocations. At last, said Toll, after admonishing
the witness, in a very formal manner, that he was
upon his oath, and explaining to him the solemnity
of his obligation to speak the truth, I will ask you
one question; answer it categorically, and without
evasion.
When you and Smith went down to
camp-meeting
,
had'nt Smith a bottle of whiskey in the bosom
of his shirt? Tell the truth.
The attorney for the Commonwealth objected to
the question; but the court overruled the
objection
.
Why, yes, he had, replied the witness.
Did'nt Jemmy buy that bottle himself, and pay
for it out of his own pocket? On the oath you have
taken.
Why, yes, he did.
Well, now tell us. Did'nt you drink some of
that whiskey yourself, along the road?
Why, yes, I did. I tell the truth, gentlemen.
More than once?
Yes, several times.
After you got down to camp?
Oh, yes! certainly. I don't deny it.
Did you and Jemmy drink out of the mouth of
the bottle, or out of a cup?
Certainly; out of the mouth of the bottle. You
will not catch me in any lies, lawyer Hedges.
Really, Mr. Hedges, interrupted the attorney
for the Commonwealth, I don't see what this has to
do with the question. I must apply to the court.
Oh, very well, said Toll, I see how it is!
Gentlemen of the jury, I don't insist on the question,
if the gentleman does not like to have it answered.
But you can't help seeing the true state of the case.
Here's this fellow, who has been all along drinking
out of the very same bottle with Jemmy Smith,and
Jemmy's own whiskey too,and now he comes out
state's evidence. What credit can you attach to a
cock-and-bull story told by a fellow that comes to
swear against a man who has been dividing his
liquor
with him? For the honour of the Old
Dominion
,
gentlemen! cried Toll, concluding this
sidebar
appeal to the jury with an indignant
gesticulation
,
and a look of triumph in his face, that might be
said to be oratorically comic.
The look was a master-stroke. It took complete
effect; and Jemmy was acquitted in spite of the
facts.
As the crowd broke up, Toll, on leaving the court
room, walked up to the witness, and slapping him
on the back, said, Come, let us go take something
to drink. And off the two went together to the
tavern.
Hazard remarked to Hedges afterwards, that it
was a little odd, as he had completely triumphed
over the facts of his case by undermining the credit
of the witness, he should be on such good terms with
this person as to bring him down to drink with
him.
Ah! replied Hedges, if the jury knew that
man as well as I do, they would have believed every
word he said. For there is not an honester fellow in
the county. But I know how to work these
juries
.
CHAPTER XX.
OPINIONS AND SENTIMENTS.
The
court resumed its session after dinner,
having
a prospect of concluding its business before noon
the next day; and Meriwether was obliged to
remain
for the night. Neither Ned nor myself
regretted
the pretext this furnished us for the same delay.
During the afternoon many of the older
inhabitants
had taken to horse; and the crowd of the court
room was sensibly diminished. Still the out-door
bustle assumed a more active and noisy character.
The loiterers about the verge of the court had less
business, but more to say. Indeed, it seemed to be
difficult to keep those in attendance whose presence
was necessary to the affairs of justice; for the crier
of the court might be frequently heard summoning
the absentees, as they were wanted, in his slender
and shrill voice, by distinctly repeating thrice the
name of each, from the court house door, where he
stood bare headed and with his hand shading his
eyes.
The sun began, at last, to throw a merciless blaze
upon the broken window-panes in the western fronts
of some old buildings, whose raggedness was thus
rendered painfully public. The ducks and geese of
the village were already trooping homeward, from a
small brook hard by, in their sober evening march,
and with a sedate under-gabble, like that of old
burghers in conversation. The departing squadrons
of horsemen became more frequent; and the alacrity
with which these retreating bodies sprang forward
from their starting points, showed that their
temporary
sojourn had been attended with an increase of
animal spirits. At this hour the court put an end
to its labours; and the throng that had been
occupied
there, all day, were now gathering about the
doors of the two taverns.
Our host was an imperturbable, pleasant-faced,
old fellow, with a remarkably accommodating temper,
which exhibited itself in lavish promises, though he
was allowed to be very incommensurate in
performance
.
He was unwieldy in bulk, and pertinacious
in the enjoyment of his ease; and, to save the
trouble
of forming opinions, he gave an invariable
answer
to every speculation that was addressed to him.
This was conveyed in the words quite likely,
no matter how inconsistent the averments to which
they had reference. Ned and myself had put him,
in the course of the afternoon, to some severe trials,
but without being able either to ruffle his temper or
enlarge his vocabulary.
The large room of the inn had a bar partitioned off
at one corner; and this was the principal centre of
reinforcement to the inhabitants of these precincts.
As the shades of evening thickened this resort
became
more crowded. The remnants, or more
properly
speaking, the sediment of the population, whose
occasions had brought them to the court house, had
repaired hither to enjoy the compotations and
arguments
that are apt to abound in such assemblages.
Some were in the middle of the floor, accompanying
their diatribes with violent gestures; others were
strewed around the room wherever seats were to be
obtained. At a small table, lighted by a single
candle
in a most unsightly candlestick, sat a gentleman
in a loose calico robe, with a dirty shirt, engaged at
backgammon with a robust, well-knit man who
wore his hat drawn low over his eyes: the first was
the Galen of the country side, and the other a
deputy
sheriff. Our friend Toll Hedges was a
conspicuous
personage in this checkered assembly. He had
shaken off the dullness of the morning, and was now
playing a part that seemed more native to his
disposition
,
that of a familiar, confident, loud talking
interlocutor
,
who called every man by his christian
name, swore roundly after a pedantic fashion, had
some knowledge of every man's business, and bore
himself with the peremptoriness of one whose
character
partook in equal degrees of the wag and the
brawler. He was sarcastic, shrewd and popular;
and to all these, it may be added, that before
bedtime
he was in no small degree flustered. In this
crowd might also be observed one or two other
members
of the bar, of a graver demeanor, and even
some of the justices holding more sedate
conversations
,
apparently on matters connected with their
business. In one corner sat a quiet, neighbourly
shoemaker in an arm chair, contentedly taking a
stiff beverage of whiskey and water about once in
fifteen minutes, and saying nothing to any body.
Our host himself was a sober man, God wot, and
a discreet! He stood at his post the whole evening,
with a wooden pestle in his handthe symbol of his
calling; one while laughing with a civil good nature
at the rough jokes that were aimed at himself, and
at another mixing toddy to meet the numberless
demands
of his thirsty customers. Amidst this
edifying
display of toss-pot eloquence and genial uproar,
my attention was particularly attracted to the
behaviour
of this exemplary publican. Though scant in
speech, he laboured like a man who had the good of
his family at heart; and bore himself through the
tumultuary
scene with the address of a wily
statesman
who is anxious to win the applause of all
parties
.
The tide was in his favour, and his aim was to
float smoothly upon it. In times of great excitement,
it may be observed that the party in power gain
many advantages by a show of moderation. With
regard to them the maxim applies, where the least
is said it is soonest mended. Now, our good
landlord
stood pretty much in this predicament; for the
whole assemblage had fallen into an inflammatory
discussion of some ticklish points of politics, in
which he might have lost friends by an
inconsiderate
participation. Whilst, therefore, the tempest
raged he played the part of moderator, and was
perpetually
crying outNow, gentlemen!if you
please,remember;we are all friends! and such
VOL. I. 18
like gentle admonitions; and as often as he was
taken
by the button by one of the speakers, and
pinned
up against the wall, so that it seemed impossible
for him to escape committing himself, I could hear
his old equivocationquite likelygiven forth
with an impregnable composure of nerve. In fact,
a sober observer could have been at no loss to
perceive
that the cautious landlord had all the
ambidexterity
of a practised public servant.
As the evening waned the disputants began to
leave the field; and Hedges being thrown by chance
into the bar-room, alone with his good natured host,
addressed him very seriously upon the subject of the
countenance he had given to certain heresies that
had been uttered in his presence, and, seemingly, with
his concurrence. Lord! Mr. Hedges, said he, in
a quiet tone, and looking round to see who was
within hearing,you know my ideas long ago
about all that matter!It isn't my business to break
with customers, or to be setting up against them.
What signifies opinions this way or that! But, he
continued, erecting his figure to its full height and
putting on a look of extraordinary determination,
sentiments is another thing! Let any man ask me
my sentiments!that's all;Thar's no flinch in
me, you may depend upon it!
Having learned this distinction between
sentiments
and opinions, I retired to my chamber.
The next morning, after a short delay in court,
Meriwether was released from his judicial cares,
and we made preparations for our return to Swallow
Barn. Philly Wart, who had been an active and
conspicuous personage in the transactions of the
term, and who is hereafter to make some figure in
these annals was to accompany us. About noon
we were all mounted, Philly being perched upon a
tall, raw-boned, grey steed, that seemed to have
parted with his flesh in the severe duties of the
circuit
,
but who was distinguished for his easy and
regular
pace. As to Philly himself it is necessary that
I should give him a chapter.
By the usual dinner hour, we were all
comfortably
seated at Swallow Barn.
CHAPTER XXI.
PHILPOT WART.
I have
a great reverence for the profession of the
law and its votaries; but especially for that part of
the tribe which comprehends the old and
thorough-paced
stagers of the bar. The feelings, habits and
associations of the bar in general, have a very
happy
influence upon the character. It abounds with
good fellows: And, take it altogether, there may be
collected from it a greater mass of shrewd,
observant
,
droll, playful and generous spirits, than from
any other equal numbers of society. They live in
each other's presence, like a set of players;
congregate
in the courts, like the former in the green room;
and break their unpremeditated jests, in the
intervals
of business, with that sort of undress freedom
that contrasts amusingly with the solemn and even
tragic seriousness with which they appear, in turn,
upon the boards. They have one face for the
public
,
rife with the saws and learned gravity of the
profession
,
and another for themselves, replete with
broad mirth, sprightly wit and gay thoughtlessness.
The intense mental toil and fatigue of business give
them a peculiar relish for the enjoyment of their hours
of relaxation, and, in the same degree, incapacitate
them for that frugal attention to their private
concerns
which their limited means usually require.
They have, in consequence, a prevailing air of
unthriftiness
in personal matters, which, however it
may operate to the prejudice of the pocket of the
individual
,
has a mellow and kindly effect upon his
disposition
.
In an old member of the profession,one who has
grown grey in the service, there is a rich unction of
originality, that brings him out from the ranks of his
fellow men in strong relief. His habitual
conversancy
with the world in its strangest varieties, and
with the secret history of character, gives him a
shrewd estimate of the human heart. He is quiet,
and unapt to be struck with wonder at any of the
actions of men. There is a deep current of
observation
running calmly through his thoughts, and
seldom
gushing out in words: the confidence which
has been placed in him, in the thousand relations of
his profession, renders him constitutionally cautious.
His acquaintance with the vicissitudes of fortune, as
they have been exemplified in the lives of individuals,
and with the severe afflictions that have tried the
reins of many, known only to himself, makes him
an indulgent and charitable apologist of the
aberrations
of others. He has an impregnable good
humour
that never falls below the level of
thoughtfulness
into melancholy. He is a creature of habits;
rising early for exercise; temperate from necessity,
and studious against his will. His face is
accustomed
18 *
to take the ply of his pursuits with great facility,
grave and even severe in business, and readily rising
into smiles at a pleasant conceit. He works hard
when at his task; and goes at it with the reluctance
of an old horse in a bark-mill. His common-places
are quaint and professional: they are made up of
law maxims, and first occur to him in Latin. He
measures all the sciences out of his proper line of
study, (and with these he is but scantily acquainted,)
by the rules of law. He thinks a steam engine should
be worked with
due diligence
, and without
laches:
a
thing little likely to happen, he considers as
potentia
remotissima
; and what is not yet in existence, or
in
esse
, as he would say, is
in nubibus
. He apprehends
that wit best, that is connected with the affairs of the
term; is particularly curious in his anecdotes of old
lawyers, and inclined to be talkative concerning the
amusing passages of his own professional life. He is,
sometimes, not altogether free of outward foppery; is
apt to be an especial good liver, and he keeps the best
company. His literature is not much diversified;
and he prefers books that are bound in plain calf, to
those that are much lettered or glided. He garners
up his papers with a wonderful appearance of care;
ties them in bundles with red tape; and usually has
great difficulty to find them when he wants them.
Too much particularity has perplexed him; and just
so it is with his cases: they are well assorted, packed
and laid away in his mind, but are not easily to be
brought forth again without labour. This makes him
something of a procrastinator, and rather to delight
in new business than finish his old. He is,
however
,
much beloved, and affectionately considered by
the people.
Philpot Wart belongs to the class whose
characteristics
I have here sketched. He is a practitioner
of some thirty or forty years standing, during the
greater part of which time he has resided in this
district
.
He is now verging upon sixty years of age,
and may be said to have spent the larger portion of
his life on horseback. His figure is short and
thick-set
,
with a hard, muscular outline; his legs slightly
bowed, his shoulders broad, and his hands and feet
uncommonly large. His head is of extraordinary
size, cubical in shape, and clothed with a shock of
wiry, dark grey hair. A brown and dry complexion;
eyes small, keen, and undefined in colour, furnished
with thick brows; a large mouth, conspicuous for a
range of teeth worn nearly to their sockets; and
ample
protruding ears, constitute the most remarkable
points in his appearance. The predominant
expression
of his features is a sly, quick good nature,
susceptible
,
however, of great severity.
His dress is that of a man who does not trouble
himself with the change of fashions; careless, and, to
a certain degree, quaint. It consists of a plain, dark
coat, not of the finest cloth, and rather the worse for
wear; dingy and faded nankeen small-clothes; and
a pair of half boots, such as were worn twenty years
ago. His hat is old, and worn until the rim has
become
too pliable to keep its original form; and his
cravat is sometimes, by accident, tied in such a
manner, as not to include one side of his shirt collar;
this departure from established usage, and others
like it, happen from Mr. Wart's never using a
looking-glass
when he makes his toilet.
His circuit takes in four or five adjoining counties,
and, as he is a regular attendant upon the courts, he
is an indefatigable traveller. His habit of being so
much upon the road, causes his clients to make their
appointments with him at the several stages of his
journeyings; and it generally happens that he is
intercepted
,
when he stops, by some one waiting to see
him. Being obliged to pass a great deal of his time
in small taverns, he has grown to be contented with
scant accommodation, and never complains of his
fare. But he is extremely particular in exacting the
utmost attention to his horse.
He has an insinuating address that takes
wonderfully
with the people; and especially with the older
and graver sorts. This has brought him into a close
acquaintance with a great many persons, and has
rendered Philly Wart,as he is universally called,
a kind of cabinet-counsellor and private adviser with
most of those who are likely to be perplexed with their
affairs. He has a singularly retentive memory as
to facts, dates, and names; and by his intimate
knowledge of land titles, courses and distances,
patents
,
surveys and locations, he has become a
formidable
champion in all ejectment cases. In addition
to this, Philly has such a brotherly and companionable
relation to the greater number of the freeholders who
serve upon the juries, and has such a confiding,
friendly way of talking to them when he tries a
cause, that it is generally supposed he can persuade
them to believe any thing he chooses.
His acquirements as a lawyer are held in high
respect by the bar, although it is reported that he
reads but little law of later date than Coke
Littleton
,
to which book he manifests a remarkable
affection
,
having persued it, as he boasts, some eight or
ten times; but the truth is, he has not much time for
other reading, being very much engrossed by written
documents, in which he is painfully studious. He
takes a great deal of authority upon himself,
nevertheless
,
in regard to the Virginia decisions, inasmuch
as he has been contemporary with most of the cases,
and heard them, generally, from the courts
themselves
.
Besides this, he practised in the times of old
Chancellor Wythe, and President Pendleton, and
must necessarily have absorbed a great deal of that
spirit of law-learning which has evaporated in the
hands of the reporters. As Philly himself says, he
understands the currents of the law, and knows
where they must run; and, therefore, has no need of
looking into the cases.
Philly has an excellent knack in telling a story,
which consists in a caustic, dry manner that is well
adapted to give it point; and sometimes he indulges
this talent with signal success before the juries.
When he is at home,which is not often above a
week or ten days at a time,he devotes himself
almost
entirely to his farm. He is celebrated there
for a fine breed of hounds; and fox hunting is quite
a passion with him. This is the only sport in which
he indulges to any excess; and so far does he carry
it, that he invariably takes his dogs with him upon
the circuit, when his duty calls him, in the hunting
season, to certain parts of the country where one or
two gentlemen reside who are fond of this pastime.
On these occasions he billets the hounds upon his
landlord, and waits patiently until he despatches his
business; and then he turns into the field with all
the spirit and zest of Nimrod. He has some
lingering
recollections of the classics, and is a little given
to quoting them, without much regard to the
appropriateness
of the occasion. It is told of him, that
one fine morning, in December, he happened to be
with a party of brother sportsmen in full chase of a
gray fox, under circumstances of unusual animation.
The weather was cool, a white frost sparkled upon
the fields, the sun had just risen and flung a
beautiful
light over the landscape, the fox was a-foot, the
dogs in full cry, the hunstmen shouting with
exuberant
mirth, the woods re-echoing to the clamour, and
every one at high speed in hot pursuit. Philly was
in an ecstasy, spurring forward his horse with
uncommon
ardour, and standing in his stirrups, as if
impatient
of his speed, when he was joined in the chase
by two or three others as much delighted as himself.
In this situation he cried out to one of the party,
Is'nt this fine; don't it put you in mind of Virgil?
Tityre tu patul recubans sub tegmine fagi. Philly
denies the fact; but some well authenticated
flourishes
of his at the bar, of a similar nature, give
great semblance of truth to the story.
It often happens that a pair of his hounds will
steal after him, and follow him through the circuit,
without his intending it; and when this occurs, he
has not the heart to drive them back. This was
the case at the present court: accordingly, he was
followed by his dogs to Swallow Barn. They slink
close behind his horse, and trot together as if they
were coupled.
Philly's universal acquaintance through the
country
and his pre-eminent popularity have, long since,
brought him into public life. He has been elected
to the Assembly for twenty years past, without
opposition
;
and, indeed, the voters will not permit him
to decline. It is, therefore, a regular part of his
business
to attend to all political matters affecting the
county. His influence in this department is
wonderful
.
He is consulted in reference to all plans, and
his advice seems to have the force of law. He is
extremely secret in his operations, and appears to
carry his point by his calm, quiet and unresisting
manner. He has the reputation of being a
dexterous
debater, and of making some sharp and heavy
hits when roused into opposition; though many odd
stories are told, at Richmond, of his strenuous
efforts
,
at times, to be oratorical. He is, however,
very much in the confidence of the political
managers
of all parties, and seldom fails to carry a point
when he sets about it in earnest.
During the war, Philly commanded a troop of
volunteer
light-horse, and was frequently employed
in active service, in guarding the hen roosts along
the river from the attacks of the enemy. These
occasions have furnished him with some
agreeable
episodes in the history of his life. He gives
a faithful narrative of his exploits at this period,
and does not fail to throw a dash of comic humour
into his account of his campaigns.
In our ride to Swallow Barn, he and Meriwether
were principally engrossed with the subject of the
expected arbitration. Meriwether particularly
enjoined
it upon him so to manage the matter as to
make up a case in favour of Mr. Tracy, and to give
such a decision as would leave the old gentleman in
possession of the contested territory.
Philly revolved the subject carefully in his mind,
and assured Frank that he would have no difficulty
in putting Swansdown upon such a train as could
not fail to accomplish their ends.
But it seems strange to me, said the counsellor,
that the old man would not be content to take the
land without all this circuity.
We must accommodate ourselves to the
peculiarities
of our neighbours, replied Meriwether, and,
pray be careful that you give no offence to his pride,
by the course you pursue.
I have never before been engaged in a case
with such instructions, said Philly. This looks
marvellously like an Irish donkey race, where each
man cudgels his neighbour's ass. Well, I suppose
Singleton Swansdown will take the beating without
being more restive under it than others of the tribe!
I beseech you, use him gently, said
Meriwether
.
He will be as proud of his victory as
ourselves
.
Philly laughed the more heartily as he thought of
this novel case. Now and then he relapsed into
perfect silence, and then would again and again
break forth into a chuckle at his own meditations
upon the subject.
You are like a king who surrenders by
negotiation
,
all that he has won by fighting, said he,
laughing
again, we shall capitulate, at least, with the
honours of war,drums beating and colours
flying
!
It is the interest of the commonwealth that there
should be an end of strife; I believe so the maxim
runs, said Meriwether smiling.
Concordia, parv res crescunt; discordi
maxim
dilabuntur, added the counsellor. But it
seems to me to be something of a wild goose chase
notwithstanding.
Philly repeated these last words as he dismounted
at the gate at Swallow Barn, and, throwing his
saddle-bags
across his arm, he walked into the house
with the rest of the party.
VOL. I. 19
CHAPTER XXII.
THE PHILOSOPHER UNBENT.
The
next morning opened upon us in all the
beauty of the season. Every necessary preparation
had been completed for the definite adjustment of
the long abiding law-suit. The household was in
motion
at an hour much earlier than usual, and a
general
anxiety seemed to prevail throughout the family
to speed the issues of the day. Meriwether was
animated by unwonted spirits; and Hazard and
myself
anticipated, with some eagerness, the entrance
upon a business that promised to us nothing but
amusement in its progress. The notoriety which
all the preliminary movements in this matter had
gained from the frequent conversations of
Meriwether
relating to it, had magnified its importance in a
degree much disproportioned to its intrinsic merit.
The day was therefore considered a kind of jubilee.
Mr. Chub had expressed a strong wish to be present
at the settlement; and had, accordingly, proclaimed
a holiday in the school. The children were all in a
state of riotous excitement. Rip was especially
delighted
with the prospect of the approaching bustle.
Prudence partook of the common feeling with rather
more restlessness than any one else. There was a
studied sedateness upon her features, which was not
altogether natural; and this was contrasted with her
motions, that seemed to be unsettled, variable and
perplexed.
Philly Wart had risen soon after the dawn, and
had taken a walk of two or three miles before the
family began to assemble. About an hour before
breakfast, he had seated himself on the bench of the
porch, alone with Mr. Chub, and was there chipping
a stick with his penknife, as he kept up a desultory
discourse with the parson, upon divers matters
connected
with the history, doctrine and discipline of the
Presbyterian Church. What were the particulars
of this conversation I could not learn, but it had a
stimulating effect upon his companion, who took
occasion
to call me aside, as soon as it was finished,
and said to me, Faith, that Philly Wart, as you
call him, is a sensible old fellow! He's a man of a
great deal of wit, Mr. Littleton! He is a
philosopher
of the school of Democritus of Abdera, and
knows as much about the kirk of Scotland as if he
had been at the making of the covenant. And not
very starched in his creed neither, ha, ha, ha! a
queer genius!
Philly himself, after leaving the parson, was
sauntering
up and down in the hall, with his coat
buttoned
close about him, so as to cause a roll of papers
that was lodged in one of his pockets to protrude
somewhat oddly from above his hip. In this
situation
I joined him. Your parson there, is a great
scholar, said he, smiling; we have had a bout
together
concerning church matters; and the old
gentleman
has been entertaining me with a speech, for
an hour past. He is a very vehement orator, and has
puzzled me with his Grecian heroes until I had'nt
a word to say. I think he likes a good listener:
But I am entirely too rusty for him. I must rub up
the next time I talk with him.
Just before breakfast Harvey Riggs and Ralph,
having in convoy Catharine and Bel Tracy, rode up
to the door; and our attention was called to the
party, by the loud salutations of Harvey Riggs.
Hark you, Ned! spring to your post, and catch
Bel before she touches ground.
Hazard succeeded in reaching the outer side of
the gate just in timenot to catch Bel, who had
already
dismounted with the nimbleness of a bird
but to take the rein of her horse and fasten it to the
fence, and then to lead her to the door.
It was not long before we were all ranged around
the ample breakfast board. Mr. Wart was inclined
to be jocular, and Meriwether indulged in some
good natured speculations upon the certainty of his
success in the case. Harvey Riggs was placed next
to Bel at the table, and took occasion to whisper in
her ear, that he had no faith in these negotiations
for a peace, and added, that he rested his hopes
entirely
upon the prophecy of old Diana; then, looking
towards Ned, who sat opposite, he remarked, loud
enough to be heard by the latter, there is but one
way of giving permanency to these family treaties.
Ned coloured up to the eyesaffected not to
understand
,
and asked for another cup of coffee. Bel
was more self-possessed, and replied with perfect
composure, Cousin Harvey, look to yourself, or I
shall dismiss you from my service.
After breakfast, it was determined that it would
be necessary for the contending powers to have a
personal inspection of the seat of war. The old mill
was proposed as the trysting place, and the
principal
discussion, it was settled, should be held on
the banks of the famous Apple-pie. Mr. Tracy's
arrival with his privy counsellor, Swansdown, was
looked for with impatience; and, in the meantime,
our whole company had broken off into
detachments
.
Prudence and Catharine had gone out upon the
grass-plot in front of the house; and were slowly
walking to and fro, without any covering upon their
heads, and with their arms around each other's
waists, in deep and secret communion, under the
shade of the willow. Rip had gone off with a whoop
and halloo to the stable, to order up the necessary
cavalry for the expedition. The little girls were
jumping a rope on the gravel-walk. My cousin
Lucretia
was busy with household matters. Wart and
Meriwether were conning over some papers in the
breakfast room; and Harvey Riggs, Ralph Tracy,
Hazard, and myself were seated in the porch,
patiently
abiding the progress of events.
Bel, who had been roaming at large from group
to group, and making amusement for herself out
19 *
of all, like one whose spirits would not allow her
to remain stationary, had picked up the dice that
belonged to a back-gammon board in the parlour,
and now came to the porch where we were seated,
rattling them in the box, and making as much noise
as she could.
I mean to tell the fortune of the day, said she;
why are not these dice just as good judges of
boundary
lines as all the lawyers? Now, Mr. Littleton,
observe if this be not a true oracle. Here's for Mr.
Meriwether, she continued, throwing the dice upon
the bench. Four, one. That's a shabby throw for
Swallow Barn. Well, here's for Pa. Deuce, ace.
Good-bye to the Brakes! exclaimed Harvey.
No, indeed! interrupted Bel. There's a great
deal of luck in deuce, ace. But we will give
Swallow
Barn another chance. There's six, four; that's
the parson's point, as Pa calls it.
And now for the Brakes, Bel, said Ned; this
throw must settle the question.
Trays, cried Bel, flinging the dice, and clapping
her hands. Hav'nt we gained it now?
No! certainly not! said Hazard. They make
but six together, and Swallow Barn had ten.
But, answered Bel, you forget, Edward, that
three is a luckier number than any other; and we
have got three, three times out of the dice.
The luck, replied Ned, is in the highest
number
.
Well, do you wait here, and I will go and ask
Mr. Chub, said Bel, who will give me all that he
has ever seen in the books about fortunate numbers.
Don't interrupt us, because the old gentleman is on
such good terms with me, that he says a great deal
to me that he would not let any of you hear. You
may listen to us through the windows.
The reverend gentleman was seated in the
parlour
window next to the porch, with a book in his
hand, when Bel entered and took a seat beside him;
and, thus arranged, both of their backs were towards
the window.
It is said in the family, that Mr. Chub is never so
happy as when he is able to show his scholarship.
It is not often that he has this good fortune, and,
therefore, when it arrives, he is not sparing of the
liberty
he allows to his imprisoned stock of learning.
It was evident in the conversation which he now
had with Bel, that he fancied himself to be regaling
his auditress with that light and dainty food which is
most congenial to a lady's taste.
Bel's accost was very grave.
Mr. Chub, said she, with a gracious and
respectful
voice, do you think there is any thing in
numbers?
Ha, ha! cried the tutor, in a kind of
bewildered
laugh, as if he did not exactly comprehend her
purpose,pon my honour, Madam, I don't know how
to answer the question. There are multipliers and
multiplicands, and
I don't mean that, said Bel, do you think there
is any luck in numbers?
If you mean in a number of lawyers to try the
question of the old mill-dam, I think the more there
are, the worse the luck. Upon my veracity, I would
rather have Mr. Philpot Wart than the whole bar;
judges, juries, and all, Miss Bel! Ha, ha!
You don't understand me yet, answered Bel.
I beg your pardon, my dear! interrupted the
tutor.
I did'nt speak with reference to the mill-dam
question, either, continued Bel, but I wanted to
know, if there are not some numbers deemed more
fortunate than others. Were not the ancients a
little
superstitious about the number of crows that flew
across the heavens of a morning, for instance?
Assuredly, madam! replied the old gentleman,
now beginning to take Bel's meaning; all nations
have had some leaning to be superstitious about
numbers. The number twelve has had a great deal
of distinction conferred upon it. The twelve
Apostles
,
and the twelve hours of the day, and the twelve
months of the year, in spite of the moon, Miss Bel!
That looks as if there was some virtue in the
number
.
And, you know, the Romans had their laws
written on twelve tables; and the Greeks celebrated
the twelve labours of Hercules. And I believe, up
to this day, it always takes twelve men to make a
jury. There is something heathenish in that, Miss
Isabella, ha, ha!
This last burst was manifestly destined for a sally
of wit, and the good old gentleman continued to
laugh at it immoderately. Bel appeared to relish it
herself. And there are imagined to be some occult
influences in the trines and nones, continued the
tutor, after he had laughed his fill, not to say any
thing of seven, of which number, nevertheless, I will
mention a few examples; for it was an especial
favourite
both of Jew and Christian. We well know
that the week has seven days, Miss Isabella.
Yes, said Bel, that is very well known.
And the Jews thought we should forgive our
enemy
seven times,which the scripture says, with
reason
,
should be seventy times seven,and the
Revelation
speaks of the seven phials of wrath, with divers
other sevens: and we read of the seven ages of man,
which I need not enumerate. You have heard,
Mistress Isabella, of the seven sages of Greece, and
of the seven wonders of the world? Besides these,
and many more that I could think of, the monkish
legends tell us some strange adventures of the seven
sleepers
Mercy, what a list of sevens! cried Bel.
Who slept in a cave for two hundred and
thirty-nine
years,Saint Maximian, Saint Malchus, and
their comrades. Wherefore I conclude seven to be
a lucky number.
It was undoubtedly a very lucky thing for the
seven sleepers all to wake up again, after such a
long sleep, said Bel.
Ha, ha! ejaculated the old gentleman, in
another
fit of laughter, that's very well said, Miss
Isabel! But the number three, continued the tutor,
is even more eminent in mystical properties. The
most ancient Egyptians worshipped the holy
Triangle
Equilateral, as being the symbol of divine
harmony
;
and Pythagoras and Plato have both taught
the mysteries of this number. You are, moreover,
aware, Miss Bel, that there were three Gorgons.
I thought there were four! said Bel, with an air
of astonishment.
Three, madam, replied the parson, Stheno,
Euryale, and Medusa. And there were three Furies
too.
What were their names, Mr. Chub?
Tisiphone, Megara and Alecto, said he,
enumerating
his triads slowly upon his fingers. And there
were the three Graces, my dear! You know their
names very wellThalia, Euphrosyne, and Aglaia.
The Fates,there were three of them, you
remember
;
and, faith, they have had work enough to do!
Clotho, Lachesis, and Atropos:if you had studied
Greek, Miss Bel, you would understand how well
their names became them.
Listen, if you would live and laugh! exclaimed
Harvey Riggs, who was sitting on the rail of the
porch, and taking in every word of this odd
discourse
.
Here is the parson, pouring a whole
dictionary of outlandish nonsense into Bel's ear, and
she humouring all this pedantry with the most
incomparable
gravity!
There might be cited many more of these triple
sisterhoods, continued Mr. Chub,Bel still looking
in his face with an encouraging earnestness,as
for another example, there were the Hor; namely,
Dice, Irene, and Eunomia: the Harpies,Cel
no, Ocypete, Aello, (still counting with the same
precision as before;) we must not forget the Sirens,
bless me! nothe ladies are often called Sirens
themselves, ha, ha! ParthenopeParthenopelet
me see He paused, with the forefinger of his right
hand, upon the middle finger of his left: Tut, it
slips my memory! I am very bad at remembering
names.
Particularly bad! said Bel, interrupting him
and smiling.
Parthenope, Miss Tracy, child, I had it on my
tongue! I am getting old, Miss Isabel! I dare say,
you can help me out.
Indeed, I dare say I cannot, replied Bel; you
have turned my brain so topsy-turvy with such a
list of hard names, that I have almost forgotten what
I came to ask you.
You have totally omitted, Mr. Chub, to
mention
the three wise men of Gotham that went to sea
in a bowl, said Hazard, speaking to the parson from
the porch.
And the three blind mice, that lost their tails on
a visit to the farmer's wife, said Harvey Riggs.
And the three fiddlers of old king Cole, said
Hazard.
Poh! Get along, Mr. Edward and Mr.
Harvey
!
you are both too much given to be waggish.
I doubt you will never mend your ways while you
keep each other's company! cried the good old
gentleman, completely overborne by this spirited
attack upon him; and, as he said this, he turned
round upon them a face full of queer perplexity at
being caught in the high career of this scholarly
exercitation
.
He is especially sensitive to the least
jest that is aimed at this peculiarity.
Well, said Bel, I am really very much
obliged to you, Mr. Chub, for your instructive
lecture
;
and I shall always remember hereafter, that
the Graces were three young women, and the Furies,
three old ones: And that three is the luckiest
number
in arithmetic.
By this time two horsemen, followed by a servant,
had come in sight upon the road leading to the gate.
They advanced at a leisurely pace, and were soon
descried to be Mr. Tracy in company with
Swansdown
.
The old gentleman's face, even at a
distance
,
exhibited careful thought, and his bearing
was grave and mannerly. He was in deep
conversation
with his friend, up to the moment of their
arrival
at the gate. Meriwether went forth to meet
him, and assisted him from his horse with an
affectionate
and highly respectful assiduity.
As soon as he was on his feet, he took off his hat
and made Meriwether a formal bow; and then
walked across the court-yard to the door, making
many obeisances to the company. Swansdown
followed
with scarcely less ceremony; and they were
ushered into the parlour.
We have an agreeable day's work before us, Mr.
Meriwether, said Mr. Tracy, with an air of sprightly
politeness, but in a voice somewhat tremulous from
years. Permit me to assure you it is not a small
gratification to me, that we come so amicably to the
close of a controversy, which, in other hands, might
have been embittered with many unkind feelings.
This has been conducted with so much courtesy,
from beginning to end, that I had almost flattered
myself with the hope, I should have had the luxury
of it for the rest of my life.
He concluded this complimentary speech with a
dash of gaiety in his tone, and a vivacious
gesticulation
of his body; and then turning round to the
ladies
,
with smiles upon his face, he made many civil
inquiries after family matters.
The parties now being all assembled, our next
move was to the old mill.
VOL. I. 20
CHAPTER XXIII.
TRIAL BY VIEW.
When
mounted our muster consisted of ten
persons
,
besides the servants, and included all the
gentlemen
assembled, with the addition of Rip, who,
astride of Spitfire, caracoled and bounded from place
to place, like a young adjutant of a squadron. The
old walls of Swallow Barn had never echoed back
the tramp, the hum, or the shouts of a more goodly
company than that which now filed off from the gate.
Our ranks were accommodated to the nature of the
road we had to travel. At first, Mr. Wart, with his
papers still peeping forth from his pocket, shot ahead
of the troop by the common brisk and easy-racking
gait to which his tall and ungainly steed was
accustomed
;
and he did not seem to be aware of the
inequality
of his pace, until he had gained about a
hundred yards upon the cavalcade, and was
admonished
by a call from two or three of the party, that
he would soon leave us out of sight, if he went on at
that speed. His two hounds were, as usual, jogging
close at his horse's heels; and any one might very
well have mistaken our whole equipment for a
party
setting out to beat a cover, with the principal
hunstman in advance; for, in addition to Philly's
hounds, we had every dog of Swallow Barn in our
train. Never, since the deluge, was there a law-suit
to be determined by so grotesque an array of judges,
counsellors, parties and witnesses as this! And
never before in the history of jurisprudence, perhaps,
was there such a case!
Philly Wart was highly amused. He had brought
himself to look upon the whole matter as a mere
pastime, and he was now determined to make the
best of it. He could not for a moment give his
features
a serious cast, but laughed in reply to every
question, like a man tickled with his own thoughts.
He had reined up his horse, in obedience to our
call, and was looking back upon the approaching
host, when I rode up to him.
This is a mode of practice very much to my
liking, said he. The law would not be such a
wearisome business, Mr. Littleton, if its affairs were
to be transacted in the field o' horseback; and with
a fine pack of dogs instead of a jury. Famous
juries
they'd make, for courses and distances, in an
ejectment, ha, ha, ha! If it were only the right
season
,
I think we should be likely to look over more
boundary lines than one to-day.
The same tone of enjoyment seemed gradually to
have visited even old Mr. Tracy, after we had left
the gate. Before this, there was a deep-seated care
upon his brow; but he now began to take the hue
of the hour. We had entered, after riding some
distance
,
upon a narrow and tangled path, beset with
underwood
,
that indicated our proximity to the ground
around the mill. Through this portion of our road
we were constrained to pass in single files, thus
elongating
our line of march, until it resembled that of a
detachment of cavalry exploring a suspected haunt
of an enemy. The resemblance occasioned our
venerable
friend of the Brakes to turn round to
Meriwether
and remark with a pleasant but precise form
of address,
You perceive, Mr. Meriwether, that the most
formidable invasion of the Apple-pie frontier
continues
now, as of old, to come from the direction of
Swallow Barn.
I could heartly wish, my dear friend, replied
Frank, that every invasion in the world were as
certain to promote the ends of justice and peace as
this. And I could wish, too, that every supposed
encroachment upon right, should be as gallantly and
honourably met.
But not quite so obstinately defended, said
Harvey
Riggs, in a half whisper, as he turned round on
his saddle to make the remark to Ned Hazard.
Amen! said Ned.
When we arrived at the mill there was a silent
pause for some moments, in which every one seemed
to be engaged in surveying the ragged, marshy and
unprofitable features of the landscape, and
wondering
in his own mind (at least all but Mr. Tracy)
how such a piece of land could possibly have
furnished
a subject for such a protracted litigation.
Philly Wart appeared to be aware of the common
surprise, and looking round, somewhat jestingly, in
the faces of the group, remarked,
Yes, there it is! And all that we have to do is,
to get down from our horses, organize the court, and
fall to work to determine whether the heirs of
Swallow
Barn or of the Brakes are hereafter to be
pestered
with this fine garden of wankopins and
snake-collards
!
We dismounted; and some moments elapsed
before
the parties were ready to proceed to the business
in hand. In this interval, the counsellor had
walked
up to the tutor, who stood upon a hillock, with
his glass up to his eye, surveying the scene.
What do you think of the prospect, Mr. Chub?
asked Philly Wart. By what name would you
venture
to describe this luxuriant, refreshing, and
sightly
piece of land? Is it
mariscus
, or
mora
, or
hulmus
,
or simple
locus paludosus
?
Sure it is not to look at this ill-favoured
quagmire
,
that we have been risking our necks under
boughs of trees, and dodging through brambles this
morning! exclaimed the tutor.
Aye, answered Philly, this is the very ground
of contention that has enlivened the annals of two
families and their descendants, for half a century. It
has been a gay quarrel, Mr. Chub, and has cost
something more than breath to keep it up. It has
lost nothing of its dignity, I warrant you, for want of
long opinions and sober counsel! Floreat Lex, Mr.
Chub, is our motto! It is a merry day for our craft,
20 *
when laymen take to reading the statutes, and pride
holds the purse strings.
This is a great Sirbonian bog, said the tutor.
It is as worthless as the Pomptin Paludes,
Gad-a-mercy! it should be relinquished by
unanimous
consent to the skunks and the muskrats!
It is a hereditament,as we lawyers say, Mr.
Chub, that would pass under the name
runcaria
,
which signifies, full of brambles and briars, or rather,
by the title in our law Latin, (I doubt if you have
studied that kind of Latin, Mr. Chub?) of
jampna
,
which comes, as Lord Coke says, of
jonc
, the French
for bulrush, and
nower
, a waterish place.
Truly, your dog Latin suits the description of the
place marvellously well, Mr. Philpot Wart, said
the tutor, laughing. And what do you consider, Mr.
Meriwether, he continued, addressing Frank, who
had just come to the spot, the value of this ground
to be, per acre?
About sixpence, answered Frank, smiling.
Too high; you hold it all too dear, interrupted
Philly, threepence at the outside, and dear at that.
But come, gentlemen,Mr. Swansdown we lose
time. Let us to business.
Upon this, the principal personages concerned in
the business of the day, withdrew to a convenient
spot, and selecting a piece of square timber, that
constituted
a part of the ruins of the mill, they took their
seats.
Old Mr. Tracy now very deliberately proceeded
to empty his pocket of a bundle of papers, neatly
tied up together, and loosening the string that bound
them, he spread them out upon his knees. Then, after
some rummaging, he produced a pair of spectacles,
which, with great caution, he adjusted upon his nose;
and taking up one of the papers, he presented it to
the arbitrators, saying, here is the first letter in the
correspondence which arose between the lamented
Mr. Walter Hazard, and myself, touching the
present
subject of difference. If you prefer it,
gentlemen
,
I will give you the copy of the letters that
passed
in the year 1759, between my immediate
ancestor
and the first Mr. Edward Hazard, in regard to
that latter gentleman's plan of erecting this mill, at
that date.
If you will be so kind, said Philly, with an air
of affectionate courtesy towards the old gentleman,
as to leave these papers with us, Mr. Tracy, we
will digest them at our leisure. In the mean time,
we will look at the deed from Gilbert Tracy to
Edward
HazardI have it here Saying this, he
produced
the roll of papers which had been so
conspicuous
about his person all the morning, and took from
it the deed in question.
Here Philly mounted his spectacles, and began to
read, in a clear voice, such parts of the deed as
related
to the nature and character of the grant; and
which parts, in order that my reader might thoroughly
understand the precise question in dispute, I have
substantially set forth in a former chapter.
This deed, Mr. Swansdown, said Philly, as he
finished reading, lays the whole foundation of the
controversy. The pretensions of the parties, as based
upon this instrument are well understood, and all
that remains for us is to ascertain what was the
specific
meaning of the parties thereto.
That must be seen, said Mr. Tracy, by the
letters which I have just given you.
Upon that point, said Philly Wart, the courts
have uniformly decided
We are not to be governed by the adjudications
of the courts upon any of these questions,
interrupted
Mr. Tracy; it is understood that the case is to
be adjudged according to the principles of equity.
Equitas sequitur legem, my friend, said Philly,
smiling. If there be ambiguity patent, that is,
apparent
upon the face of the deed, the law allows
testimony
to be received as to the intent of the parties
concerned in the covenants. But where the
intention
may be derived from the construction of the
covenants
themselves, according to their plain letter,
the law doth not permit acts and matters
in pais
to
be used to set up an intention
dehors
the written
instrument
.
Pray, Mr. Wart, said Swansdown, permit me
to ask, whether this case, agreeably to your
understanding
of it, is governed by the Roman or civil law,
or strictly according to the technical principles of
the common law?
Only, sir, according to the course of the laws of
this commonwealth, replied Philly, with an air of
surprise at the question, and as if nettled by the
foppery
of Swansdown's manner. Your suggestion,
Mr. Tracy, will be a subject for our consideration,
he continued, assuming his former mild tone, to the
gentleman he addressed.
Various other papers were now produced and
read; and when all this documentary evidence had
been brought to view, Philly remarked, with a
manner
that seemed to indicate profound reflection upon
the case in hand;
An idea strikes me, which appears to have an
important influence upon the subject under
consideration
.
I confess I should like to be satisfied upon
this point. Mr. Swansdown and myself, I presume,
will not differ about the construction of the deed, nor
upon the nature of the law by which it is to be
determined
,
he added, smiling; but, if my present
suspicions be confirmed, it is more than probable that
our labour will be very much abridged. I rather
suspect that this case will be found, upon
examination
,
to turn upon certain matters of fact which
have never yet been brought into the view of the
courts
A very shrewd old gentleman that, Mr. Hazard,
whispered the tutor, who stood by all this time,
listening
with profound attention; a man of genius, I
assure you, Mr. Edward!
The facts to which I allude are these; namely,
in the first place, to what distance did the mill-dam
anciently and originally extend, from the present
margin of the Apple-pie, in upon the land belonging
to the tract called the Brakes? Secondly, how long
did the mill-pond exist within the said original limits;
and when did it first begin to recede from the same?
And, thirdly, which is the most important point of all,
did the same mill-pond contract in its dimensions by
gradual and imperceptible stages, or did it sink into
the present narrow channel of the Apple-pie, by any
violent and sudden disruption of its banks?
The bearing and value of these questions,
continued
the lawyer, will be understood by referring
to the conceded fact, namely, that the two
contiguous
estates were divided by the water-line or margin
of the mill-dam on the side of the Brakes. Now, it
is a principle of law, upon which Mr. Swansdown
and myself cannot possibly disagree,for it is
asserted
without contradiction by the ablest writers,both
in the common and civil law, Mr. Swansdown, that
where a river, holding the relation which this
mill-dam
occupied between these two estates, changes
its course by slow and invisible mutatious, so as to
leave new land where formerly was water, then he
to whose territory the accretions may be made in
such wise, shall hold them as the gain or increment
of his original stock. But if the river change its
course by some forcible impulse of nature, as by
violent
floods, or the like, then shall he who suffers loss
by such vicissitude, be indemnified by the possession
of the derelict channel. And it would seem to me,
that in case the river, in the instance put, should
merely dwindle and pine away, as this famous
mill-pond
seems to have done, said Philly, with a smile,
then, the possessors of the banks on either side
should consider it to be the will of heaven that they
should be separated by narrower partitions, and
should, straightway, follow the retreating waters;
and, when these become so small as to allow them to
do so, they should shake hands from the opposite
banks, and thank God they were such near
neighbours
.
He's a man of a clear head, Mr. Riggs, said
the tutor again, with increased admiration, and
expounds law like a book:and with a great deal
of wit too!He reminds me of the celebrated Mr.
Ponsonby whom I once heard at the Four Courts, in
a cause
I am entirely of Mr. Warts' opinion of the
value
of these considerations, said Swansdown.
They seem to me sagacious and reasonable,
said Mr. Tracy, and concur to strengthen the first
views which I took upon this subject.
Let these facts then, gentlemen, be inquired
in-into
,
said Meriwether.
Wart arose from his seat and walking carelessly
a short distance from the group, beckoned
Meriwether
to follow him, and, when they were together
said,
I have thrown out enough to put Mr. Tracy
upon a new scent, which, if it be well followed up,
will answer our purpose; and now, I think I will
give our friend Swansdown a walk into the marsh.
Since it is agreed, Mr. Swansdown, said Philly,
returning to the party, that testimony should be
heard upon the questions I have proposed, we shall
be able to form a better judgment by a cautious
survey
of the ground ourselves. It is scarcely possible
that the mill-pond should have vanished without
leaving some traces to show whether it went off in a
night, or wasted away, like a chesnut fence-rail
under
the united attacks of sun and wind. There is
nothing like the Trial by View.
In what manner do you propose, Mr. Wart, to
enjoy this view? asked Swansdown, with some
concern. Can we see it from the hill side? for it
seems rather hazardous for a passage on horseback.
By walking over it, replied Philly very cooly.
With a little circumspection we can get across
tolerably dry. Leap from one tuft to another, and
keep your balance. The thing is very easy.
We shall find brambles in our way, said the
reluctant Swansdown.
E squill non nascitur rosa, Mr. Swansdown,
replied the other. It is not the first time I have
explored
a marsh. Why man, if you had your gun
with you, the woodcock would take you twice
through the thickest of it! This is a notorious place
for woodcock
There are snakes, and some of them of a
dangerous
species. I have an utter horror of snakes,
persisted
Swansdown.
There are some copperheads and a few
mocassins
,
replied Philly, whose bite is not altogether
harmless. As to the black snake, and viper and
common water snake, you may amuse yourself with
taking them in your hand. Or take St. Patrick's
plan, Mr. Swansdown; cut a hazle rod, and if you
use it properly you may conjure every snake of them
out of striking distance.
Ha, ha! A facetious man, that Mr. Philly
Wart, said the parson again, to Harvey Riggs.
Come, Mr. Swansdown, I will lead the way.
Don't be alarmed: We shall be better acquainted
with the boundary when we get back.
Saying these words, Philly walked forward along
the margin of the marshy ground which was once
the bed of the dam, and having selected a
favourable
point for entering upon this region, he turned
into
it with a prompt and persevering step, making
advantage of such spots as were firm enough to
sustain
his weight, and, pushing the shrubbery to one
side, was soon lost to view. Swansdown, ashamed
of being outdone, but protesting his reluctance, and
laughing with a forced and dry laugh, cautiously
entered
at the same point, and followed in Philly's
footsteps
.
When they were both still within hearing
Philly's voice could be recognized, saying
Look where you step, Mr. Swansdown! That's
the true rule of life, and particularly, for a man who
meddles with law. Have your eyes about you
man! Latet anguis in herb, ha, ha, ha!
Hear to him! exclaimed the parson, a
prodigious
smart man, that Philly Wart!
After a short interval, Philly's voice was heard
calling out, Mr. Swansdown, Mr. Swansdown,
where are you? Not lost, I hope! This way, man;
VOL. I. 21
take the left side of the gum-tree and you will reach
the bank of the Apple-pie as dry as a bone. And a
monstrous stream it is, as you will find when you
get here!
I have encountered shocking obstacles, Mr.
Wart, exclaimed the voice of Swansdown, at
some distance; I have one leg submersed in water
and mud, up to the knee; and have had a score of
black snakes hissing at me, ever since I got into this
cursed place. Pray allow me to return!
Come on man! was the reply, you will reach
dry ground presently. What signifies a wet foot!
Here's a noble prospect for you.
Another interval of silence now ensued, and this
being followed by a distant hum of conversation,
showed us that the two wanderers had fallen again
into company.
Whilst we sat amongst the willows that skirted
the original margin of the dam, expecting to see the
counsellor and his companion emerge from the
thicket on the opposite side, our attention was all
at once aroused by the deep tongue of Wart's hounds,
who had been exploring the fastness
cotemporaneously
with their master. They had evidently turned
out a fox; and the rapidly retreating and advancing
notes informed us of the fact that the object of their
pursuit was doubling, with great activity, from one
part of the swamp to another. This sudden
out-break
threw a surprising exhilaration into our party.
We sprang to our feet and ran from place to place,
expecting every moment to see the fox appear upon
the field: these movements were accompanied with
a general hallooing and shouting, in which the voice
of Philly Wart, amongst the recesses of the marsh,
was distinctly audible. Rip, at the first note, had
run to his horse, and now came galloping past us,
half wild with delight. Mr. Chub was in a perfect
ecstasy, jumping, flinging out his arms, and vocife
rating all the technical cries of encouragement usual
amongst the votaries of the chace. Even old Mr.
Tracy was roused by the vivacity of the scene.
His eyes sparkled and his gestures became
peculiarly
animated. All the dogs of our train had taken
into the swamp, and barked with a deafening
clamour
as they pursued the track of the hounds, whose
strong musical notes were now fast dying away in
distance, as these eager animals pursued their prey
directly up the stream for more than a mile. For a
time, they were even lost to the ear, until, having
made another double, they were heard retracing
their steps, and coming back to their original starting
point, as their short and sonorous notes crowded
upon the ear with increasing distinctness.
At length, the little animal, that had given rise to
all this uproar, was descried on the opposite side of
the swamp, some distance ahead of her pursuers,
speeding, with terrified haste, to a hole in the bank,
where she was observed safely to accomplish her
retreat.
The duration of this animating episode was not
above half an hour; and for the greater portion of
that period we had totally lost all intelligence of
Wart and Swansdown, but were now greatly
amused to perceive the old lawyer breaking out of
the cover, immediately at the spot where the fox had
taken to the earth. And there he stood, guarding
the place against the invasion of the dogs, who
seemed to be frantic with disappointment at not
being
permitted to enter this entrenchment of their
enemy. By whipping, hallooing and scolding, Philly
succeeded in drawing them away; and now, for the
first time during this interval, turned his attention to
the fate of his comrade. Swansdown was no where
to be seen. Wart called aloud several times
without
receiving an answer; and at length the party on
our side, also, began to vociferate the name of the
lost gentleman. This was no sooner done than we
were surprised to receive an answer from the midst
of the bushes, within ten paces of the spot where we
stood. In one instant afterwards, Mr. Swansdown
reappeared, almost exactly at the point where he
had first entered the swamp. His plight was sadly
changed. A thick coat of black mud covered the
lower extremities of his pantaloons, and his dress, in
places, was torn by briars; but as if glad to be
extricated
from his perils, on any terms, he came forth
with a face of good humour, and readily joined us in
the laugh that his strangely discomfited exterior
excited
.
Well, he remarked, to gratify Mr. Wart, I
have seen the Apple-pie; and I can truly say that I
have enjoyed more pleasure in my life, at less cost.
A fine figure I make of it! he exclaimed, pointing
to his clothes. We had no sooner reached what
Mr. Wart called the bank of the rivulet, than those
misbegotten whelps set up such a hideous yelling as
turned my excellent friend, the counsellor, crazy
upon the spot; and thereupon he set off at full speed,
like an old hound himself, leaving me to flounder
back or forward, as best I might. I scarcely know
what course I took, and when I thought I had
reached the other side, it seems I had arrived just
where I started. I can't say I think as highly of
Mr. Wart's trial by the view, as he does!
We gave the unfortunate gentleman all the
consolation
his case admitted of; and returning to the
ruins of the mill, there took our seats to await the
return of Mr. Wart.
It was not long before he appeared, followed by
the two dogs. He had crossed from the side on
which we left him, with as little concern as if he
had been walking on the firmest ground, and joined
our company, more in the guise of an experienced
woodman than of a gentleman of the learned
profession
intent upon disentangling points of law.
It may well be supposed that the labours of the
day terminated at this point. Our spirits had been
too much roused by the events of the morning to
allow
us to sit down again to the business of the
law-suit
;
and the uncomfortable condition of
Swansdown
made it necessary that he should, as soon as
possible, be allowed an opportunity to change his
dress. It was therefore intimated by Mr. Wart, that
the question of the boundary line should be
adjourned
21 *
until the next morning, when, he remarked, he
thought he should be able to give testimony himself
that would be material to the cause.
In accordance with this intimation, it was arranged
that the parties should convene the next morning at
the Brakes; and having determined upon this, old
Mr. Tracy and Swansdown mounted their horses
and pursued their road to the mansion house at the
Brakes, which was not above two miles distant.
The rest of the party returned to Swallow Barn.
CHAPTER XXIV.
MERRIMENT AND SOBRIETY.
It
was at a late dinner hour that our party
returned
to Swallow Barn, from the expedition of the
boundary line. The absence of Mr. Tracy and his
champion Swansdown, caused some anxious
solicitude
in the family, which, together with the curiosity
of the ladies to hear all the particulars of the day's
adventure, gave rise to a multitude of inquiries that
served to produce much animation at the dinner
table
.
Ned and Harvey detailed what they called the
facts, with exorbitant amplification, and with an
assumed
earnestness, that baffled all attempts to arrive
at the truth. A great deal, they affirmed, was to be
said on both sides. And then they gave a piteous
account of Swansdown's misfortunes; praising his
calm and dignified composure, notwithstanding he
was so torn by brambles, and so disfigured with
mud, and so frightened with snakes
He was not attacked by these reptiles! cried
Prudence, with a marked concern.
They did not absolutely strike their fangs into
him, said Harvey; but they reared up their grizzly
heads at his feet, and hissed hideously at him.
And then he was so drenched to the very skin!
said Ned.
Poor gentleman! exclaimed Harvey, an he
'scape a cold or an ague, his friends should be
thankful
.
Heaven knows what would become of the
boundary line, if any thing were to happen to him
at this critical juncture!
And he looked so forlorn! continued Ned.
And so interesting! said Harvey, with the
black mud up to his knees, and his white
pocket-handkerchief
up to his face, wiping away the blood
where the briars had made free with his chin.
Don't you believe them, aunt Pru! cried Rip.
Mr. Swansdown was laughing all the time,for
we had a most an elegant fox-hunt, only it was all
in the swamp, and the bushes would not let us see
any thing!
After all then, cousin Harvey, said Catharine,
tell us seriously how this famous arbitration has
ended.
Most appropriately, said Harvey. About forty
years ago, the law-suit began with the quest of a
wild goose, and, having exercised the ingenuity of all
the low-country lawyers in succession, during all
this time, it has now turned into a fox-chace, and
ended by earthing a poor little harmless quadruped,
precisely at the place of beginning.
That's true, said Philly Wart, laughing, the
hole was as nearly as possible at the commencement
of the first line laid off in the survey of the mill-dam.
But, Miss Tracy, he continued, you must not
suppose
that there was any design on our part in putting
up the fox this morning. This is not the time of the
year for such sport, because these animals have all
young families to take care of, and it is deemed cruel
to disturb them: but my dogs happened to fall upon
the trail of madam, as she was looking out for her
breakfast. And so, off they went, Miss Catharine,
making excellent music. It was a cunning thing
for the little animal, too, to take right up the swamp;
for, besides the wind being in that direction,which
you know would carry the scent away from the dogs,
she had the water to wash away the foot-prints;
and, in addition to this, she was leading them off,
as fast as she could, from her den, which is a
motherly
trick these creatures have. But, you see,
Miss Tracy, the more she ran the warmer she got;
and so, she left her scent upon the bushes and
brambles
.
If you could have seen the dogs you would
have found them with their noses up, as
unconcerned
as if they had had her in view all the time.
Presently
,
she got the foot of them so far, that she found
she could get back to her nest before they could come
up; and so, she doubled beautifully down the swamp
again, and straight to her hole, as fast as her legs
could carry her. I knew what her trick was from
the first; and was, therefore, on the lookout, which
enabled me to reach her just as she entered it; and
there I defended her gallantly against the invasion
of her enemies.
For which you deserve the thanks of all
mothers
,
Mr Wart, said my cousin Lucretia.
And of all sportsmen too, said Harvey Riggs.
For a fox that is hunted and runs away,
May live to be hunted another day.
Philly Wart had become exceedingly animated in
the course of the recital above detailed, and
notwithstanding
it was ludicrously out of place, considering
the person to whom it was addressed, Philly was too
full of his subject to let it drop. His description was
accompanied by a vivacious and expressive
gesticulation
,
that prevented him from eating his dinner;
and Catharine had become so much amused with his
manner, that she listened with a marked
approbation
,
and encouraged him to proceed, by frequent
nods of her head.
It is quite lawful and customary, Miss Tracy,
continued the counsellor, to hunt young foxes at
this season, at moonlight; and it is a fine sport, I
assure
you! If you were to get on your horse to-night,
about twelve,for we shall have a bright moon by
that hour,and ride over to the old mill-dam, and
take my two dogs with you, you would be sure to
get two or three of the cubs on foot almost
immediately
,
and the mother besides; and then you might
take a seat upon the rider of a fence, with your great
coat well wrapped about you, and your hands in
your pockets, and see a fine run. For, at this time
of year, they (especially the young ones,) won't run
far from the nest; but they are apt to play in circles
round it, which gives you a chance, in a clear
moonlight
,
to see them twenty times in an hour. And
then, when they get tired, Miss Tracy, they have
only to pop into the nest, and there they are as snug
as you could wish them!
I have read, said Catharine, of ladies
indulging
in the sports of the chace; but it would be a
great novelty, Mr. Wart, to find one of our sex
pursuing
such a pastime alone, on the borders of a
desolate
marsh, at midnight, and seated, as you
propose
,
on the top-rail of a fence, with her hands in her
pockets!
Here followed a general laugh from the
company
.
To make the picture complete, said Harvey
Riggs, cousin Kate, you should have a scant
mantle
of scarlet, and a pipe in your mouth.
And a broom-stick, I suppose you would say,
cousin Harvey, instead of a pony, added
Catharine
.
When I said you, Miss Tracy, said the
counsellor
,
smiling, I meant Ned Hazard here and his
friends, who profess to be fond of manly exercises.
I profess, said Ned, a sovereign aversion to
agues, and an especial proclivity to the comforts of
a warm bed.
Towards the hour of sunset the ladies from the
Brakes were preparing to return home, and, as the
arrangements for the following day contemplated a
meeting at Mr. Tracy's we promised to assemble
there at an early hour. Prudence had yielded to
the entreaties of Catharine and Bel to accompany
them that evening, and a horse was accordingly
brought to the door for her. Our guests, with this
addition, soon afterwards left Swallow Barn.
When we had concluded our evening repast,
that substantial country meal which it would be
altogether
inadequate to call by the feeble, but
customary
name of teathe pleasant change wrought
upon the atmosphere by the dew, which in the
low-country, at this season, falls heavily after night,
had, as usual, brought the inmates of the house
to the doors. Mr. Wart and Frank Meriwether
had taken their seats in the porch; and here,
dismissing
the tone of levity with which the events
of the day had been conducted, they fell into a
grave conference upon sundry matters of public
concern. The rest of us sat quietly listening to the
conversation, which became interesting from the
sensible
and shrewd character of the interlocutors.
Philly Wart, notwithstanding the mixture of jest
and almost frivolity, that, during the day, had shown
itself in his demeanor, now exhibited the thought
and reflection of one versed in the secrets of his
nature, and that keen insight into the merits of men
and their actions, that can only be gained by
extensive
intercourse with the world. His remarks had
a strong flavour of originality, and although now and
then brought to the verge of the ludicrous by a rash
and unsuccessful attempt to be figurative, they were,
nevertheless, pithy and forcibly illustrative of his
subject
.
Meriwether, with less pretensions to a
knowledge
of men, was calm, philosophical and
benevolent
;
his character principally manifesting itself in
certain kindly prejudices, and in a tone of observation,
which, in reference to political conclusions, might be
said to be even desponding. Frank has never found
the actions of those who administer our government
squaring with that lofty virtue which the excellence
of his own principles has taught him to exact from
all men who aspire to control the interests of society.
In fact, he speaks like an ancient stoic, removed from
all ambition to figure on the theatre of life, and
quietly observing the tumult of affairs from a
position
too distant to be reached by the sordid passions
that sway the multitude; or, in other words, he
discourses
like an easy and cultivated
country-gentleman
.
It was in summing up a train of reflections, in this
temper, upon the general aspect of the great
political
movements of the day, that he concludedas
we broke up our party
Well, Mr. Wart, you think better of these things
than I do; but, to my mind, there is no satisfaction
in this survey. Look which way I may, to the one
side or to the other, to me it seems all equally vile
and contemptible; and so, good night!
VOL. I. 22
CHAPTER XXV.
THE OLD SCHOOL.
I AROSE on the following morning soon after
daylight
,
and was quietly descending the staircase when
I was saluted by the voices of Lucy and Vic, who,
at this early hour, were equipped for the day. They
were looking out with some eagerness at the clouds.
A heavy rain had fallen during the night, but the
eastern horizon was nevertheless tinted with the rosy
flush of morning, and the indications were favourable
to the dispersion of the few black vapours that still
rolled across the heavens. My little cousins soon
made me acquainted with the cause of their early
appearance. They were to accompany us to the
Brakes, and had planned it to ask me to take a seat
with them in the carriage, telling me, that if I did
not go with them they would be obliged to take Rip,
which, as Vic said, Rip never
did
like.
I assented heartily to their proposal; and upon
this they fell to dancing round me, and amusing me
with a great deal of prattle. They insisted upon
my going with them to the stable yard, just to
make sure that uncle Carey was cleaning up the
carriage, and getting ready. Here we found the
old menial with a bucket of water and sponge, busily
employed in the task the little girls had coaxed him
to perform. He was affectionately obliging to his
young mistresses, and spoke to them in a tone that
showed how largely he partook of the family interest
in them, although it was sufficiently apparent that
he deferred but little to their authority.
As soon as breakfast was over, Carey brought the
coach to the door. It was a capacious old vehicle,
that had known better days, being somewhat faded
in its furniture, and still clothed with its original
cover of yellow oil-cloth, of which, I suppose, it had
never been stripped, although now arrived at the
latter stage of its existence. The plainness of this
part of the equipage was compensated in a pair of
high-mettled, full-blooded chesnut horses, in excellent
keeping, but rather light in comparison with the size
of the coach to which they were harnessed.
Meriwether having unexpectedly received
intelligence
that rendered his presence necessary at a
remote
part of the farm, was obliged to forego his visit
to the Brakes; and Ned was accordingly
commissioned
by him to make his excuses and act as his
representative. This matter being arranged, and all
things being in readiness for our departure, Mr.
Wart, attended by Ned Hazard and Rip, set out on
horseback; whilst the two little girls and myself
took our seats in the carriage, and old Carey,
mounting
the box, put off his horses at a brisk speed.
As we ascended the hill, and came in full view of
the mansion house at the Brakes, we could observe
Mr. Tracy walking backward and forward with his
arms behind him, on a level plat at the door; and
as soon as our party attracted his attention, he was
seen to halt, with his hat raised off his head, and held
in such a manner as to shield his eyes from the sun,
until we got near enough for recognition. There
was an unwonted alacrity in his salutations; and he
helped Lucy and Vic from the carriage himself,
with a gallantry that showed the cheerful state of
his feelings, not forgetting to take a kiss from each as
he handed them to the door.
When we entered the house, Harvey Riggs and
Bel were observed walking leisurely up the lawn,
from the direction of the river. At a parlour
window
sat Catharine and Prudence, in an absorbing
conversation with Mr. Swansdown, who was
apparently
regaling his interested auditors with a
narrative
of deep attraction; and perhaps it may have
been an idle preconception of mine, but I thought
Prudence, especially, listened with a more
intelligent
and changeful sympathy than was her wont.
What was the topic, and in what language urged, I
am altogether ignorant; but to my prejudiced vision
it seemed that either the story or the speaker had
charmed never so wisely.
In describing the mansion house at the Brakes, in
a former chapter, I have informed my reader that it
is without architectural embellishment. One front
faces the river, from which it is separated by a long,
sloping and unshaded hill. At the foot of this slope
the bank of the river is some eight or ten feet above
the water, and is clothed with a screen of native
shrubbery. The road winds round the hill from the
river, so as to approach the house on the opposite
side. This front of the dwelling differs widely from
that I have described. Its plainness is relieved by
a portico supported by stuccoed columns, massive
and rough, and over which the second story of the
building projects, so as to form a small apartment
that has rather a grotesque appearance,as it may
be said to resemble a box perched upon a four-legged
stool. This superstructure is built of wood painted
blue, though a good deal weather-beaten; and it is
illustrated with a large bow-window in the front,
surrounded with a heavy white cornice filled with
modillions and other old-fashioned ornaments: it
strikes the observer as an appendage to the edifice of
questionable utility, and as somewhat incongruous
with the prevailing simplicity that characterizes the
exterior of the mansion. A range of offices, old, and
interpolated with modern additions, sweeps
rectangularly
along the brow of the hill, and shows the
ample provision made for the comforts of solid
housekeeping
.
The whole of this quarter is thickly
embowered
with trees, amongst which the line of
lombardy
poplars, that I have before had occasion to
notice, is marshalled along the avenue, from the
mansion downwards, like a gigantic array of sylvan
grenadiers. Over all the grounds in the vicinity of
the buildings, an air of neatness prevails, even to an
extent that might be called pedantic.
The interior of the house is in full contrast with its
22 *
outward appearance, and shows the relics of a costly
grandeur. The rooms are large, and decorated with
a profusion of wood work, chiselled into the gorgeous
forms of ancient pomp. The doors have huge
pediments
above them, with figures carved upon the
entablatures
;
garlands of roses, as stiff as petrifactions,
are moulded, with a formal grace, upon the jambs of
the window-frames; and the mantel-pieces are
thickly
embossed with odd little mythological monsters,
as various as the metamorphoses of Ovid. The
walls are enriched with a fretted cornice, in the
frieze of which cupids, satyrs and fauns are taking
hands, and seem to be dancing country-dances
through thickets of nondescript vegetables. The
fire-places are noble monuments of ancient
hospitality
,
stately and vast, and on either side of them are
deep recesses, surmounted by ornamented arches,
and lighted by windows that look out from the
gableends
of the building.
The furniture of these apartments retains the
vestiges
of a corresponding splendour. The tables
seem to have turned into iron from age, and are
supported
upon huge, crooked legs: the chairs, sofas,
fire-screens, and other articles of embellishment,
though damaged by time, still afford glimpses of the
lacker and varnish that gave effulgence to their days
of glory. Amongst these remnants of the old time I
recognized, with an affectionate interest, two
elliptical
mirrors,no doubt the marvel of the country
when they first reached this strand,set in frames of
tarnished gilt, and curiously carved into droll
resemblances
of twisted serpents, each swallowing his
own tail.
I must return from this digression to continue my
narrative of the important affair that had now brought
us to the Brakes.
From an early hour, Mr. Tracy had been in a
state of agitated spirits with the thoughts of the
arbitration
.
Although his zeal had latterly subsided, it
had been waked up by the recent movements, like a
snake at the return of spring. The old gentleman
rises from his bed, at all seasons, with the dawn of
day; but this morning he was observed to make an
unusual stir. It was remarked that his dress was
even more scrupulously adjusted than ordinarily; the
ruffles of his sleeves protruded over his hands with a
more pregnant strut; his cravat was drawn, if
possible
,
tighter round his neck; and his silvery hair was
combed back into the small, taper cue that played
upon his cape, with a sleekness that indicated more
minute attention to personal decoration than the
family were accustomed to expect. He is the very
picture of a man for a law-suit. His tall figure and
care-worn face have such an emaciated air! and
when to this is added the impression made by his
tight, brown kerseymere small-clothes, and his long,
stocking-like boots, buttoned by straps to his knees,
and the peculiar capacity of stride which this costume
discloses, we have the personation of a man eminently
calculated to face the biting blast of the law, or to
worm through the intricacies of a tangled and
long-winded
suit, with the least possible personal
obstruction
.
Harvey Riggs told us that Mr. Tracy had scarcely
eaten any breakfast, being in that fidgety state of
mind that takes away the appetite; and, what was
a little out of his common behaviour, he was even
jocose upon the existing relations betwixt himself
and Meriwether. It was also observable that,
notwithstanding
this elevation of spirits, he would
occasionally
break out into a slight expression of
peevishness
when any thing baulked his humour. It fell
upon Ned Hazard to encounter one of these passing
rebukes, as will appear in the dialogue I am about to
detail.
Mr. Tracy has reached that age at which old
persons
lose sight of the true relations of society. He
considers all men, not yet arrived at middle age, as
mere hair-brained boys; and does not scruple,
especially
in matters of business, to treat them
accordingly
.
I believe he is of opinion that Frank
Meriwether himself has scarcely attained to
manhood
.
But as for Ned Hazard, or even Harvey
Riggs, he thinks them not yet out of their teens.
This temper is apparent when the old gentleman
experiences
any contradiction; for he is then apt to
become dogmatic and peremptory, and sometimes a
little harsh. But he likes Ned very well; and
frequently
,
when he is in good humour, laughs at his
pranks, until the tears come into his eyes, and roll
over his dry cheeks, like vinegar trickling over a
piece of leather.
Now it happens that Ned stands precisely in that
category that renders him nervously solicitous to
appear
well in the eyes of Mr. Tracy. He is sadly
aware that Bel's father has taken up an idea that he
is a thoughtless, unballasted youth, and utterly
deficient
in those thrifty business-habits that are most
pleasing to the contemplation of age; and he is
therefore perpetually making awkward attempts to
produce a different opinion. My reader has
perhaps
already had occasion to remark that Ned's
character is utterly inauspicious to the management
of such a matter. He is purblind to all the
consequences
of his own conduct, and as little calculated
to play the politician as a child.
When the gentlemen of our party had gathered
together, Mr. Tracy was anxious that no time should
be lost to the prejudice of the principal concern of
our meeting; and having announced this, he was
approached by Ned, who, with a solemn face,
endeavouring
to assume as much of the look of a
negotiator
as he was able,made a formal
communication
of the cause of Meriwether's absence, and of
the arrangement that he himself was to appear as
the representative of Swallow Barn. Mr. Tracy
did not like it; he could not imagine how any
domestic
engagement could claim precedence over one
so important as this. He was on the verge of
saying
so; but, as if struck with a sudden thought, he
paused, stared at Ned, without uttering a word,
grasped his nether lip with his left hand, and fell into
a study. Ned stood by, looking as respectfully as he
could. The conclusion was favourable; for the old
gentleman brightened up, and delivered himself, with
some hesitation, pretty much in this way:
Well, well! It is all right that you should give
your attention to this matter. We old folks labour
altogether for the young; and they that come after
us must live and learn. I wish I could make my
Ralph feel the interest he ought to take in this
subject
;
but he is wayward, and plays his own game.
As to you, Mr. Hazard, although you are young and
thoughtless, and not of an age to take care of your
property, this may be said to be your own case, sir,
seeing that you are the heir to Swallow Barn under
your father's will. And I am told Mr. Meriwether
is clearing the track for you; he is wiping off the
incumbrances
.
So it is your own case you have to
look after.
For my part, Mr. Tracy, replied Ned, with a
timid deference, and with a singular want of
shrewdness
,
considering the person he addressed, I have
never seen the use of this controversy. Our family
ought to have given up to you, rather than trouble
the courts with such an inconsiderable matter. I
have always expressed my willingness to end the
affair
by making you a deed.
Young gentleman, said Mr. Tracy, rather
briskly
,
and looking with an air of surprise at Ned, you
reckon without your host if you consider this a
matter
of acres
at all. Your father, sir, and I had
an honest difference of opinion; he thought he was
right; I thought I was; and we both knew that the
other would expend twenty times the value of the
land, before he would take an inch of it but as
matter
of right. I am not accustomed to take up or put
down opinions upon light grounds. In such matters
I do not count the cost. A deed, sir!
I beg pardon, replied Ned confusedly, and
alarmed by this flash of temper, which set him, like
a boy who has mistaken the mood of his master,
to a speedy recantation. You mistook my
meaning
,I
meant to say
Yes, yes, interrupted the old gentleman,
relapsing
into the opposite tone of kindness, as if aware
that his feelings had been unnecessarily roused, so
I suppose, my young friend! You are but a novice
in the world; but you know Isaac Tracy well
enough to be quite certain that he does not fling
away five hundred pounds,aye, twice five hundred,
to maintain his title to a bed of splatterdocks,
unless
there was something at the bottom of the dispute
that belonged to his character.
This remark was concluded with an emotion that
amounted almost to a laugh; and so completely
reassured
Ned, as to embolden him to venture upon a
joke.
Such character, said Ned, is like the goose in
the fable; it lays golden eggs.
And there is nothing in it when you cut it up,
Mr. Edward, that is what you were going to say,
added the old gentleman, greatly amused with the
remark. You are a facetious young gentleman.
You say pretty sharp things now and then, Edward,
and don't spare such old codgers as I, ha, ha! he
continued, laughing, and tapping Ned familiarly on
the back. Why, what a plague! Here we are
wasting our time with this merry Ned Hazard, when
we ought to be at our business. Dogs take you,
for a jester as you are! he exclaimed, jogging Ned
with his elbow, You will trick us out of our proper
vocation with a laugh, would ye! Harvey, call Mr.
Swansdown from the parlour; tell him he must
leave the women; we have our hands full.
After this burst from the old gentleman, he opened a
door that admitted us to a small room that he calls his
study. It is an inner shrine that is deemed a
prohibited
spot to the members of the household, as the
key of it is generally carried in Mr. Tracy's own
pocket. This apartment is so characteristic of its
inhabitant, that I must take advantage of my
introduction
to it, to make my reader acquainted with its
general appearance.
Some heavy volumes in quarto, such as constituted
the guise in which the best authors of Queen Anne's
time were accustomed to be exhibited to the public,
were scattered over a range of shelves that occupied
one side of the room. There was one large
window
only to the apartment, through which the sun
flung a broad light, that served to heighten the
forlorn
impression made by the obsolete and almost
shabby air of the furniture; on the sill of this
window
a collection of pods and garden seeds were laid
out to be dried. In another quarter of the room, a
shelf was appropriated to the accommodation of a
motley assemblage of old iron, of which the principal
pieces were rusty hinges, bolts, screws, bridle-bits,
stirrups, and fragments of agricultural implements;
and upon the floor, below these, stood a chest of
tools. The fire-place had a ragged appearance,
being
strewed with scraps of paper and other rubbish,
and upon one side of it was placed an old-fashioned
secretary, with a lid like the roof of a house. One
or two paintings, too obscure to be guessed at, hung
over the mantel-piece; and on the wall near the
door, was suspended an almost illegible map of
Virginia
.
A small table was opened out in the middle
of the floor, and provided with a writing apparatus:
around this table were three or four broad,
high-backed
mahogany chairs, with faded crimson seats stuck
round with brass nails. The cobwebs on various
parts of the walls, and the neglected aspect of the
room, showed it to be an apartment not much
resorted
to or used by the old gentleman, except as a
mere place of deposit for lumber.
When Mr. Swansdown, at Harvey's summons,
made his appearance, our friend Philly Wart
indulged
in some little raillery upon the mischances of the
day before, and accused the sentimental gentleman
of deserting him; but finding old Mr. Tracy already
VOL. I. 23
provided with a mass of documents, and standing
ready, with spectacles on nose, to plunge into the
middle of affairs, the several parties sat down and
addressed themselves to their tasks like men
determined
to make an end of matters. Ned put on a
farcical gravity, and began to rummage over the
papers
,
as if he was thoroughly acquainted with every
document in the bundle, until Mr. Tracy, raising his
glasses up to his forehead, asked him, with a fretful
earnestness, what he was in search of. This simple
interrogatory, and the look that accompanied it, so
disconcerted the representative of Swallow Barn,
that he was obliged to reply, for lack of something
better to say, that he was looking for nothing in
particular
!
I thought so, by your haste, said the old
gentleman
,
as he brought his spectacles back to their
original
position. Ned, to conceal his confusion,
picked
up a large sheet of parchment, and set about
reading
its contents regularly through from the
beginning
.
As soon as we saw this little wittenagemote fairly
at work with the law-suit, Harvey and myself
quietly
stole away, not, however, without receiving a
glance from Ned Hazard, who turned his head and
gave us a look of sly perplexity as we disappeared at
the door.
The ladies had retired to their rooms. Ralph had
taken away our young cavalier Rip to the river; and
being thus left to ourselves, Harvey and I sat down
at the front door, attracted by the commanding view
of the scenery, and the appearance of a large ship
that, with all her canvass spread, was winging her
way round the headlands of the James River,
towards
the Atlantic.
In this situation, Harvey gave me the particulars
of the scene I am about to describe in the next
chapter.
CHAPTER XXVI.
THE RAKING HAWK.
I said
that when we arrived at the Brakes, Bel
and Harvey Riggs were seen approaching the house
from a distance. The morning was still cool from
the evaporation of the dew before the rays of the
sun. A pleasant breeze swept across the lawn from
the direction of the river. Bel was leaning upon
Harvey's arm in earnest conversation; her face
shaded by a kind of hood of green silk, and her dress
such as ladies wear in the earlier part of the day,
before
they perform the more studied labours of the
toilet
;
it was of a light fabric, neatly fitted to her
person
.
Exercise had thrown a healthy hue over her
cheek; and the fresh breeze fluttering amongst the
folds of her dress imparted an idea of personal
comfort
that accorded with the coolness of the costume,
and the blooming countenance of its wearer. It did
not escape my notice, that her foot, which is
exceedingly
well shaped, appeared to great advantage in
an accurately fitted shoe, bound to her ankle with
black ribbons laced across stockings of spotless
white. Her exterior was altogether remarkable for
a becoming simplicity of attire, and seemed to speak
that purity of taste which is the most beautiful and
attractive quality in the character of a woman.
I must admonish my reader that, as my design in
this work has been simply to paint in true colours
the scenes of domestic life as I have found them in
Virginia, I do not scruple to record whatever has
interested
me; and if, perchance, my story should not
advance according to the regular rules of
historico-dramatic
composition to its proper conclusion, I do
not hold myself accountable for any misadventure
on that score. I sketch with a careless hand;
and must leave the interest I exciteif such a
thing may beto the due developement of the facts
as they come within my knowledge. For the
present
,
I have to tell what Harvey Riggs and Bel had
been concerning themselves about, before we met
them in the hall. If any thing is to grow out of it
hereafter, it is more than I know.
It had been hinted to me from two or three
quarters
,
but principally by Ned Hazard, and I believe
I have said as much to my reader in some former
chapter, that Bel Tracy is a little given to certain
romantic fancies, such as country ladies who want
excitement and read novels are apt to engender.
Her vivacity and spirit show themselves in the zeal
with which she ever cultivates the freaks that take
possession of her mind. For some time past, she
had devoted her time to training a beautiful
marsh-hawk
,
a bird resembling the short-winged hawk
known by the name of the hen-harrier in the old
books, and had nurtured it with her own hand from
23 *
its callow state. By an intimacy of one year she
had rendered this bird so docile, that, at her
summons
,
he would leave a larger wicker cage in which
he was ordinarily imprisoned, and which was
suspended
from an old mulberry-tree in the yard, to
perch upon her wrist. The picturesque association
of falconry with the stories of an age that Walter
Scott has rendered so bewitching to the fancy of
meditative maidens, had inspired Bel with an
especial
ardour in the attempt to reclaim her bird. In
her pursuit of this object she had picked up some
gleanings of the ancient lore that belonged to the
art; and, fantastic as it may seem, began to think
that her unskilful efforts would be attended with
success
.
Her hawk, it is true, had not been taught to
follow his quarry, but he was mannedas Bel said of
himin all such exercises as made him a fit
companion
for a lady. She had provided him with
leather bewets, that buttoned round his legs, and to
each of these was attached a small silver bell. A
silver
ring, or varvel, was fitted to one leg, and on it
was engraved the name of her favourite, copied from
some old tale, Fairbourne, with the legend
attached
,
I live in my lady's grace. I know not what
other foppery was expended upon her minion; but I
will warrant he went forth in as conceited array as
his lady's grace could devise for him. A lady's
favourite is not apt to want gauds and jewels.
Immediately after breakfast, Bel stole forth alone
to Fairbourne's perch. She held in her hand a pair
of leather jesses, a leash, and a ball of fine cord,
which she termed a creance. Now, the thought
that had taken possession of her brain was, to slip off
with Fairbourne into the field, and give him a flight;
a privilege that he had never enjoyed during the
whole period of his thraldom. Bel supposed that by
fastening the jesses to his legs,or I should say,
speaking like one versed in the mystery, his arms,
and the leash to the jesses, and the creance to that,
Fairbourne would be as secure in the empyrean as
on his perch: she had only to manage him as a boy
manages his kite. Her purpose, however, was to
try the first experiment alone, and, upon its success,
she designed to surprise her visiters, as well as the
family, with the rare entertainment of a hawking
scene.
As she stood under the mulberry-tree, looking at
Fairbourne tiring at the limb of a pullet, or, in other
words, whetting his voracious appetite with the raw
leg of a chicken, and had just snatched the morsel
from his beak to make him the more keen, Harvey
Riggs accidentally came into the porch, and,
stooping
down, picked up from the floor a strange
resemblance
of a bird compacted of leather and feathers.
What child's toy is this, Bel? cried he, loud
enough to startle the lady with the question. What
crotchet have you in your head now?
Pray, cousin Harvey, come this way, said she,
turning round with the hawk upon her hand. It is
my lure; bring it to me, for I want your help. I am
going to give Fairbourne a holiday. You shall see
him presently dabbling his wing in yonder cloud.
Harvey approached with the lure in his hand;
and Bel, patting the bird upon the back, as he
alternately
stretched out first one wing, and then the
other, along his leg,in the action know by the name
of mantling,explained her whole design to her
cousin. Then binding on the jesses, with the leash
and creance, each made fast to the other, she sallied
out upon the lawn, attended by her squire, until she
reached a spot at a distance from any tree, where
she intimated to Harvey that she would now let
Fairbourne fly.
But if he should not come back, Bel? inquired
Harvey. For it seems to me not altogether so
safe to trust to his love of his perch, or even of his
mistress; although in that he is not of my mind. In
spite of your lure, which I know is a great
temptation
to some persons, my pretty cousin, there are
creatures that prefer the open world to your hand,
strange as it may seem!
Is not here my creance? asked Bel, in reply.
And then, when the lure fails, have I not only to
pull the string?
Your light flax is not so strong as a wild
bird's love of freedom, said Harvey.
Ah, cousin, you forget that Fairbourne is a
gallant
bird, and loves to hear me call him. I will
whistle him down without compulsion. Now, mark
how loth he is to leave my hand, continued Bel,
rapidly endeavouring to cast the bird off, who,
instead
of flying, merely spread his wings with a
motion
necessary to preserve his balance. At length,
she succeeded in disengaging him from her hand,
when, instead of mounting into the air, he tamely lit
upon the ground some few paces from her feet.
Oh villain Fairbourne! cried Harvey, you
grovel when you should soar.
This comes of my not hooding him, said Bel.
But it seemed so cruel to pass a thread through
his eyelids,which is called seeling, and must be
done before he would bear the hood,that I could
not think of it. I don't believe these ladies of the
old time could have been so very tender-hearted.
Cousin, if he will not fly, the direction is to strike at
him with your wand.
Which means my foot, said Harvey, so,
master Fairbourne, up, or my wand shall ruffle
your feathers for you! With these words, Harvey
approached the bird, and, striking at him with his
boot, had the satisfaction to see him spring briskly
from the ground, and mount into the air with a rapid,
bickering flight. He took his course against the
wind, and, as he ascended, Bel played out her line,
with rapturous exclamations of pleasure at the sight
of her petted bird flinging himself aloft with such a
spirited motion. When he had risen to the utmost
reach of his creance, he was observed to dart and
wheel through the air in every variety of perplexed
motion, cancelieringas it was anciently termed
in graceful circles through the atmosphere, and
turning
,
with quick flashes, the bright lining of his wings
to the sun. It was beautiful to look upon the
joyous
bird gambolling at this lordly height, and the
graceful girl watching his motions with a
countenance
of perfect transport.
To my thinking, said Harvey, Fairbourne is
so well pleased with his pastime that he will not be
very willing to return.
Oh, you shall see! cried Bel; I can lure `my
tassel-gentle back again.' Look you now, cousin,
here is Fairbourne shall come back to me like a
spaniel!
Saying this, she flourished her lure in the air, and
called out the words of her customary salutation to
the hawk as loud as she was able. He sees and
hears with extraordinary acuteness, she continued,
as she still waved the lure above her head, and
will obey presently.
Faith, if he hears or sees, he does not heed!
said Harvey.
He has been so overfed with delicacies,
replied
Bel, a little disappointed at receiving no token
of recognition, that it is no wonder this lure has no
charms for him. My whistle he never neglects.
Upon this, she put a small ivory pipe to her mouth,
and blew a shrill note.
You overrate your authority, Bel, said her
cousin
.
Fairbourne has no ear for music. He is fit for
treason, stratagem and spoils.
The wretch! exclaimed Bel, playfully. Does
he dare defy my whistle! then, master, I must need
take a course with you! there is some virtue in
fetters
,
however, when milder means fail. So come
down, scapegrace, and answer to your mistress for
your truant behaviour! Aha! you obey now! she
added exultingly, as she drew in the line, and
compelled
her hawk to dart towards the earth.
After all, said Harvey, there is no persuasion
like a string. Trust me, a loop upon hawk or lover,
coz, is safer than a lure any day.
It did not require the flight of a silly bird to teach
me that, said Bel, smiling, or why did I bring this
long line into the field with me?
At this moment, Fairbourne had almost reached
the ground by a swift flight that far outsped Bel's
exertions
,
assisted by Harvey, to draw him down: then,
skimming along the surface of the field with the
slackened cord, he suddenly shot upwards with such
vigour as to snap the string; and, frightened by the
jerk that severed his fetters, he arose with an
alarmed
motion, to a soaring height, and then shaped his
career directly up the river.
Bel and Harvey watched the retreating bird in
equal amazement, as he winged his flight across the
woody promontories in the distance, until he was
reduced
to a mere speck upon the sky.
Bel's emotion was one of mortification, not
unmingled
with admiration at the arrow-like swiftness with
which her favourite sped from her hand. Harvey's
was wonder, whether a bird nurtured in such
household
familiarity would soar so far from his
accustomed
haunts as to render his return hopeless.
I can see him yet, said Harvey, straining his
sight up the river, and, if I am not mistaken, he has
darted down to perch near Swallow Barn.
He will come back, muttered Bel, in a
distrusting
tone of voice, and with a look of dejection, I
know he will come back! nothing that I have
tended
so kindly would desert me.
Make yourself easy, my dear cousin, replied
Harvey, he belongs to an ungrateful tribe, and is
not worth reclaiming.
I could sit down and cry, said Bel.
You should laugh rather, to think, replied her
cousin, what an arrant coxcomb you have sent
abroad amongst the crows and king-fishers of the
river. He, with his jangling bells, and his silver ring
and dainty apparel! A marvellous fopling he will
make in the sedate circles of owls and buzzards!
I should not be surprised if, in three days' time, he
should be whipped out of all good society in the
woods, and be fain to come back to his perch, as
torn-down and bedraggled as a certain other
favourite
of yours, who took refuge at the Brakes
yesterday
.
Fye, cousin! exclaimed Bel, laughing, what
harm has poor Mr. Swansdown done, that you
should rail at him?
True, said Harvey; if you had deigned to cast
a loop round him, he would not have fled so
willingly
.
What shall I do? asked Bel.
I will tell Ned Hazard, said Harvey. This
is an incident in his line. Ned has not yet killed
seven dragons in your service; and therefore you
frown upon him. So, pray let me put him in the
way to signalize himself. He shall bring back
Fairbourne
,
if the renegade is to be found in the Old
Dominion
.
I would not give him the trouble, said Bel,
carelessly.
I will, replied Harvey; and by way of
quickening
his motion, will tell him that you would take
it kindly.
I am sure, said Bel, Edward would do any
thing I might ask of him.
He would delight in it, replied Harvey. He is
most horribly in love. The search after this hawk
would be occupation for him: it would divert his
melancholy.
Oh, cousin Harvey Riggs! cried Bel with great
animation, to say that Ned Hazard is melancholy,
or in love either, after what we heard on the bank of
the river the other day, when we surprised him and
Mr. Littleton!
Melancholy,that is, your love-melancholy,
wears divers antics, said Harvey. Ned was
beguiling
his sorrows in music, which is very common, as
you will find, in all the old romances. It was one of
the excesses of his passion, Bel.
To be singing my name in doggerel couplets on
the highway! I assure you I don't forgive him for
such passion! interrupted the other.
If the gods have not made him poetical, replied
Harvey, you should not blame him for that.
Talk to me of my hawk, cousin, and pray spare
your jests; for you see I need comfort.
VOL. I. 24
Ned, said Harvey, is all the comfort I can
give you, and if he does not bring back Fairbourne,
I would advise you to take the miserable swain
himself
.
Why do you talk to me so? asked Bel.
To tell you the truth, replied Harvey, I have a
reason for it. Ned, you know, is a good fellow. And
here,what is very natural,he has fallen in love.
He could not help that, you know! Well, it makes
him silly, as it makes every man, except those who
are so by nature, and they grow wise upon it. He
is afraid to talk to you, because his heart gets
in his mouth, and chokes him. I can see plainly
enough what he wishes to say, and therefore I am
determined, as you are my cousin, to say it for him.
He wishes to tell you, that as you are inexorable, he
has made up his mind to leave this country with
Mark Littleton; and then, heaven knows where the
poor fellow will go!
If no man was ever more in love than Ned
Hazard
,
answered Bel, the world would be sadly in
want of romances. Why, cousin, it is impossible
for him to be in earnest long enough to sum up his
own thoughts upon the subject.
How little do you know, cried Harvey, of my
poor friend Ned!
Know him, cousin! exclaimed Bel, laughing,
you won't be so rash as to say Ned Hazard is a
man of mystery? Why he is mirth itself.
You mistake his madness for mirth, Bel; he is
distracted, and, therefore, unaccountable for his
actions
.
You are as mad as he, cousin Harvey. That
is a pretty kind of love that plays off such
merry-andrew
tricks as Ned's mummery, with you to back
him! Your tragedy of the Babes in the Wood, and
your serenades under our windows, look very much
like the doings of a distracted lover! Give me a man
of reverend manners and dignity for a lover. Now,
you know, Ned has none of that, cousin.
Bel, you are as mad as either Ned or myself,
exclaimed Harvey with a laugh, and taking both of
Bel's hands; you will marry some grave rogue or
dull pedant, after all!
Cousin Harvey, I will not be catechised any
longer, interrupted Bel impatiently; here I come
to fly a hawk, and lo, you engage me in a parley
about Ned Hazard!
Well, replied Harvey, I have discharged my
duty. I see Ned is in a bad way. Poor devil! he
ought never to have fallen in love. But it was not
his fault. I thought it but just to tell you what I
feared. Ned will leave us: and who knows but he
may take another trip round the Horn! He will then
throw himself into the great struggle for freedom in
that hemisphere; become a general, of course; push
his conquests across the Andes; and perhaps,
reaching
the heights of Chimborazo, will fall in some
splendid battle, having first engraved with his sword
the name of the cold Bel Tracy upon the ice of the
glacier. And there he will leave that mighty
mountain
to tell posterity how burning was his love, how
frozen was his mistress! Now, there's dignity and
superlative sentiment both for you! Let Swansdown
himself beat that if he can!
Why what an irreclaimable jester are you!
cried Bel; I do not wonder that Edward Hazard
should be so little serious, with such a companion!
Then, Bel, you do not like him.
On the contrary, replied Bel, I like him
exceedingly
;
as well as a brother. But depend upon
it, I cannot entertain him in any other relation, until
perhaps
He has learned to be more sentimental and
scrupulous
in his behaviour, interrupted her cousin.
At least, said Bel, in a more serious manner,
and evidently as if she felt what she said, until he
ceases to jest upon me.
That's in confidence, said Harvey; I
understand
you. Ned has some schooling to go through
yet. At all events, he must not leave Swallow
Barn.
If you are in earnest, cousin,for indeed I do
not know how to take you,and he thinks of such a
thing, I should be very sorry for it, said Bel.
During this conversation, Bel had taken Harvey's
arm, and they had wandered towards the bank of
the river, and from thence homeward, so much
engrossed
with the topics that Harvey had brought
into discussion, that Bel gradually forgot her hawk,
and fell into a confidential communion upon a
subject
that was nearer to her feelings than she chose to
confess. The particulars of this further discourse,
which was continued until they had reached the
house, after our arrival at the Brakes, was not all
related to me by Harvey; but the impression made
upon his mind was, that Ned Hazard had not taken
the pains to conciliate Bel's favour, which the value
of the prize deserved. He did not doubt that she
had an affection for him; but still, she spoke as if
there were prejudices to be overcome, and scruples
to be conquered, which stood in the way of her
decision
.
Harvey's object, under all his levity of
manner
,
was to ascertain whether Ned's quest was
hopeless
or otherwise; and he had therefore availed
himself of the adventure of the hawk, to draw her
thoughts into the current indicated in the above
conversation
.
His conclusion from it all was, that Ned
must either reform his behaviour towards Bel, or
relinquish
his pretensions. Harvey added, Ned is
falling rapidly into that privileged intimacy that is
fatal to the pretensions of a lover. This jesting,
careless
friendship will lodge him, in a short time, high
and dry upon a shoal in her regard, where he will
become a permanent and picturesque landmark. He
will acquire the enviable distinction of a brother, as
she begins to call him already, and he will be certain
to be invited to her wedding.
24 *
CHAPTER XXVII.
THE AWARD.
Whilst
Harvey and myself were still
discoursing
over the matters I have imperfectly brought to
my reader's attention in the last chapter, Ned
Hazard
opened the door of the study, and came towards
us, with an animated step and a countenance full of
merriment. He told us, with much boasting, of his
own participation in the exploit, and of the
inestimable
value of his services, that the old family law-suit,
which had been so tempest-tost and weather-beaten,
was at length happily towed into port: that the
Apple-pie
was once more elevated to the rank of a
frontier
stream, upon whose banks the whilom hostile
clans of the Tracy and the Hazard might now
assemble
in peace: that after wading through a sea
of manuscript to oblige Mr. Tracy, and hearing
many wise legal apothegms from his lips, and
turning
Swansdown's brain topsy-turvey with points and
discriminations, merely to prevent him from marring
the decision, Mr. Wart had succeeded in bringing
the matter to a close, and was now busy in drawing
up a formal judgment upon the case. Philly,
continued Ned, is like to suffer injury from
retention
.
It is as much as he can do to prevent himself
from bursting out into a horse-laugh at every line he
writes. But he is, I believe, somewhat overawed
by Mr. Tracy, who takes the whole matter as
gravely
as if it were a state business. The best of it is,
Swansdown is in doubt as to the propriety of the
decision, and, with very little encouragement, would
bring in a verdict against the Brakes. Philly's whole
endeavour, for the last hour, has therefore been to
mystify the case in such a manner as to keep
Swansdown
from insisting upon the inquiry, whether the
mill-pond oozed away in a series of years, or was
carried off by some violent accident. Now, you
know it is a fact of common notoriety, that it was
swept off in a tremendous flood. Philly, finding
Swansdown likely to dwell on this circumstance, has
made a masterly diversion upon a point of law that
has happily quieted the gentleman's scruples. He
says, the act of God works no man injury, and that if
the dam has been swept away suddenly, it makes no
difference, because it would have wasted away at
any rate, by this time; and that it is extremely
probable
it was very much diminished before the flood:
that if, therefore, it was not an absolute,
imperceptible
decrease, it was
quasi
a decrease of that nature.
I think Philly has written something of this sort in
his report. This jargon has so confounded
Swansdown
,
as to set him to gazing at the ceiling in a
brown study, and has thrown Mr. Tracy into an
ecstasy
of admiration at Philly's learning and
acuteness
.
All this time, however, Mr. Wart has had his
mouth puckered up with repressed laughter, which
so affected me, that I could not remain in the room.
I have drunk half a dozen glasses of water, and have
been thrumming my fingers against the
window-panes
ever since this debate has been in agitation,
merely to escape notice. Mr. Tracy has, in
consequence
,
given me some sharp rebukes for my
inattention
to the momentous principles that Philly has
been expounding. In short, I was obliged to make
my escape.
Will they admit bystanders, asked Harvey,
to be present at the deliberation?
Oh! cheerfully, replied Ned; but you must be
very careful how you behave. Mr. Tracy is in the
most nervous state imaginable. He is greatly
delighted
with the result of the trial; but I don't think
he is quite satisfied with Philly's waiving an opinion
upon the points of law connected with the deed. It
is a little curious to observe how pertinaciously the
old gentleman adheres to his notion of the facts. He
has twenty times asserted that the site of the
mill-dam
was never surveyed: and there they have the
very document of the survey itself, which is shown
to him every time he makes the assertion; he looks
at it, and, as we all suppose, is convinced;but, in
the next minute, commences anew with the same
objection. I remarked that at length he began to
get out of humour at this sort of contradiction.
The old gentleman, said Harvey, is turning a
little sour with age. His temperament is growing
chilly; his constitution resembles that waterish,
gravelly
soil that you see sometimes around a spring,
where nothing grows but sheep-sorrel.
In a few moments we all repaired to the study.
Philly Wart and Swansdown were standing together,
at the moment of our entrance, in one corner of the
room. The former held in his hand a sheet of paper
upon which the award was written, and was silently
reading it over, whilst his features expressed that
comic perturbation which a man surprised by some
droll incident in a church might be supposed to wear.
He looked at us, upon our approach, from beneath
his spectacles, as his chin rested upon his waistcoat,
and smiled, but read on. Swansdown's face wore
that air of gravity and doubt, that I can fancy was
legible in the countenances of the signers of the
Declaration
of Independence, after they had put their
names to that important document. At the table,
with his back to these two, sat Mr. Tracy, with a
silk handkerchief folded and laid upon his head, to
guard him against the breeze that blew in through
the window. His hands were spread flat upon the
board, in such a manner as to throw his elbows
directly
outwards from his body; and he was casting
a keen glance over the field of papers that lay
unfolded
before him. As soon as he was aware of our
approach
,
he raised his head, looked at us with an
expression
of good humour, and remarked, with his
usual slow and distinct utterance,
Our friends have had a serious job of it to-day,
nodding towards the papers strewed over the table,
but I believe, by dint of perseverance, we have
reached the bottom at last.
We offered him our congratulations upon the
event; but he absolutely refused to allow us to
express
any pleasure at his success, lest it might be
considered
as triumphing over his friend Meriwether.
He declared, that moderation in victory was a
sentiment
that he desired particularly to evince in this
case; and he therefore checked our advances with
a gravity that made us laugh. The old gentleman,
however, was too full of his victory to preserve his
consistency in this humour; for when Harvey Riggs
insinuated a compliment to his judgment, by
reminding
him that he had frequently predicted the result,
whenever this case should come to be fairly
considered
,
he laughed outright for some moments, with his
hand across his eyes, and concluded by saying
I am not apt to take up fancies unadvisedly. I
generally reflect upon my grounds. But, dogs take
our friend Wart! he is for pruning the case so
much, that he must needs slur over all my law
touching
the phraseology of the deed. Ha, ha, ha! I see
his drift: he will spare our friend Meriwether.
Well, well! it is quite immaterial what shot brings
down the pigeon, so that we get him, ha, ha, ha!
A good judge, said Mr. Wart, speaking from
the spot where we first found him, will never decide
more than the case requires. I am not apt to deal
in
obiter dicta
.
The commonwealth has done you injustice, Mr.
Wart, said Mr. Tracy; you should have been on
the bench long ago.
I am afraid my chance has gone for ever now,
replied Philly, for here Mr. Swansdown and
myself
have overruled the opinions of the whole Court
of Appeals.
These courts are obstinate bodies, said the old
gentleman; it is a difficult thing to bring them to
reason, when they have once got a fantasy into their
brains. And now, Mr. Wart, pray favour the
gentlemen
with a reading of your award.
I will, said Philly, if I can make out my
own scrawl. It has been a rapid business. We
have administered justice
velis levatis
, I may say,
considering the nature of the case, and the time we
have been at it.
Upon this, Philly began to read aloud. The
document
in his hand, although hastily prepared, was
drawn out with all the technical verbiage that
belonged
to the nature of such an instrument. It
gave a brief history of the controversy from the
commencement, which part Philly ran over with a
hurried voice; but he assumed a more deliberate
manner when he came to the grounds of the
decision
,
stating, that the said arbitrators, having duly
considered all and singular the letters, declarations
in writing, and other papers touching the exposition
of the intent of the said parties, and their motives
for making and receiving the said grant, and also
duly
considering the deeds appertaining thereunto, and
all other matters connected therewith, have not
found it necessary to declare their opinion upon the
true intent and effect in law of the said deeds, by
reason that certain facts and matters in evidence
have come to the knowledge of the said arbitrators,
whereby the original proprietary rights and relations
of the said parties litigant
I wish you would change that word `litigant,'
Mr. Wart, said Mr. Tracy, who during the
reading
of the award sat listening with fixed attention,
and nodding his head, somewhat in the manner of
one keeping time in a concert: I don't like that
word; it would imply that Mr. Meriwether and
myself
have been litigious, which is too strong a term.
Philly turned up his eyes with a queer expression,
inclined his head sidewise, and raised one shoulder
so as to touch his ear.
I wish you would say, `of the parties laying
claim to the land in dispute;' I think that would be
better.
As you please, replied Philly, approaching the
table, and altering the phrase in conformity with this
suggestion.
Of the said parties claiming the land in dispute,
continued the counsellor, have grown to be
dependant
upon the principles of law brought into view by
the said facts and matters in evidence: which said
facts and matters in evidence show that the said
mill-dam, herein above mentioned, was originally
bounded by courses and distances, as laid off and
described
in the survey thereof by a certain Jeremiah
Perkins, made under the direction of the said Gilbert
Tracy and Edward Hazard, as appears by the said
survey filed in the proceedings in this case.
I don't think the site of the dam was laid off by
course and distance, said Mr. Tracy, interrupting
the lawyer.
The paper is here, replied Philly, stooping over
the table, and producing it.
Mr. Tracy took it, and put it down again. It
must be a spurious document that, he remarked
gravely.
The truth was, this paper, which had been
always
kept at Swallow Barn, presented a fact that
completely overthrew one of Mr. Tracy's strongest
positions, namely, that as the deed granted so much
land only as might be used by the dam, the
portion
granted was necessarily mutable, and
incapable
of being confined to specific boundaries. This
document of the survey, therefore, offended his
sight whenever it was produced. And as it had
but recently been brought to his consideration,
he had pondered too long over the case, in its other
aspects, to be able to accommodate his
conceptions
to this new state of things. It was impossible
to break the crust of his prejudices, which now
enveloped
him like a suite of mail.
I thought, said Philly, with a conciliatory
inclination
of his head, we had settled this point
before
.
VOL. I. 25
Aye, aye, replied the old gentleman,
recollecting
himself, go on, sir!
And it hath also appeared that when the said
grist-mill fell into disuse and decay, the mill-dam
aforesaid was gradually drained of the water therein
contained, by the action of wind and weather, in
such wise that, during the space of twenty-one
years, the bed or site of the said dam became
derelict
by slow and imperceptible degrees; save and
except that by a certain severe tempest, about the
period of the vernal equinox, in the year seventeen
hundred and , the actual date not being
precisely
known, a portion of the said dam was carried
away; which, being the act of God, that doth no
man harm, it is considered ought not to prejudice
the rights of the parties; and the more especially as
it hath appeared to these arbitrators, that the said
mill-dam had before that time fallen into desuetude,
and, notwithstanding the said tempest, would, in the
nature of things, have dwindled down, contracted
and wasted away into the present natural and
original
channel of the said Apple-pie Branch. And
further, it hath appeared that neither of the said
parties
litigant
I will alter the word here also, said Philly,
taking the pen, and inserting the same periphrasis as
before.
Mr. Tracy nodded, and the counsellor proceeded
Has had occasion, during the time aforesaid,
to exercise any acts of ownership over the said land,
seeing that the same was barren and unproductive,
and altogether unfit for any purpose of tillage,
True, said Mr. Tracy.
Therefore the said arbitrators, carefully
weighing
the said several facts with full and ample
consideration
,
and having heard all that the said Isaac
Tracy on the one side, and Edward Hazard, for and
on behalf of the said Francis Meriwether, on the
other side, had to urge in respect of their said several
pretensions
Devilish little on behalf of Frank! whispered
Ned Hazard.
Do, in virtue of the powers vested in them
by this reference, award, adjudge and determine,
for the complete and final ending of the said
dispute
,
and for the quieting of actions in all time to
come, that the land so left by the recession of the
waters as aforesaid, shall henceforth be deemed and
taken as followeth, that is to say; all that piece or
parcel of land lying eastwardly between the bank
of the said Apple-pie Branch, as the same now
exists
,
and the former margin of the said mill-dam,
bounding on the line of the tract called the Brakes,
is hereby declared to have reverted to the original
proprietors of the said tract called the Brakes, to
them and their heirs for ever: And that the main
channel of the said Apple-pie Branch shall be the
only true and established conterminous boundary
line of the said tracts of the Brakes and Swallow
Barn respectively.
Very conclusive and satisfactory! cried Mr.
Tracy, rising from his chair.
There you are, gentlemen, said Philly,
throwing
the paper down upon the table, exactly in statu
quo ante bellum. It is a great thing, Mr.
Swansdown
,
to pacify these border feuds.
I have always permitted myself, replied th
worthy thus addressed, to indulge the hope that
our intercession would prove advantageous to the
permanent interests of the families. It has been a
case, certainly, attended with its difficulties; and
has given rise to some curious and recondite principles
of jurisprudence.
Very curious and recondite! said Philly,
looking
archly around him. It has been a perfect
dragnet
case. We have fished up a great deal of law,
my dear sir!
I confess I have been sadly puzzled, replied
Swansdown, with the intricacies of this whole
proceeding
.
So have I, said Philly. But you have had
much the worst of it. For there, in the first place,
you were lost in the brambles; then, you were
soused in the mud; and after that, you were torn
with briars: you have some of the marks upon your
face yet. Then, you lost entirely our chase of the
fox; but I believe you are not fond of that, sir?
These were trifles, replied the other. I
alluded
to the conflicting opinions.
I understand you, interrupted the lawyer. It
takes a good nose and a fleet foot to follow one of
these little old-fashioned ejectments through its
doublings
.
Saying this, Philly opened the door of the study,
and walked into the hall, wiping his spectacles
with his handkerchief, and casting strange and comic
looks upon Hazard, Harvey and myself, who
followed
him. He was highly excited with the
proceedings
of the morning, and being relieved from the
restraint of Mr. Tracy's presence, gave vent to his
feelings by amusing remarks, and a sly, half-quiet
and half-jocular demeanor, that never broke out into
any open fit of laughter, nor yet fell to the level of his
ordinary calmness.
It was now the family dinner-hour, and the
household
assembled in one of the parlours, where the
result
of the arbitration was made known, and gave
rise to a great deal of animated conversation.
The behaviour of Mr. Tracy at the dinner-table
was punctilious and precise. He was even more
lavish than usual of the personal civilities that
characterize
his manners at all times; and it was
observable
,
that during the whole time that he mingled in
the family groups where the decision that had just
been made was a subject of constant recurrence, he
never permitted an expression relating to it to escape
his lips. He sat but a few moments after the cloth
was drawn, leaving the table in the occupation of
his company, and retired to the study, where he
employed
himself amongst the papers belonging to the
law-suit.
As the long afternoon wore away, the boundary
25 *
line and all its concerns were forgotten; and our
party fell into the various amusements that their
situation
afforded. At length, the hour came for our
return to Swallow Barn. Prudence, at the
persuasion
of the ladies, had consented to remain
during
the night. Ned Hazard informed Mr. Tracy
that he was requested by Meriwether to invite the
whole family, with Mr. Swansdown, to dinner at
Swallow Barn the next day. The old gentleman
expressed great pleasure in accepting the
invitation
,
and the rest promised to keep the appointment
without fail.
Having despatched these matters, Mr. Wart and
Rip mounted their horses, and rode slowly down the
hill from the mansion. But just as Hazard, who
had delayed a moment after his comrades, was
leaving the door, his horse, grown restive by seeing
his two companions moving off, after neighing, and
tossing up his head, and champing his bit, made a
sudden start, broke his bridle, and went off at full
speed, leaping and flinging himself into wild and
playful motions as he disappeared in the direction of
the road.
All pursuit was vain. And as it was apparent
that he would make the best of his way to his own
stable, Ned got into the carriage with the little girls
and myself; and, followed by Wilful, we were
wheeled off from the Brakes as rapidly as old Carey
could urge his mettlesome cattle forward.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
THE GOBLIN SWAMP.
The
sun was not above half an hour high when
we took our departure from the Brakes; and the
heat of the atmosphere was beginning to yield to the
partial distillation of the dew, and the slow invasion
of the night breeze. The road lay principally along
the river, upon a bank some ten or twelve feet above
the tide, shaded with low black-jacks, dogwood,
cedar
,
or tall pines. It occasionally digressed to head
an inlet, or thread a brake; and sometimes
extended
,
with a single meandering track, through the
neighbouring
fields, which were guarded,according to a
common arrangement in the Old Dominion,by a
succession of peculiarly inconvenient, rickety and
weather-worn gates, that dragged heavily upon their
wooden hinges, and swung to again, with a
misdirected
aim at their awkward bolts, to the imminent
peril of the tails of all wayfaring animals that
travelled
through them.
In a short time, we reached a point where the road
turned abruptly from the river and took an inland
direction, making a circuit of a mile or more, to pass
the famous Apple-pie, which it does at some distance
below the old mill, so conspicuous in my former
sketches. At this turn Ned Hazard proposed that
we should perform the rest of our journey on foot.
He wished to show me the Goblin Swamp; a region
of marsh, about half a mile distant, formed by the
diffusion of the Apple-pie over the flat grounds, near
its confluence with the James River. An old road
had once traversed the swamp at this place; and the
remains of the causeway were yet, Ned affirmed,
sufficiently solid to afford a passage to pedestrains;
besides, the Goblin Swamp showed to great
advantage
about twilight.
We accordingly committed our little companions
to the guardianship of Carey; and, quitting the coach,
entered a wood that bordered the road, where we
soon found ourselves involved in a labyrinth of young
pine-trees springing up so close together as almost
to forbid a passage through them. The ground was
strewed with a thick coat of pine-straw,as the
yellow
sheddings of this tree are called,so slippery as
to render it difficult to walk over it; and the tangled
branches caught in our clothes, and frequently struck
our hats from our heads. But we succeeded at last
in gaining an obscure path, so much embowered in
shade as to be scarcely discernible. This
conducted
us through the mazes of the wood, and in a few
moments we emerged upon the confines of an open
country.
Before us lay a plain, surrounded by forest which
in front towered above a copse that sprang from an
extensive marsh at the further extremity of the
plain. The earth was clothed with a thin vesture
of parched grass; and the still distinct furrows of
ancient
cornfields furnished proof that the tract had
been, at some remote period, under cultivation, but
long since abandoned, perhaps on account of its
sterility
.
A few clumps of meager persimmon-trees
were scattered over this forsaken region, and deep
gullies, washed into the gravelly soil, exposed to
view its signal poverty.
Somewhere near the middle of this open ground
stood a solitary, low brick chimney, conspicuous for
its ample fire-place, and surrounded by a heap of
ruins, to which a more striking air of desolation was
added by a luxuriant growth of weeds that had
taken root in the rank compost formed by the wreck
of household timber. Amongst these relics of former
habitation were the vestiges of a draw-well, choked
by the wash of the land; the weeds sprang from its
mouth; and the tall post, with the crotch in its upper
extremity, still supported the long piece of timber that
balanced the bucket, according to a device yet in
use in many parts of the country. Immediately
around the ruin, in what was once the curtilage of
the dwelling, a few crabbed fruit-trees, with chalky
joints, and bowed down with years, flung their almost
leafless and distorted limbs athwart the mouldering
homestead. There were also to be seen, about fifty
paces off, a black heap of dross, and some faint
traces of the fire of a former smithy, of which the
evidence was more unequivocal in the remains of a
door, on which was burnt the figure of a horse-shoe.
When we arrived at this spot the sun was just
peering, with his enlarged disk, through the upper
branches of the trees, in the western horizon. The
clouds were gorgeous with the golden and purple
tints that give such magnificence to our summer
evenings; and the waning light, falling on the
volume
of forest around us, communicated a richer
gloom to its shades, and magnified the gigantic
branches of some blasted oaks on the border of the
plain, as they were seen relieved against the clear
sky. Long and distorted shadows fell from every
weed, bush and tree, and contributed, with the
forlorn
aspect of the landscape, to impress us with an
undefined and solemn sensation, that for a moment
threw us into silence. Flights of crows traversed the
air above our heads, and sang out their discordant
vespers, as they plied their way to a distant roost;
the fish hawk had perched upon the highest naked
branch of the tallest oak, and at intervals was seen
to stretch forth his wing and ruffle his feathers, as if
adjusting his position for the night. All animated
objects that inhabited this region seemed to be busy
with individual cares; and the nocturnal
preparations
for rest or prey resounded from every
quarter
.
Hazard, taking advantage of the impression made
by the sombre imagery around us, as we marched
onward to the ruin, threw out some hints that we
were now upon a haunted spot, and began to
converse
in a lower tone, and walk closer to my side,
with an air of mystery and fear, put on to sort with
the nature of the story he was telling. The ruin, he
informed me, was formerly the habitation of Mike
Brown, who had strange doings with the devil, and
both Mike and his companion were frequently seen
in the swamp after dark; the negroes, he said, and
many of the white people about the country, held this
place in great terror; which, he believed, was one
reason why the road that formerly crossed the marsh
at this place, had been disused. Certainly, the devil
and Mike Brown could not have chosen a more
secluded
and barren waste for their pranks.
At length we reached the opposite side of the plain,
where it became necessary to halt, and examine more
minutely our road. Ned was under great
embarrassment
to discover the old causeway. The
shrubbery
had grown up so thick as to render this a task
of uncertain accomplishment. There were several
paths leading into the morass, made by the tramp of
cattle. These so far perplexed my companion, that
he was obliged to confess his ignorance of the right
way. We determined, however, to go on; the
approaching
night began already to darken our view,
and the undertaking seemed to be sufficiently
perilous
,
even in daylight. I kept pace with Hazard,
and shared with him the difficulties of a path that at
every step became more intricate; until, at last, we
found ourselves encompassed by deep pools of
stagnant
water, with a footing no better than that
afforded
by a mossy islet, scarcely large enough for one
person to stand upon, where we were obliged to cling
to the bushes for support; whilst the soft texture of
the earth yielded to our weight, and let in the water
above our shoe-tops.
Here Ned began to swear that the place was
strangely altered since he had last visited it, and to
charge himself with a loss of memory, in not
knowing
better how to get through this wilderness. He
protested that Mike Brown or his comrade had
bewitched
him, and brought him into this dilemma, as
a punishment for his rashness. I wish their
devli-ships
,
he continued, would condescend to favour
us with the assistance of one of their imps, until we
might arrive safely beyond the confines of their
cursed dominion. What ho, good Mr. Belzebub!
he cried out jocularly, have you no mercy on two
foolish travellers?
Ned had no sooner made this invocation, which
he did at the top of his voice, than we heard, at a
distance from us, the indistinct rustling of leaves, as
of one brushing through them, and the frequent plash
of a footstep treading through the marsh. The sounds
indicated the movement of the object towards us,
and it became obvious that something was fast
making
its way to the spot where we stood.
Truly, said Ned, that Mr. Belzebub is a
polite
and civil demon. He scarce has notice of our
distresses, before he comes himself to relieve them.
By this time a grotesque figure became faintly
visible through the veil of twigs and branches that
enveloped us. All that we could discern was the
murky outline of something resembling a man. His
stature was uncommonly low and broad;
apparently
he wore no coat, and upon what seemed his head
was an odd-shaped cap, that fitted closely to his
skull.
Who goes there? cried Ned briskly, as the
figure
came to a halt, and looked wildly about; ghost
or devil?
Neither, replied the figure, with a husky voice,
such as that of a man with a bad cold,and at
the same instant stepping boldly before us, but an
old sinner, who is a little of both: a sort of
cast-away
,
that has more gray hairs than brains; yet not
so much of a buzzard as to be ignorant that the
round-about
way is often the nearest home. Hereupon,
the figure broke out into a loud, hollow, and
unnatural
laugh.
What, Hafen? Is it possible? what, in the name
of the foul fiend, brings you here? cried out Ned,
recognizing the speaker, who was Hafen Blok, a
short, thick-set, bandy-legged personage, bearing all
the marks of an old man, with a strangely
weather-beaten
face, that was intersected by as many drains
as the rugged slope of a sand-hill. He had a large
mouth, disfigured with tobacco, and unprovided with
any show of teeth. He had moreover a small
upturned
nose, a low forehead, and diminutive eyes that
glistened beneath projecting brows of grizzled and
shaggy hair. For a man verging upon sixty-five, his
frame was uncommonly vigorous; although it was
apparent that he was lame of one leg. His
head-gear
,
which had attracted our attention even at a
distance, was nothing more than the remnant of an
VOL. I. 26
antique cocked hat, now divested of its flaps, so as to
form a close, round cap. His scraggy throat was
covered with a prurient beard of half an inch in
length, and laid open to view between the collar of
a coarse brown shirt. Across his arm was flung a
coat of some homely material, with huge metal
buttons
appearing to view; and his trowsers and shoes
were covered with the mud of the swamp. A belt
crossed his shoulder, to which was suspended a bag
of hempen cloth; and in his hand he bore two or
three implements for trapping. There was a saucy
waggishness in his gestures, of which the effect was
heightened by the fox-like expression of his
countenance
,
and the superlatively vagabond freedom of his
manners.
You are well met, Hafen, continued Ned.
The devil of the swamp could never have sent us
a better man. How are we to get through the
bog?
It is easy enough, Mister Ned Hazard, for a
traveller that knows a tussock from a bulrush,
replied
Hafen.
And pray, how old should he be to arrive at
that knowledge?
He should be old enough to catch a black snake
in the water, Mister Ned; or, at least, he ought to
have cut his eye-teeth, said Hafen, with another
of his strange, hollow laughs.
Save your jest for dry land, old fellow!
interrupted
Hazard, and tell us plainly how we shall
find our way to Swallow Barn without going round.
They that have the folly to get in, ought to
carry wit enough with them to get out, replied
Hafen dryly.
Come, old gentleman, said Ned, with a tone of
entreaty, we shall take an ague if you keep us here.
It grows late; and if we can save a mile by crossing
the swamp, who knows but you may be all the
better
for it when we get safe to the other side?
You see, sir, said Hafen, with more respect in
his manner than before, a fool's counsel is
sometimes
worth the weighing; but an old dog, you know
Mister Ned, can't alter his way of barking; so you
and that gentleman must excuse my saucy tongue;
and if you will follow me, I will put you across the
swamp as clean as a bridge of gold. Though I don't
mean to insinuate, Mister Hazard, that you couldn't
soon learn the way yourself.
Saying this, he conducted us back to the margin
of the marsh, and passing some distance higher up,
entered the thicket again by the path of the old
causeway, along which we proceeded with no other
caution than carefully to step in the places pointed
out by Hafen, who led the way with the vigorous
motion of a man in the prime of life; and in a brief
space we found ourselves in safety on the opposite
side.
Here we gave our guide a liberal reward for his
services, that so elated the old man as to rouse all
his talkativeness.
Hafen is a person of some notoriety in this district.
He is a Hessian by birth, and came to America with
Count Donop, during the war of the Revolution, as a
drummer, not above fourteen years old; and he was
present at the action at Red Bank on the Delaware,
when that unfortunate officer met his fate. He was
afterwards engaged in the southern campaigns, when
he found means to desert to the American lines in
time to witness the surrender of Lord Cornwallis.
At the close of the war Hafen took up his quarters
in the neighbourhood of Williamsburg, where he set
up the trade of a tinker, as being most congenial with
his vagrant propensities. Being a tolerable
performer
on the violin, he contrived to amass a sufficient
capital to purchase an instrument, with which he
ever afterwards sweetened his cares and divided his
business, wandering through the country, where he
mended the kettles, and fiddled himself into the good
graces, of every family, within the circuit of his
peregrinations
.
This career was interrupted by but one
episode, which happened in the year seventeen
hundred
and ninety-one, when, being attacked by an
unusual restlessness, he enlisted in the army, and
marched with St. Clair against the Indians. The
peppering that he got in the disastrous event of that
expedition, brought him home in the following year
with a more pacific temper and a lame leg. It was
like Cincinnatus returning to his plough. He took up
his nippers and fiddle again, and devoted himself to
the affairs of the kitchen and parlour. Being one of
those mortals whose carelessness of accommodation
is mathematically proportioned to their aversion to
labour, Hafen was equally idle and ragged, and
contrived
generally, by a shrewd and droll humour, to
keep himself in good quarters, though upon a footing
that rendered him liable at all times to be dismissed
without ceremony. He has always been
distinguished
for his stores of old ballads; and the
women
about the families where he gained a seat in
the corner of the kitchen fire, were indebted to him
for the most accepted versions of the Gosport
Tragedy
,
Billy Taylor, and some other lamentable ditties
recording the fates of true lovyers and ladies fair
and free, which he taught them to sing in long
metre, with a touching sadness, and agreeably to
their authentic nasal tunes. Besides this, he was
the depository of much of the legendary lore of the
neighbourhood, picked up from the old people of the
Revolutionary time: and, according to his own
account
,
he had a familiar acquaintance with sundry
witches, and was on good terms with every
reputable
ghost that haunted any house along the James
river.
These characteristics gave him many immunities,
and often gained him access to bower and hall; and
as he was gifted with a sagacity that always knew
how to flatter his patrons, he was universally
regarded
as a well-meaning, worthless, idle stroller,
who, if he could not make himself useful, was at
least in nobody's way. On all festive occasions
his violin was an ample recommendation; and as
he could tell fortunes, and sing queer old songs, he
was connected in the imaginations of the younger
folks with agreeable associations. From these
26 *
causes he was seldom an unwelcome visitant; and
not being fastidious on the score of personal
entertainment
,
he was well content to get his supper in the
kitchen, a dram,for which he had the craving of the
daughter of the horseleech,and the privilege of a
corner in the hay-loft.
Of late Hafen had lost some favour by his
increasing
propensity for drink, and by the suspicion, that
stood upon pretty strong proofs, of not being over
scrupulous in his regard for the rights of property.
Besides, for many years past, his tinkering had fallen
into disuse, by reason, as he said, of these Yankee
pedlars breaking up his honest calling. So that, at
this time, Hafen may be considered like an old
hound whose nose has grown cold. His
employments
are, in consequence, of a much more
miscellaneous
character than formerly.
Such was the individual who had rescued us from
the perils of the swamp, and who now, having
brought us to firm ground, had no further pretext for
keeping our company. But he was not so easily
shaken off. His predominant love of gossip took
advantage of the encouragement he had already
met, and he therefore strode resolutely in our
footsteps
,
a little in the rear, talking partly to himself
and partly to us, without receiving any response.
At length, finding that no further notice was likely
to be taken of him, he ventured to say in a doubtful
tone
The next time the gentlemen have a fancy to
cross this way, perhaps they'll think a few pennies
in the tinker's pouch, better than a pair of swamp
stockings.
And many thanks beside, Hafen, said I. But
how came you to be so close at hand this evening?
O sir, replied Hafen, availing himself of this
overture, and coming up to our side, bless you!
this is a quite natural sort of place to me. I am too
good for nothing to be afraid of spirits, for I am not
worth the devil's fetching, sir; here he laughed in
his usual singular way. The swamp is a very
good mother to me, although I am a simple body,
and can pick up a penny where rich folks would
never think of looking for it.
How is that? I asked.
There is a power of muskrats about these parts,
sir, he replied, and with the help of these tools,
holding up his snares, I can sometimes gather a
few ninepences with no more cost than a wet pair
of breeches, which is fisherman's luck, sir, and of no
account, excepting a little rheumatism, and not even
that, if a man has plenty of this sort of physic.
So saying, he thrust his hand into his bag, and
pulled out a green flask that contained a small
supply
of whiskey.
Perhaps the gentlemen wouldn't be above
taking
a taste themselves? he continued, for it's a
mighty fine thing against the ague.
We excused ourselves; and Hafen put the flask
to his mouth, and smacking his lips as he concluded
his draught, observed
It's a kind of milk for old people, and not bad
for young ones.
What success have you had to-day, with your
traps? I inquired.
I have come off poorly, he replied; the vermin
are getting shy, and not like what they used to be.
Now, I have got no more than two rats. Some
days even I don't get that much.
Then, I take it, Hafen, that you do not thrive
much in the world, I remarked.
Ah, sir, replied Hafen, still holding the flask in
his hand, and beginning to moralize, it is a great
help to a man's conscience to know that he earns
his bread lawfully: a poor man's honesty is as
good as a rich man's gold. I am a hobbling sort
of person, and no better than I ought to be, but
I never saw any good come out of deceit.
Virtue
is its own reward, as the parson says; and
away goes the devil when he finds the door shut
against him. I am no scholar, but I have found
that out without reading books
At this moment the half smothered cluck of a
fowl was heard from Hafen's bag.
God never sends mouths, continued Hafen,
but he sends meat, and any man who has sense
enough to be honest, will never want wit to know
how to live; but he must plough with such oxen as
he has. Some people have bad names, but all are
not thieves that dogs bark at.
So, you have only taken two muskrats
to-day
?
said Ned. Have you nothing else in the
bag?
Nothing else, Mister Hazard.
Are they dead or alive? asked Ned.
Oh dead! dead as old Adam! they were
swinging by their necks long enough to strangle
nine lives out of them.
This swamp is haunted, Hafen, said Ned
archly.
Yes, sir, replied Hafen, there are certainly
some queer doings here sometimes. But, for my
share, I never saw any thing in these hobgoblins to
make an honest man afraid. All that you have to
do is to say your prayers, and that will put any
devilish
thing out of heart.
Did you ever know a dead muskrat, asked
Ned, to be changed into a live pullet? Now,
master
honest tinker! I can conjure up a devil to do
that very thing.
Here Hafen put on a comic leer, and hesitated for
a moment, as if collecting himself, whilst he was
heard giving out a confused chuckling laugh. At
length he observed,
Mister Ned Hazard has always got some trick.
I often tell folks Mister Hazard is a pleasant man.
See now, said Hazard, striking the bag with his
hand, does not that sound marvellously like a
clucking hen?
Oh, I grant you, exclaimed Hafen, assuming a
tone of surprise, I had like to have forgotten; when
I said there was nothing but the rats in my bag, I set
no account upon a pullet that Sandy Walker gave
me this evening, for putting a few rivets in his
copper
still.
Come, Hafen, said Ned, no lies amongst
friends. Sandy Walker never owned a still in his
life.
Did I say a still, Mister Hazard? I spoke in a
sort of uncertain way, which was as much as to
signify
,
said Hafen, puzzling his brain for a better
account
of the matter, and twisting his face into some
shrewd contortions, which at last ended by his
coming
close to Hazard, and putting his finger against his
nose, as he said in a half whisper, it was an old
grudge against Sandy that I had, upon account of
his abusing me before company for drinking, and
insinuating
that I made free with a shirt that his wife
lost from the line in a high wind, last April, and some
other old scores I had. So, I thought a pullet was
small damages enough for such a scandal. Pick-up
law is the cheapest law for a poor man, Mister
Hazard
;
and possession is nine points out of ten. Isn't
that true? Here he laughed again.
I think a gentleman who brags so much of his
honesty and virtue, might practise a better code. But
as between you and Sandy, said Ned, your merits
are so nearly equal, that take what you can, and keep
what you get, is a pretty sound rule; although you
are like to get the best of that bargain.
Oh, replied Hafen, I want nothing more than
justice.
The night was now closing in fast. We were
walking along a narrow tongue of land that stretched
into the swamp, from the bosom of which, on either
side, arose a forest of lofty trees, whose topmost
branches were traced upon the sky with that bold
configuration that may be remarked at the twilight,
whilst the dusk rapidly thickened below, and flung
its increasing gloom upon our path. Here and there
a lordly cypress occurred to view, springing forth
from the stagnant pool, and reposing in lurid shade.
Half sunk in ooze, rotted the bole and bough of
fallen
trees, coated with pendant slime. The ground
over which we trod took an easy impression from
our footsteps; and the chilling vapour of the marsh,
mingled with the heavy dew, was to be felt in the
dampness of our clothes, and compelled us to button
up our coats.
This dreary region was neither silent nor
inanimate
;
but its inhabitants corresponded to the genius
of the place. Clouds of small insects, crossed now
and then by a whizzing beetle, played their fantastic
gambols around our heads, displaying their minute
and active forms against the western horizon, as they
marshalled us upon our way. The night-hawk arose,
at intervals, with a hoarse scream into this fading
light, and swept across it with a graceful motion,
sometimes whirling so near that we could hear the
rush of his wing, and discern the white and spectral
spot upon it, as he darted past our eyes. Thousands
of fire-flies lit up the gloom, and sped about like
sprites in masquerade; at one moment lifting their
masks, as if to allure pursuit, and instantly again
vanishing, as in a prankish jest. A populous
congregation
of frogs piped from the secret chambers
of the fen with might and main. The whip-poor-will
reiterated, with a fatiguing and melancholy
recurrence
,
his sharp note of discord. The little catadid
pierced the air with his shrill music. The foxfire,
as the country people call it,glowed hideously from
the cold and matted bosom of the marsh; and, far
from us, in the depths of darkness, the screech-owl
sat upon his perch, brooding over the slimy pool, and
whooping out a dismal curfew, that fell upon the ear
like the cries of a tortured ghost.
We trudged briskly upon our way, but almost
without exchanging words; for the assemblage of
striking objects in the scene had lulled us into silence.
I do not wonder that a solitary traveller should grow
superstitious, amidst such incentives to his
imagination
.
Hafen followed our steps, and, as I fancied,
completely subdued by faintheartedness. I thought
he walked closer on our skirts than a man perfectly
at ease would do, and his loquacity was entirely
gone. He firmly believed in the stories of the
Goblin
Swamp, and I was anxious to get them from his
own lips, as Hazard had given me to understand that
I could not meet a better chronicler. With this
purpose
,
I gave him timely encouragement to follow us
to Swallow Barn. And now, having passed the
confines
of the wood, we found but little to attract our
attention for the rest of the journey.
You must tell me the story of Mike Brown
tonight
,
said I to Hafen, as I invited him to bear us
company.
In an instant, Hafen's imagination was full of the
comforts of the kitchen at Swallow Barn, as well as
of the self consequence that belongs to a genuine
story-teller. He consented with a saucy alacrity,
and then remarked,
That the gentlemen always knew how to get
something to please them out of Hafen; and that he
always did like himself to keep company with
quality
.
It was after candlelight when we arrived at
Swallow
Barn.
END OF VOLUME I.Dear and Respected Friend,Touching the
question of the law-suit which, notwithstanding the
erroneous judgments of our unlearned courts, still
hangs in unhappy suspense, I am moved by the
consideration
urged in your sensible epistle to me of the
fifteenth ultimo, to submit the same, with all the
matters of fact and law pertinent to a right decision
thereof, to mutual friends, to arbitrate the same
between
us; not doubting that the conclusion will be
agreeable to both, and corroborative of the
impressions
which I have entertained, unaltered from the
first, arising of this controversy with my venerated
neighbour, the late Walter Hazard.
What stake I have is insignificant in comparison
of the value of vindicating the ground on which I
have stood for forty years and upwards, and also of
relieving our lineal and collateral kindred from
vexatious
disputes in time to come.
I have written to my young friend, Singleton O.
Swansdown, Esq. of Meherrin,
Very young! interrupted Harvey, almost as
juvenile as the law-suit.
Son of my late worthy kinsman, Gilbert
Swansdown
,
as a proper gentleman to act in my behalf, and
late letters from him signify his ready pleasure to do
me this service. His advices inform me that he will
be at the Brakes in this present week. Although I
could have wished that this arbitrament should in
nowise fall into the hands of lawyersseeing that
we have both had reason, to our cost, to pray for a
deliverance from the tribeyet, nevertheless, it is not
becoming in me to object to your nomination of
Philpot
Wart, Esq. who is a shrewd and wary man, and
will doubtless strive to do the right between us.
I would desire, moreover, that it be understood
as a preliminary, that no respect shall be had to the
quibbles and law quirks wherewith the courts have
entertained themselves, to my detriment, hitherto in
these premises.
Praying that unnecessary delay shall not hinder
the speedy return of Mr. Swansdown, when his
occasions
shall call him hence, I beg leave to subscribe
myself,
Respected and dear Sir,
Your very obedient and obliged servant,
ISAAC TRACY.